9(7(5$16+($/7+$'0,1,675$7,21 
Birch 
Contract No. V101 (93) P-1369 March 31, 1997 Version 1.0 *See Directory in Appendices for Listing of Participants
2
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS The Headquarters Program Director, Diabetes and the Office of Performance Management acknowledges the following individuals for their for expert guidance in the development of a quality document.
· · ·
L. Fishelman, MD, (Consultant)Harvard Pilgram Health Plan K. Grimes, MD (Consultant)Harvard Pilgram Health Plan C. Margolis, MD, MA (Consultant)Ben Gurion University Center for Medical Decisionmaking and The Institute for Healthcare Improvement O. Susskind, MPH, (Consultant)Instructional Design
·
The contributions of VHAs Medical Advisory Panel for the Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group is acknowledged as is the National Center for Cost Containment, Department of Veterans Affairs, Milwaukee, Wisconsin, for duplication and distribution of the enclosed diabetes guideline.
3
VETERANS HEALTH ADMINISTRATION CLINICAL GUIDELINE FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS
TABLE OF CONTENTS Section I. INTRODUCTION Comparison of VHA Diabetes Guidelines To Existing National Guidelines MODULE G: GLYCEMIC CONTROL GM: Medication GN: Nutrition GH: Home Monitoring GP: Physical Activity MODULE F: FOOT CARE FR: Routine Care FI: Infection(s) and Ulcer(s) MODULE E: EYE CARE MODULE R: RENAL DISEASE TREATMENT Evaluation Screening Management MODULE H: HYPERTENSION MANAGEMENT Attachment 1: The Pharmacological Management of Hypertension MODULE Attachment Attachment Attachment L: 1: 2: 3: LIPID CONTROL Drugs That Alter Plasma Lipids Drug Interactions Costs for Hyperlipidemia Drug Therapy Tab/Page i
II.
Tab G
III.
Tab F
IV.
V.
Tab E Tab R
VI.
Tab H
VII.
Tab L
VIII:
APPENDICES Working Group Members Individual Working Groups Coordination Team Education Team Medical Advisory Panel (MAP)
Appendices
4
VETERANS HEALTH ADMINISTRATION CLINICAL GUIDELINE FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS
EXHIBITS
Exhibit
Following Page YEARS OF REMAINING LIFE AFTER DIAGNOSIS: NONHISPANIC WHITE MALE 41
G1.
G2.
YEARS OF REMAINING LIFE AFTER DIAGNOSIS: NONHISPANIC WHITE FEMALE
41
5
INTRODUCTION
6
INTRODUCTION These clinical practice guidelines on the assessment and treatment of diabetes mellitus are intended to facilitate the management of persons with diabetes seen in specialty as well as primary care settings.
The guidelines are broad enough to encompass the critical decision points in patient management, such as glycemic control, evaluation of the eyes and feet, and early recognition and treatment of co-morbid conditions including hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and renal disease.
At the same time, they are designed to be flexible so that local policies or procedures, such as those regarding referrals to or consultation with diabetes teams, ophthalmology, optometry, podiatry, nephrology, and endocrinology (lipids), can be accommodated.
Medication usage guidelines have been adapted from the Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group Medical Advisory Panel Guidelines for Non-Insulin Dependent Diabetes Mellitus (NIDDM), Hypertension and Cholesterol.
DEFINITIONS The Veterans Health Administration defines Clinical Practice Guidelines as1: Recommendations for the performance or exclusion of specific procedures or services derived through a rigorous methodological approach that includes the following: ·
Determination of appropriate criteria, such as effectiveness, efficacy, population benefit, or patient satisfaction, and Literature review to determine the strength of the evidence (based in part on study design) in relation to these criteria.
·
Clinical a set of diagram diabetes
practice guidelines are frequently displayed in the form of an algorithm (an algorithm is rules for solving a problem in a finite number of steps).
Typically, a clinical algorithm s a guideline into a step-by-step decision tree.
VHA's clinical practice guideline for mellitus is displayed in algorithmic format.
Clinical practice guidelines, which are being used increasingly in health care, are seen by many as a potential solution to inefficiency and inappropriate variation in care.
Guidelines should be evidence-based and based upon explicit criteria, to ensure consensus regarding their internal validity.2, 3 However, it is acknowledged that the use of guidelines must always be in the context of a provider's clinical judgment in the care of a particular person.
For that reason, the guidelines may be viewed as an educational tool analogous to textbooks and journals, but in an userfriendlier format.
Clinical Pathways are defined as: ·
Clinical management tools that organize, sequence, and specify the timing for the major patient care activities and interventions of the entire interdisciplinary team for a particular diagnosis or procedure.
Clinical Pathways define key processes and events in the day-to-day management of care and often serve as a component of the patient record.
Variance from the pathway along with causes of variance should be documented.
7
OVERVIEW OF THE DIABETES GUIDELINES: The diabetes mellitus guidelines are organized into six major modules, with a linkage diabetes algorithm providing an overview of the relationship between the modules: ·
Module GGlycemic Control: GMMedication GNNutrition GHHome Monitor GPPhysical Activity Module FFoot Care: FRRoutine Foot Care FIInfection and Ulcers Module Module Module Module EEye Care HHypertension Management LLipid Control RRenal Disease Treatment
·
· · · ·
Diabetes prevention strategies can be conceptually divided into three categories: Primary Prevention, Secondary Prevention, and Tertiary Prevention.
Primary prevention refers to the prevention of the onset of diabetes.
Although National Institutes of Health sponsored controlled, randomized, clinical trials of primary prevention of Type I and Type II diabetes in high-risk individuals are underway, it will be years before the results are available.
Secondary prevention in diabetes is the concept that improved glycemic control will result in a decrease in the development of microvascular complications.
Finally, tertiary prevention is the premise that screening for the presence of early microvascular disease (such as retinopathy, nephropathy, and neuropathy) will lead to the identification of individuals for whom therapeutic interventions can reduce their subsequent risk of blindness, renal failure and amputation.
Each module uses a risk stratification approach to identify persons with diabetes who have a greater probability of developing complications, and who therefore would benefit from more intensive intervention.
Finally, providers should recognize that the major cause of morbidity and mortality in persons with diabetes is cardiovascular disease -- myocardial infarction, stroke, and peripheral vascular disease.
It accounts for over 70% of hospitalizations and deaths.
Therefore an aggressive approach to evaluating and reducing cardiovascular risk factors -- including smoking cessation, management of hyperlipidemia, treatment of hypertension, and promotion of a healthy lifestyle -- should be a general goal for all providers.
While each module is designed for use by primary care providers in an the modules can also be used to coordinate and standardize care within as teaching tools for students and housestaff.
However, it should be reco algorithms, as is true for most, cannot be used as a linear guideline management of diabetes mellitus and are not intended to supersede the provider caring for an individual.
ambulatory care setting, subspecialty teams, and gnized that this series of for the recognition and clinical judgment of the 8
The majority of the literature support for these guidelines, referenced throughout the document, is based upon key clinical randomized controlled trials and longitudinal studies published from 1992 through March, 1997 in the areas of diabetes, hypertension, lipid management, renal disease and foot and eye care.
Each of the references listed have undergone a thorough review and rating based on the scientific rigor of the article, clinical relevance of the material presented and the ability to generalize using this data.
Where existing literature is ambiguous or conflicting, or where scientific data are lacking on an issue, recommendations are based on the expert panels' opinion and clinical experience.
Annotations indicate whether each recommendation is based on scientific data or expert opinion.
A letter, (e.g., "A or B") within a box of the algorithm refers the reader to an annotation for that box.
The annotation typically follows the specific page of the algorithm in the sections labeled "Algorithms and Annotations" in each module.
Strength of recommendations grading as well as level of evidence grading is based on AHCPR guideline development efforts4.
For a description of each, refer to the following tables: Strength of Recommendation Level I Level IIa Level IIb Level III a
Usually indicated, always acceptable Acceptable, of uncertain efficacy and favor of usefulness/efficacy.
Acceptable, of uncertain efficacy and not likely to be harmful.
Not acceptable, of uncertain efficacy guidelines.
and considered useful and effective.
may be controversial.
Weight of evidence in may be controversial.
May be helpful, and may be harmful.
Does not appear in
Strength of Evidenceb A Primary Evidence Secondary Evidence a
B Randomized Other Clinical studies
C Well designed clinical studies Clinical studies related to topic but not in a population with diabetes
D Panel consensus Clinical studies Unrelated to topic
b
From ACC/AHA Task Force Report AHCP classification.
The guideline and algorithm are designed to be adapted to the individual facility's needs and resources.
The guidelines and algorithms will be updated as further research results become available.
The ultimate goal is to improve local management of patients with diabetes and thereby improve patient outcomes.
9
GUIDELINE DEVELOPMENT Diabetes in the Veterans Health Administration Diabetes is now recognized to account for over 14% of health care expenditures in the United States, although only 3.1% of Americans have diagnosed diabetes.4 The burden of diabetes in the VHA, documented in a recent series of VHA reports (6, 7, 8) is among the highest of any national health care system: ·
The prevalence of diabetes among all veterans receiving outpatient care is estimated to be about 15%, and 20% among veterans receiving care in general medicine, primary care, or women's health clinics.
The average demographic profile is that of a 64-year-old male with an income less than $7000.
12.0% of veterans were identified as having prescribed diabetes specific medications (insulin, oral agents, or monitoring supplies) as an outpatient in FY94.
This group of veterans accounted for 24% of all pharmacy costs; nearly 7 cents out of every outpatient pharmacy dollar was spent on glycemic control medications and supplies.
Given scientific advances since that time, the availability of new, and more expensive, antiglycemic agents; and a 40% increase in self-monitoring blood glucose (SMBG) expenditures, these data are considered to underestimate current expenditures.
28% of all veterans on dialysis in FY94 who received erythropoietin had an associated diagnosis of diabetes.
0.9% of veterans with diabetes sequentially examined in an Optometry Service multisite field study had severe visual loss 52% of all lower extremity amputations occurred in veterans with diabetes and revisions in the VHA in FY94
·
·
·
·
·
·
5.6% of admissions of veterans with diabetes were associated with the metabolic complications of the disease, and 3.5% were for pneumonia or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD).
Although veterans with diabetes have a disproportionate number of hospitalizations relative to veterans without diabetes, diagnosis, education, preventive screening, risk factor reduction, and pharmaceutical treatment of diabetes, including microvascular and macrovascular complications, occurs mostly in the outpatient primary care setting.
10
However, despite the costs and morbidity associated with diabetes, and the general consensus that preventive care can delay, if not prevent, a significant percentage of the instances of visual loss, chronic renal failure, foot ulcers and lower extremity amputations, as well as admissions for metabolic control, 1996 baseline performance data from the VHA External Peer Review Program (8) indicates the following rates of preventive screening or intervention: · · · · · · ·
50.8% of veterans had at least an annual glycosylated hemoglobin test 46.5 % of veterans had an annual eye exam for the detection of retinopathy 71.8 % of veterans had an annual visual inspection of the foot 44.9% of veterans had an annual examination of pedal pulses 33.5% of veterans had an annual sensory examination of the foot 27.5% of veterans received an influenza vaccine 24.9% of veterans received a pneumococcal vaccine
Diabetes should be considered a serious public health problem both in the United States and in the Veterans Health Administration; and its detection and treatment must be viewed as the responsibility of all health care providers.
Furthermore, although the primary care provider is responsible for overall coordination of care, each health care provider is urged to assume responsibility for preventive care for the entire person at time of each encounter.
For example, a podiatrist should be alert as to whether an eye exam has been performed within the past year; and an ophthalmologist should be concerned whether there is evidence of clinical nephropathy in a person with retinopathy.
Each should be aware of the symptoms of uncontrolled hyperglycemia and be able to make appropriate referrals back to the primary care provider or subspecialist team.
Expanded roles for nurse practitioners, nurses, physician assistants, dietitians and pharmacists should be considered.
These guidelines should be used as an impetus for administrators at each Veterans Integrated Services Network (VISN), facility, and care access site to develop innovative plans to break down the barriers preventing primary care providers, subspecialists and allied health professionals from working together, and from preventing patients from having prompt access to preventive care.
Guideline Development Process The goal in developing the guideline for diabetes mellitus was not to repeat the guideline development process, but rather, to incorporate the information from several existing, national consensus, evidence-based guidelines into a format which would maximally facilitate clinical decision-making.
The use of the algorithm format was chosen because of the evidence that such a format improves data collection, diagnostic and therapeutic decision-making and changes patterns of resource use.
However, few guidelines are published in such a format.
Furthermore, multiple guidelines covering the same topic, can be confusing and even conflicting.
To enhance continuity of care, the VHA Diabetes Guidelines were designed to encompass a broad spectrum of outpatient care of patients with diabetes.
This required incorporating multiple published guidelines into a single, unified document.
This guideline and the algorithms were the product among over 70 experts from all aspects of the developers/contributors include Veterans Health representatives from key federal health related agenci of seven months of consensus building health care continuum.
The list of Administration professionals, senior es including the Diabetes Division of the 11
National Institutes for Diabetes, Digestive and Kidney Diseases; Division of Diabetes Translation, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; Office of Managed Care, Health Care Financing Administration; and the Pharmacoeconomic Center of the Department of Defense, as well as private sector experts provided by the VHA External Peer Review Program contractor.
In addition, other participants hold or have recently held senior leadership positions in the American Diabetes Association, and the National Institutes of Health/Center for Disease Control and Prevention National Diabetes Education Program.
The list of contributors includes nurses, dietitians, social workers and physicians representing Podiatry, Endocrinology, Ophthalmology, Optometry, Geriatrics, Internal Medicine, and Primary Care and expert consultants in the field of guideline and algorithm development.
Additionally, the guideline and algorithm draws heavily from existing American Diabetes Association, National Cholesterol Education Program, and National Kidney Foundation practice guidelines for diabetes mellitus.
Recommendations for pharmacologic management of persons with diabetes, hypertension and hyperlipidemia developed by VHA's Medical Advisory Panel (MAP) to the Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group are also integrated.
Consumer input is also being solicited and will be included in future revision of the guidelines.
The results of these discussions, as well as insights from four focus groups with family members, will be instrumental in guiding future development of the algorithms.
The perspective of the customers (veterans and their family members) is valued as a tool to help sensitize the algorithm developers and users to the needs of the patients.
In summary, it is acknowledged that the science and conclusions of other guidelines, especially those of the American Diabetes Association, have largely been incorporated into VHA guidelines.
A summary of the VHA Diabetes Clinical Guidelines in relation to other existing national guidelines is provided in an attached table.
However, the VHA Diabetes Guidelines represent the first comprehensive guidelines for this disease by a federal agency or national health care system in which risk stratification is both explicit and evidence based.
The VHA clinical guidelines are appropriate as a foundation, along with the use of the Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group/Medical Advisory Panel Guidelines and Headquarters External Peer Review Program Performance Measures, for a Diabetes Chronic Disease State Management Program.
Disease State Management can be defined as the continuous process of identifying and delivering, within selected patient populations, the most efficient combination of resources for the treatment of or prevention of disease.
The rationale assumes that there are systematic ways health care delivery can be provided to a population that will be more efficient than the status quo.
However, while the guidelines are appropriate for population based medicine, it is not their intent to prevent practitioners from using their best judgment in the care of an individual patient, but rather to establish verifiable treatment objectives for veterans with diabetes that will lead to a reduction in limb loss, visual loss, chronic renal insufficiency, and cardiovascular disease.
12
References: 1.
AHCPR Clinical Practice Guideline, Number 5, Rockville, MD. US Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Service, Agency for Health Care Policy and Research.
AHCPR publication No. 93-0550, March, 1993 Optometry Service: Briefing to the Under Secretary for Health, 1995 Rubin RJ, Altman WM, Mendelson DN. Health Care Expenditures for People with Diabetes Mellitus, JCEM 78: 80-9AF, 1992 The VA 1996 External Peer Review Program, Contract No. V101(93) P:1369 Veterans Administration National Center for Cost Containment Publications Diabetes Costs and Health outcomes in the VHA in FY94 (November, 1996) VHA Directive 96-053, August 29, 1996.
Roles and Definitions for Clinical Practice Guidelines and Clinical Pathways.
Wolfson M, Mundt D, Hawley G. Human Erythropoietin Utilization in the Department of Veterans Affairs Am J Kidney Disease 24:84-191, 1994 Woolf, SH.
Practice guidelines, a new reality in medicine II.
Methods of developing guidelines.
Arch Int Med 1992 May;152: 947-48 Woolf, SH.
Practice guidelines, a new reality in medicine III.
Impact on patient care.
Arch Int Med 1993 Dec;153:2647
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
13
COMPARISON OF VHA DIABETES CLINICAL GUIDELINES TO EXISTING NATIONAL DIABETES GUIDELINES
SUBJECT Glycemic Control
EXISTING NATIONAL GUIDELINE American Diabetes Association (ADA): Recommended HbA1c target ranges, with upper limit of normal 6%: 
>
Action suggested except in cases of diminished life expectancy.
VHA GUIDELINE HbA1c target goals should be individualized and primarily based upon both life expectancy and presence or absence of microvascular complications.
7% ( 1% above high normal range) IF Life span 15 years or more in the absence of microvascular complications, OR 10 years of more in the presence of early to moderate microvascular disease.
8.0% (2% above high normal range) IF life span 5-15 years in the absence of microvascular disease, OR 5-10 years in the presence of microvascular disease.
9.0% ( above high normal range) IF life span less than 5 years, with or without macrovascular disease.
Frequency of SMBG should be individualized according to clinical circumstances and response to treatment.
Urine testing may be considered as an alternative if the goal is avoidance of sympotmatic hyperglycemia.
Explicitly recommends validation and documentation of user technique with prior to initial justification, and recommends assessment of whether individualized health outcome goals are met as part of ongoing interval justification.
No upper age limit but does not recommend screening if life expectancy 
Goal is LDL-C 
Consider LDL-C
Self Monitoring of Blood Glucose
ADA Consensus Statement: Frequency of SMBG should be individualized according to clinical circumstances and response to treatment.
Urine testing may be considered as an alternative if the only goal is avoidance of symptomatic hyperglycemia.
Cholesterol
National Cholesterol Education Program: Goal is LDL-C
and 
American College of Physicians: Screening for primary prevention is neither recommended nor discouraged between ages 65-75, and not recommended for individuals 
14
COMPARISON OF VHA DIABETES CLINICAL GUIDELINES TO EXISTING NATIONAL DIABETES GUIDELINES SUBJECT Proteinuria EXISTING NATIONAL GUIDELINE National Kidney Foundation: No screening after age 70; random urine specimen tested for albumin to creatinine ratio; scope of recommendations limited to screening for microalbumin; nephrology referral if albumin/creatinine ratio 
American Diabetes Association: No upper age limit for screening; timed urine collection; urine specimen for albumin to creatinine ratio; or 24-hour specimen.
Scope of recommendation includes proteinuria as well as microalbuminuria.
Consider nephrology referral when GFR begins to decline substantially or creatinine 
American Diabetes Association, American College of Physicians, American Academy of Family, Practitioners, American Optometric Association and American Academy of Ophthalmology: Annual eye screening for persons with type I (Onset 
Acknowledges necessity for more frequent follow-up for retinal pathology.
American Diabetes Association: Annual foot risk assessment, but without explicit stratification of risk factors.
VHA GUIDELINE No upper age limit but no screening for microalbuminuria if life expectancy 
Scope of recommendations deals with elevated creatinine, proteinuria and microalbuminuria.
Nephrology referral for creatinine 
Eye Screening
Initial eye exam after 3-5 years duration for type I diabetes (onset 
Annual eye screening if baseline or subsequent exam normal EXCEPT for persons with type II diabetes with HbAlc 
Individuals at "high risk" for visual loss are explicitly referred for case management by eye specialists.
Foot Screening
Hypertension
JNC-V: Systolic Diastolic Normal 
Annual foot risk assessment, with high risk foot defined as presence of vascular insufficiency (absent pedal pulses, claudication or prior bypass surgery); insensate foot defined as inability to detect Semmes-Weinstien 5.07 monofilament at any site; foot deformity defined as hammer toes, claw toes and charcotgs foot; and prior ulcer/amputation.
Hypertension defined as 
Acknowledges that other guidelines recommend that BP should be decreased to 
15
MODULE G: GLYCEMIC CONTROL
16
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS
1
Pe rs on w i th di ab etes
2
Is p a ti e n t m edi ca ll y st able? N 3
Y
Pro vi d e app ropr ia te treatm e nt an d s tab i li za ti o n
Evalua te and m a nage per app ropri a te a lg o ri th m (s) 4
Glyc e m ic Cont rol Me dicat ion Nut rit ion Hom e M oni toring Phys ic a l Act ivity
M o du le G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot evalua tion w i th i n pas t ye a r, r is k fa ct ors pre s en t, o r acti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
F oot Ca re: Mo du le F
7
N o eye evaluat io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pre s en t, or k no w n to be at high ri s k fo r vis u al l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
Mo dule E
9
N o uri n alysi s w ith in pas t ye ar, m i croa l b um in ur ia or m a cr oalbu m i n u ri a pre s en t; or el e va ted creat in i ne? N
10 Y
Renal Dise ase T re at me n t: Mo du le R
11
Bloo d pres s u re 
12 Y
Hypert en sion Management:
Module H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lipid Co ntro l:
Mo du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- up i n 1 ye ar
Fo ll ow- u p as in di ca te d to eval u at e /tre a t
17
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control 1
Pe rs on w i th d ia b e tes m el l it u s [A]
2
D o cu m ent Typ e I o r Typ e II [A]
3
Ge ne r a l m ed i ca l e va l u ati on [B]
4
Is p a ti en t m ed i ca ll y and p s ych o l og ica l ly s ta b l e? [C]
5
N
P ro vi d e a pp ro p r ia te tre a tm e n t and s t ab il izati on [D]
Y
6
C o m p le te d i a be tes e va lua ti o n , i nc lu d in g nu tr itio n al and e du ca ti o n a l a s s es s m e nt [E]
7
As s e s s g l yce m i c con tro l u s i n g H b A1 c (o r e qu iva l en t) , o r fa s ti n g g lu co s e a n d S MBG [F]
8
D e te rm in e re co m m e nd e d g lyce m i c t a rg e t u s in g ri s k s tr a ti fi ca ti o n c rite ri a [G]
9
D is cu s s a nd s e t ap p rop ri a te tar ge t wi th p a ti en t, co n s i d e ri n g m ed i ca l a n d p s ych o s o ci a l is s ues [ H]
C o nti nue o n Pag e 2
18
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control
Page 2
Continued from Page 1
10
Is patient's glycemic lab value above the target range? [I]
11
Y
Initiate or re-evaluate existing management plan
Continue on Page 3
N 12 13
Does patient have side effects from treatment? [J]
Y
Do benefits of achieving target glycemic range justify risk of side-effects? [K]
Y
N N 14
Re-evaluate.
Go back to Box 11 15
Continue current treatment Go to Box 10 at next regular visit
19
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control
Page 3
Continued from Page 2
16
High-risk characteristics are present? [L] N
Y
17
Is FBS 
18
Y
Develop medication plan.
Use Module GM
19
Develop home monitoring plan Use Module GH Develop physical activity plan Use Module GP Develop nutritional plan Use Module GN
20
21
22
Is glycemic control target value achieved? N
23
Y
Continue current therapy Go to Box 10 at next regular visit
24
Is HbA1 c lab value 
Y
25
Re-evaluate.
Go back to Box 11
Consider referral to diabetes team for comprehensive evaluation and/or management
20
Module G: Glycemic Control
ANNOTATIONS
21
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control Annotations MODULE G A. Patient Has Diabetes Mellitus TABLE OF EVIDENCE # 1 Factor Blood Glucose Levels Reference Report of the Expert Committee on the Diagnosis 
1.
Biochemical Criteria for the Diagnosis of Diabetes The criteria are derived from the Report of the Expert Committee on the Diagnosis and Classification of Diabetes Mellitus published June 1997.
Oral glucose tolerance testing is not currently recommended for diagnosis in the general medical population.
Variations in the accuracy and precision of glycosylated hemoglobin (HbA1c) testing and capillary glucose monitoring measures (see Module G, Annotation F) preclude their use for diagnostic purposes.
Patients with a random blood glucose level of 
DIAGNOSIS OF DIABETES TEST STAGE Diabetes Fasting Plasma Glucose (FPG) (Preferred) * FPG 
Impaired Glucose Homeostasis Normal
*The FPG is the preferred test for diagnosis, but any one of the three listed is acceptable.
In the absence of unequivocal hyperglycemia with acute metabolic decompensation, one of these three tests should be used on a different day to confirm diagnosis.
**Fasting is defined as no caloric intake for at least 8 hours.
***Casual = any time of day without regard to time since last meal; symptoms are the classic ones of polyuria, polydipsia, and unexplained weight loss.
****OGTT should be performed using a glucose load containing the equivalent of 75g anhydrous glucose dissolved in water.
The OGTT is not recommended for routine clinical use.
22
Go Back
2.
Clinical Classification of Type I or Type II Patients with Type I diabetes are insulin requiring, and therefore will develop ketoacidosis if not treated with insulin, or if insulin requirements increase during stress.
On the other hand, persons with Type II diabetes may need to be treated with insulin to improve glycemic control, but will usually not develop ketoacidosis if they do not receive insulin.
Persons with diabetes treated with medical nutritional therapy (MNT), physical activity, and/or oral hypoglycemic or antiglycemic agents are classified as having Type II diabetes.
In practice, the proper diagnosis is important for several reasons.
First, persons with Type II diabetes treated with insulin may be able to achieve comparable levels of glycemic control with hypoglycemic or antiglycemic agents, especially if they were placed on insulin because of an intercurrent illness, injury, or surgery and not subsequently reevaluated.
Secondly, persons with Type I diabetes are generally more prone to develop hypoglycemia or ketosis, especially during times of stress.
For coding purposes, patients with Type I diabetes are coded as 250.01 or 250.03 (uncontrolled), while patients with Type II diabetes are coded as 250.00.
or 250.02 (uncontrolled).
Often the classification of diabetes was made at the time of diagnosis and never reevaluated.
However, since persons with Type II diabetes can also present with a degree of ketosis, providers should be encouraged to review the classification of the diabetes in their patients.
In a primary care setting, determination of the patient's age at the diagnosis of diabetes, the body mass index, and urine ketones, is usually sufficient to classify the patient.
CLINICAL CLASSIFICATION Classification Age BMI Urine ketones Likely Type I 
B.
General Medical Evaluation In the veteran population, diabetes may not be a patient's only disease, nor is it necessarily the disorder which needs to be prioritized for immediate treatment.
It should also be noted that overt hyperglycemia is commonly precipitated by physical and psychological stress, and that secondary forms of diabetes, while rare, should be excluded.
Is Patient Medically and Psychologically Stable? Urgent or semi-urgent medical conditions must be treated before chronic disease management principles are applied.
"Stable" is the judgment of the individual provider.
It should be noted that patients with diabetes who have more immediate medical or psychiatric problems should still have an educational needs assessment done to determine whether they have sufficient skills to 23
C.
manage their glycemic control during a period of intercurrent illness, with a goal of avoiding symptomatic hypo- or hyperglycemia.
D. Provide Treatment and Stabilization Any numerical metabolic criteria for admission for persons with significant hypo- or hyperglycemia are arbitrary.
INTERQUAL criteria are widely used in the Veterans Health Administration.
However, it should be noted that the criteria are not risk stratified for co-morbid conditions, socioeconomic circumstances, or psychological status.
Furthermore, factors such as proximity to the provider or the availability of telephone monitoring are not included in the criteria.
Therefore, the decision for hospitalization versus outpatient treatment must be consistent with the provider's best judgment.
Complete Diabetes Evaluation, Including Nutritional and Educational Assessment 1.
History (Emphasize the following in patients with diabetes) a.
Hyperglycemia Onset of hyperglycemic symptoms Date of diagnosis of diabetes Manner of presentation Asymptomatic/routine blood test Polyuria/polydipsia Ketoacidosis Hyperosmolar syndrome Treatment history Initial Pharmacologic (oral agent vs insulin, dosage, frequency and duration of therapy) Nutrition therapy Physical activity Current/Align Nutritional/physical activity; pharmacologic (dosage, frequency, timing to meals and activity) Recurrent symptoms of hyperglycemia (polyuria, polydypsia, blurred vision) Hypoglycemia Frequency, time of day, relation to meals or exercise Severity (coma, seizure, mode of therapy) Symptoms Nutrition Weight history* Current meal plan Lifestyle Exercise/activity* ETOH*
E.
b.
c.
d.
*
indicates External Peer Review Program Chronic Disease Process Measure
24
e.
f.
Smoking* Substance use Occupation Glucose monitoring* Urine/blood Frequency Assessment of competency Monitor is used How are results reported? To whom? Actions taken as a result of readings Complications: specific history Infections (recent vs. past history) GU Skin Sinus/middle ear Foot (see nerve, peripheral vascular disease) osteomyelitis cellulitis Dental Immunizations (influenza and pneumococcal)* Eye (current status vs. past history) Cataract Glaucoma Photocoagulation Change in vision Date of last (dilated) eye exam by specialist Foot Pain/paresthesia Ulcer Joint Amputation Kidney Blood pressure Proteinuria (micro or macro) History of elevated creatinine Peripheral vascular Claudication Poor healing Amputation Coronary heart disease Smoking Family history Hypertension Cholesterol (total, HDL and/or LDL) Triglycerides Angina MI 25
*
indicates External Peer Review Program Chronic Disease Process Measure
Arrhythmia CHF Cerebral vascular disease TIA CVA 2.
Physical Examination (Emphasize the following in patients with Diabetes) a.
Consider secondary etiologies (Cushing's, acromegaly, hemochromatoses, medications) Weight, height, body mass index* (BMI is calculated by dividing the patient's weight in kg by the patient's height, in meters, squared.
Metric conversions are pounds divided by 2.2=kg; inches x 0.0254=meters*) Dilated eye exam (annual or as indicated) See Module E Oral exam (dental and gingival health) Cardiovascular system: heart, peripheral circulation including pulses and bruits Skin: infections, xanthoma, insulin injection sites Peripheral vascular: claudication, poor healing, and amputation Coronary heart disease risk factors: smoking, family history, hypertension, cholesterol (total, HDL and/or LDL), triglycerides, angina, MI, arrhythmia, and CHF Cerebral vascular disease: TIA and/or CVA Feet: visual* (including nails, web spaces, ulcers, calluses, deformities), palpation of pulses* and sensation* (consider use of a 5.07 monofilament; Call Project LEAP, Carville LA 504-642-4714 for information on vendors) Neurological system: sensory state of hands and feet, interosseous muscle wasting, DTRs
b.
c. d. e.
f. g. h.
i. j.
k.
F.
Assess Glycemic Control Using HbA1c* (or Equivalent) or Fasting Glucose and SMBG Although blood glucose, fructosamine, and glycosylated hemoglobin levels can be used together to assess immediate, short term and long term glycemic control, glycosylated hemoglobin performed or reported as hemoglobin HbA1c is the only laboratory test validated in controlled randomized clinical trials as a predictor of risk for *
indicates External Peer Review Program Chronic Disease Process Measure
26
microvascular complications.
If mean blood glucose levels are accurately determined and known, then they can be used to estimate hemoglobin HbA1c levels.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE FACTOR: USE OF HbA1c LEVELS AS A RISK FACTOR FOR DEVELOPMENT OF MICROVASCULAR DISEASE Strength of Recommendation I I I Level of Evidence A A A
# 1
Factor Validation of HbA1c testing
Reference DCCT Research Group 1993 Ohkubo et al. (1994) DCCT Research Group 1995; 1996
The assessment of glycemic control in an individual requires an understanding of the methods used to assess long term blood sugar control (glycosylated hemoglobins); short term glycemic control (fructosamine); and single point measurement of blood sugar (venous samples and capillary glucose measurements).
The key points to remember are that you must determine the method and accuracy of the glycosylated hemoglobin test performed in the laboratory at your facility, how the results are reported, and what the high normal cutoff value is.
You should be able to obtain this information from the Chief of Laboratory Service or a diabetologist.
Since there is inherent error in the test, you should realize that the reported value has a range of error associated with it.
Ideally, your laboratory should participate in a standardization program for glycosylated hemoglobin testing that results in accuracy within 5% as recommended by the American Diabetes Association (ADA), The National Institutes of Health, and the American Association of Clinical Chemists.
In addition, either a HbA1c test should be performed or the results of the glycosylated hemoglobin assay should be reported as HbA1c equivalents.
Finally, while venous blood sugars are accurate and standardized throughout the VHA, "capillary measurements" can vary widely.
Detailed explanations follow.
GLYCOSYLATED HEMOGLOBIN 1.
The terms "glycated" and "glycosylated" hemoglobin are used interchangeably in the literature.
The terms are used to describe the reaction product between sugar and a protein.
Glycosylated hemoglobins (GHb) are most useful for monitoring diabetic patients.
There are four HbA1 components: HbA1a1, HbA1a2, HbA1b, HbA1c.
2.
3.
27
4.
The Scientific Research Group of the Diabetes Control and Complication Trial (DCCT) and the ADA recommend HbA1c as the marker of choice for the assessment of risk for the development of microvascular complications, as well as for monitoring glycemic control.
Risk assessment of secondary complications stratified to level of glycemic control will be based on the HbA1c database of the DCCT, which was standardized for accuracy by a "gold standard" or peer consensus reference method.
Facilities that measure total GHb should be able to provide accurate HbA1c equivalency values.
However, there is no analytic system that measures HbA1 and can report HbA1c equivalency values.
Some methods are more susceptible to hemoglobinopathy (i.e., Hb S, C, D, G, F, and labile intermediate products) interference that can cause biases in the test results.
In order to obtain accurate HbA1c values it is important to assay specimens with known hemoglobinopathies on analytic systems that are insensitive to hemoglobin variants as interfering substances.
Presently, only one analyzer (HPLC method using borate-affinity column chromatography) can be used reliably for this purpose.
If a patient has a hemoglobinopathy, consult with the Laboratory Chief to determine whether or not the glycosylated hemoglobin test performed at your institution is valid for that particular patient.
HbA1c measurements may also be unreliable in the presence of the following conditions: hemolytic anemia, uremia, or pregnancy.
Serum fructosamine measurement may be considered as an alternative test in these circumstances.
5.
6.
7.
8.
SERUM FRUCTOSAMINE MEASUREMENT 1.
Fructosamine is a glycosylated protein that may be a potential marker for assessment for glycemic control for the 10-20 days prior to measurement.
Newer assays appear to be highly specific for fructosamine and free from interference by urates and triglycerides.
The assay has a limitation, i.e., that gross changes in protein concentration and half-life may have large effects on the proportion of protein that is glycosylated.
Thus, results obtained may be invalid in the presence of cirrhosis of the liver, nephrotic syndrome, dysproteinemias, or rapid changes in acute-phase reactants.
2.
GLUCOSE MEASUREMENTS Practical uses of glucose measurements: 1.
Self-Monitoring of Blood Glucose (SMBG) or point of care glucose measurements should not be substituted for the laboratory glucose measurement for the diagnosis of diabetes mellitus.
28
2.
HbA1c or its equivalent is the only validated indicator for assessment of risk for microvascular complications.
The most common user error associated with SMBG i Depending upon the meter used, this error can lead to between the actual and recorded blood glucose. maintenance procedures should be reviewed annually or s inadequate sample size.
a significant discrepancy A user's technique and as indicated.
3.
4.
The accuracy and precision of the glucose meter should be determined (see Blood Glucose Monitoring Devices Resource Guide, from the VA National Center for Laboratory Accuracy and Standardization, published February 1997).
Assuming that the mean SMBG or point of care or laboratory glucose measurements are accurate, multiple readings at various time points can be averaged to obtain approximate HbA1c levels by using the equation from the DCCT database:
5.
6.
MEAN BLOOD GLUCOSE 120 mg/dL Glucose = 150 mg/dL Glucose = 180 mg/dL Glucose = Every 30 mg/dL increase = G. ESTIMATED HbA1c HbA1c HbA1c HbA1c increase
6% 7% 8% 1%
Determine Recommended Glycemic Target Using Risk Stratification Criteria The upper limit of normal HbA1c is approximately 6% in the absence of diabetes.
For persons with diabetes mellitus, it is recommended that the current American Diabetes Association recommendation that the ideal HbA1c goal is 7%, with therapeutic action suggested at values 
Using this approach, target levels would range between 7% and 9%.
7.0% ( 1% above high normal range): Life expectancy of 15 years or more in the absence of diabetic complications, or 10 years or more in the presence of early to moderate microvascular disease.
8.0% ( 2% above high normal range): Life expectancy of 5-15 years in the absence of microvascular disease, or 5-10 years in the presence of microvascular disease.
9.0% ( 3% above high normal range): Life expectancy of less than 5 years, with or without microvascular disease.
29
TABLE OF EVIDENCE INTERVENTION: LEVEL OF GLYCEMIC CONTROL DEVELOPMENT AND PROGRESSION OF RETINOPATHY Strength of Recommendation I I I I I I Level of Evidence A A A A A B
# 1
Variable progression to non-proliferative retinopathy
2
3
progression to proliferative retinopathy progression to blindness
Reference DCCT Research Group 1993 Ohkubo et al. (1995) DCCT Research Group 1995 DCCT Research Group 1993 Ohkabo et al. (1995) Klein R et al. (1994)
TABLE OF EVIDENCE DEVELOPMENT AND PROGRESSION OF NEPHROPATHY Strength of Recommendation I I I I I I I I I I Level of Evidence A A A B A A A C C C
# 1
Variable progression to microalbuminuria
2 3
progression to proteinuria progression to end stage renal disease
Reference DCCT Research Group Ohkubo et al. (1995) DCCT Research Group Krolewski 1995 Kawazu et al. (1994) DCCT Research Group Ohkubo et al. (1995) DCCT Research Group Ohkubo et al. (1995) Klein R et al. (1995)
1993 1995
1993 1993
TABLE OF EVIDENCE DEVELOPMENT AND PROGRESSION OF NEUROPATHY/AMPUTATIONS Strength of Recommendation I I I I Level of Evidence A A B B
# 1
Variable progression to neuropathy progression to amputations
2
Reference DCCT Research Group 1993 DCCT 1995 Klein et al. (1995) Mayfield et al. (1996)
30
TABLE OF EVIDENCE PREVENTION OF CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE Strength of Recommendation IIb IIb IIb IIb IIb IIb Level of Evidence A A B B A B
# 1
Variable myocardial infarction, stroke
Reference DCCT Research Group 1993 Ohkubo et al. (1995) Anderson et al. (1995) Singer et al. (1992) Abraira et al. (1997) Klein et al. (1995)
TABLE OF EVIDENCE FACTOR: LIFE EXPECTANCY Strength of Recommendation I I I I I I I I Level of Evidence B B B B B B B A
# 1
Risk Factor Effect of diabetes on life expectancy
2
duration of diabetes and incidence of end stage microvascular complications
Reference Panzram et al. (1981) Marks 1975 Goodkin 1975 Singer 1992 Klein R et al. (1995) Klein R et al. (1994) Palmberg P et al. (1981) United Kingdom prospective diabetes study (UKPDS) 1995 Humphrey et al. (1989)
I
B
TABLE OF EVIDENCE FACTOR: ETHNICITY Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa Level of Evidence B B B B B B B B B B
# 1
Factor Effect of ethnicity on glycemic target levels
Reference Haffner et al. (1988) Hamman et al. (1989) Lee et al. (1992) Nelson et al. (1988) Rabb et al. (1990) Cruickshanks et al. (1987) Arfken et al. (1994) Cowie et al. (1989) Burden 1992 Stephens et al. (1990)
31
TABLE OF EVIDENCE FACTOR: PRE-EXISTING MICROVASCULAR DISEASE Strength of Recommendation I I I Level of Evidence A A A
# 1
Variable pre-existing retinopathy or microalbuminuria as a risk factor for progression
Reference DCCT Research Group 1993 Ohkubo et al. (1994) DCCT Research Group 1995
RISK STRATIFICATION OF GLYCEMIC TARGET RANGES 1.
Estimate the life expectancy of the person you are treating.
Statistics for the life expectancy of a population can be derived from the observed mortality rates of that population.
An example commonly used in medicine would be the life expectancy of persons with a particular type and stage of cancer.
The population would have an average survival, with a wider range of survival into which almost all individuals would fall.
While it would be impossible to tell an individual person exactly how long he or she would live, it would be possible to provide that person with some estimate of his or her life expectancy.
Based upon life expectancy and mortality rates due to the disease, the provider and patient would discuss treatment options.
Prostate cancer would be a specific example of how this concept could be used.
Longitudinal studies of the life expectancy of persons with diabetes have been done and indicate that persons with diabetes have a shortened life span relative to persons without diabetes.
However, the format of the data from such studies is not easily utilized.
To provide the clinician with a means of estimating life expectancy for populations of men and women with Type II diabetes, tables (See Exhibits G1 and G2) have been generated based upon a computer model (courtesy Richard Eastman, MD, NIDDK; Eastman et al.
Diabetes Care, 1997), that incorporates data from the Framingham Study.
Except for end stage renal disease, the model assumes that microvascular complications do not affect survival, although they do predict progression to blindness, amputation, and dialysis.
Co-existing conditions (such as CHF, AIDS, COPD, cirrhosis, cancer, etc.) have a significant effect on survival, but are not explicitly noted in the tables.
However, for any given age at the time of diagnosis of diabetes, the years of life remaining after diagnosis are provided in the 25th, 50th, 75th, and 95th percentiles.
It can be assumed that populations of persons with diabetes and other health conditions would have a survival rate less than the mean life expectancy (use 25th percentile), and that persons without co-morbid conditions and with a favorable family history would have a survival rate greater than the mean life expectancy (use 75th or 95th percentile).
32
Furthermore, aggressive treatment of cardiovascular risk factors (see Lipid and Hypertension modules), including smoking cessation, may increase life expectancy.
In addition, adherence to general preventive practices (for example immunizations, screening for colon, prostate, and breast cancers) is also predicted to increase life expectancy in the American population.
Thus, for an individual with diabetes, an estimate of life expectancy for a given percentile can be obtained by determining the person's age at the time of diagnosis of diabetes and determining the average (mean) years of life remaining by subtracting the time (in years) that has elapsed from the time of diagnosis.
Providers must then use their best judgment to raise or lower it based upon coexisting medical conditions and family history.
While a person's age is clearly the predominant factor in estimating life expectancy, this approach ensures that the life expectancy estimate used in determining target glycemic ranges for an individual is also based upon the person's individual health state and the best judgment of the clinician.
2.
Determine the presence or absence of early to moderate retinopathy and diabetic nephropathy (see Renal and Eye Modules).
The presence of microvascular complications (e.g., retinopathy, microalbuminuria, neuropathy) increases the probability that end stage microvascular complications (e.g., visual loss, renal failure, and amputation) will occur as compared to the probability for an individual without microvascular complications but with a similar life expectancy.
3.
Consider genetic factors.
The risk stratification approach can be extended by the practitioner to include family history of microvascular complications.
Results from the DCCT and other studies indicate that a familial history of diabetic nephropathy or retinopathy does predispose a sibling or a child towards developing microvascular complications.
However, the evidence does not support different treatment goals for individuals of varying ethnicity's.
While the prevalence of diabetes and its complications is higher in ethnic populations, the increase in microvascular complications cannot be attributed to an increased sensitivity to the effects of hyperglycemia.
4.
Determine an initial target value of glycosylated hemoglobin based upon consideration of the patient's life expectancy, presence of microvascular complications, and genetic factors.
Based upon the DCCT results, using an HbA1c value obtained by HPLC with an intra-assay variation of 0.1% and a high normal value of 6.05%, the following target levels are recommended as starting points for negotiation with the patient.
33
7.0% (1% above high normal range): Life expectancy of 15 years or more in the absence of diabetic complications or 10 years or more in the presence of early to moderate microvascular disease.
8.0% (2% above high normal range): Life expectancy between 5 and 15 years in the absence of microvascular disease, or between 5 and 10 years in the presence of microvascular disease.
9.0% (3% above high normal range): Life expectancy of less than 5 years, with or without microvascular disease.
NOTE: Risk stratification should be based upon glycosylated hemoglobin results performed or reported as HbA1c values.
Depending upon the glycosylated hemoglobin assay used at your facility, the absolute value of the target range may differ from the DCCT recommendations, although the percent (%) above high normal value will not.
5.
Negotiate the target range with the patient, taking into account risks and benefits of the proposed therapeutic intervention (see Annotation H).
Providers must recognize that a target range of glycosylated hemoglobin, based upon life expectancy, microvascular complications, and familial history, is a starting point for negotiation with the patient.
It does not mean that a lower HbA1c level will not be beneficial, nor does it mean that the provider and patient should not negotiate a lower one.
Rather, it implies that there is a decreasing benefit from achieving improved glycemic control, which should be taken into account when evaluating the risks and benefits of pharmacologic therapy as well as patient preferences.
Also, it should be recognized that reduction in risk from decreasing HbA1c is a continuum, so a negotiated "target level" does not have to be exactly 7.0, 8.0, or 9.0.
A detailed explanation of the terms absolute risk reduction and relative risk reduction follows.
RELATIVE AND ABSOLUTE RISK REDUCTION Based on the Wisconsin Epidemiologic Study of Diabetic Retinopathy (WESDR) and DCCT findings, the major determinants of the effectiveness of glycemic control in preventing the development or progression of clinically significant (e.g., visual loss, renal insufficiency, and amputation) complications are: (1) the patient's life expectancy and, (2) the presence of earlier microvascular disease, especially retinopathy, persistent microalbuminuria or macroproteinuria (See Eye Module) when other conditions have been excluded (see Renal Module) and peripheral neuropathy (see Routine Care Foot Module).
The Ohkubo Study was a controlled randomized trial that demonstrated that intensive insulin therapy in Japanese individuals with Type II diabetes who were 34
not overweight had similar results to the DCCT with respect to reduction in the onset and progression of retinopathy and microalbuminuria.
Analysis of the risk reduction in microvascular complications from the DCCT supports the conclusion that the relative risk reduction of intermediate microvascular complications of diabetes (i.e., development of background retinopathy and microalbuminuria) can be reduced by about 40% for each 1% decrease in HbA1c in persons with Type I diabetes.
Although controlled, randomized trials of glycemic control in Type II individuals who are overweight or from other ethnic groups are not available, longitudinal population studies (WESDR) demonstrate that the exponential rise in the risk of retinopathy in persons with Type II diabetes follows a similar gradient as for persons with Type I diabetes.
Consequently, the evidence is consistent with the conclusion that the development of microvascular disease is similarly related to glycemic control in persons with either Type I or Type II diabetes.
However, it should be noted that the conclusions of the DCCT and Ohkubo studies were based on intermediate microvascular complications.
Progression to proliferative retinopathy was uncommon, and no patients progressed to renal insufficiency.
Therefore, it should be recognized that maximal benefits of glycemic control in preventing the progression of microvascular disease to the endpoints of visual loss or chronic renal insufficiency accrue over a period of time longer than that of the study period of the aforementioned trials.
Thus, the probability that an individual with diabetes will develop these complications is based upon his or her life expectancy.
However, the mean age at onset of Type II diabetes (
Consequently, life expectancy from the time of diagnosis is lower in persons with Type II diabetes as a result of death from cardiovascular conditions as well as all other causes (co-morbidity).
There are no interventional trials that conclusively demonstrate that improved glycemic control will alter cardiovascular morbidity and/or mortality.
The DCCT and the Ohkubo trials show a nonsignificant trend towards reduced cardiovascular events with intensive insulin therapy, while the VA Cooperative trial demonstrates a nonsignificant increase in cardiovascular events and an association between decreased HbA1c and new cardiovascular events.
Observational studies demonstrate an association between increased HbA1c and cardiovascular disease and cardiovascular mortality risk that achieves statistical significance only for women.
For populations of persons with diabetes, it is possible to estimate the decrease in microvascular complications that would result from improved glycemic control.
Absolute risk reduction is defined as the decrease in visual loss (blindness), end stage renal disease, or amputation that occurs with a given decrease in percent HbA1c.
Since the previously noted clinical studies are limited in duration, computer models of Type I and Type II diabetes have been developed that can 35
provide estimates of the incidence of microvascular complications and life expectancy.
These models provide population estimates of risk, and can be useful in providing both providers and persons with diabetes with an estimate of risk over time as well as an estimate of benefit from improved glycemic control.
In conclusion, the absolute risk reduction in endstage microvascular disease over an individual's lifetime is the major determinant of the target range of glycemic control for an individual, and will influence the risk/benefit analysis of therapeutic options.
H. Discuss and Set An Appropriate Target with the Patient, Considering Medical and Psychosocial Issues It is evident that the risks of therapy are different for each individual, dependent upon his or her medical, social, and psychological status.
Thus, the risks of a proposed therapy must be balanced against the potential benefits.
Factors for the provider and person with diabetes to consider in jointly making this decision should include the following: · · ·
Appropriate medical support and psychosocial environment History of severe, recurrent hypoglycemia The possible consequence of adverse effects associated with hypoglycemia (consider cardiovasular disease, anticoagulation, use of dangerous equipment, etc.)
Alcohol or substance abuse The presence of multiple end-stage microvascular complications, including macular edema, proliferative retinopathy and macroproteinuria, especially with elevated serum creatinine.
Pregnancy, or the intention to become pregnant Symptomatic cardiovascular disease Willingness and ability to self-monitor and to make appropriate lifestyle change Quality of life Specific risks of individual therapeutic options
· ·
· · ·
· ·
I.
Is Glycemic Control, by Lab Value, Above the Target Range? Since there is no evidence to suggest that the frequency of obtaining glycosylated hemoglobin levels is correlated with improvement in that level in Type II diabetes, practitioners must use their own judgment in deciding upon frequency in an individual patient.
Factors to be considered include whether glycemic control is stable; whether the target goal has been achieved; and whether therapy has been changed.
An assessment of long term, short 36
term, and current glycemic control can be made by integrating information obtained from glycosylated hemoglobin levels, fructosamine values, and serum/capillary glucose measurements (see annotation F).
J. Does the Patient Have Side Effects from Treatment? Side effects can include hypoglycemia and specific complications from oral agents.
Patients with hypoglycemia should be evaluated for precipitating factors that may be easily correctable (missed meals, incorrect administration of insulin [dosage or timing], exercise, etc).
In many cases a simple adjustment can be made in nutrition, exercise, medication and/or patient self monitoring (see Nutrition, Physical Activity, Medication, and Home Monitoring subalgorithms).
In persons with near normal glycemic control (most specifically persons with Type I diabetes on intensive insulin treatment; or in persons with autonomic neuropathy), it may be necessary to relax the degree of glycemic control, at least temporarily.
Complex adjustments may best be accomplished through co-management with a Diabetes Team.
Do the Benefits of Achieving Target Glycemic Range Justify the Risk of Side Effects? With the exception of pregnancy, where glycemic control affects the health of the baby and the mother, the benefits and risks of therapy are related to reduction in absolute risk of end stage complications for the individual.
In that context, the occurrence of severe hypoglycemic reactions in a young person with Type I diabetes on an intensive insulin regimen has a different context than in an older individual with known coronary artery disease.
Decisions on risk/benefit are always individual.
It must also be recognized that steps can be taken to reduce the incidence of side effects of therapy (especially hypoglycemia; see Annotation J).
Are High Risk Characteristics Present? Patient is pregnant or is planning pregnancy; is on an intensive insulin regimen; has recurrent or severe hypoglycemia, has hypoglycemic unawareness; or has had recent hospitalizations for DKA or severe hyperglycemia.
K.
L.
37
MODULE GM: GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Medication
38
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Medication
1
Patient with diabetes who has not achieved target glycemic goal [refer to Module G, Box 9] or Patient with symptoms of hyperglycemia and FBS 
2
Does patient have Type I diabetes? [A] N
Y
3
Does patient have weight loss or ketosis? N
4 Y
Institute/adjust insulin treatment [B] Go to Module G, Box 22 at next regular visit
5
FBS 
Y
N 6
Patient has symptoms of hyperglycemia? N
Y
Continue on Page 2
7
Go to: Nutrition Module GN and Physical Activity Module GP
39
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Medication
Page 2
Continued from Page 1
8
Institute sulfonylurea therapy or increase dosage if already started [C]
9
Target value of FBS or HbA1 c achieved?
Y
N Consider insulin therapy in conjuction with oral sulfonylurea.
[D] Consider metformin as a 2nd line agent in conjuction with an oral sulfonylurea.
[E] Acarbose has limited use.
[F]
11
12
10
Target value of FBS or HbA1 c achieved? N 13
Y
Continue current treatment Go to Module G, Box 10 at next regular visit
Institute or increase insulin treatment [B] Go to Module G, Box 22 at next regular visit
40
Module GM Glycemic Control: Medication
ANNOTATIONS
41
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Medication Initiation Or Adjustment Annotation MODULE GM A. Does Patient Have Type I Diabetes?In a primary care setting determination of the patient's age at the diagnosis of diabeties, the body mass index, and urine ketones is usually sufficient to classify the patient.
CLINICAL CLASSIFICATION Classification Age BMI urine ketones Likely Type I 
B.
Institute/Adjust Insulin TreatmentTypes, frequency and dosages of insulin must be individualized.
Factors to be considered are: Type I or Type II diabetes; age; weight; comorbid conditions; presence of autonomic neuropathy; concomitant medications (specifically beta blockers); patient ability to perform self glucose monitoring and inject insulin accurately; risks and benefits of hypoglycemia, including psycho-social factors; and magnitude and pattern of hyperglycemia.
Type I Diabetes Insulin dosages vary widely among patients, even when other factors are similar.
For persons with new onset Type I diabetes, it is recommended that initial therapy be individualized in consultation with a Diabetes Team.
The dosages could then be increased by 2-6 units depending on body weight and glucose levels at the appropriate times.
Persons with Type I diabetes are, in general, more sensitive to changes in insulin dosage and far more susceptible to episodes of hypoglycemia than individuals with Type II diabetes.
In persons with Type I diabetes treated on intensive insulin regimens the risk of severe hypoglycemic reactions was increased by 300% in the context of a resource intensive controlled randomized trial (DCCT).
Such individuals should be managed in collaboration with a Diabetes Team.
For all patients, adjustments are best made in conjunction with SMBG (refer to Module GH) in the patient's normal environment.
Type II Diabetes Many patients with Type II diabetes can achieve target glycemic levels with bedtime insulin, a single injection of insulin, or split mixed insulin.
Some individuals with Type II diabetes, as well as individuals with Type I diabetes, will need intensive insulin treatment to achieve near normal glycemic target goals.
For these individuals regimens may include a short acting insulin before meals with Ultralente before breakfast and/or bedtime; intermediate and short acting insulin before breakfast, with short acting insulin 42
before dinner and an intermediate bedtime insulin.
For individuals with Type II diabetes, an American Diabetes Association publication notes that a safe way to begin insulin is to start with an arbitrary dose and increase it gradually until the desired level of control is achieved.
For lean persons (
Again, individual risks and benefits must be addressed.
In persons with Type II diabetes the VA Cooperative Study demonstrated that HbA1c results similar to the DCCT trial can be obtained in the veteran population, with no increase in weight and with minimal episodes of severe hypoglycemia.
However, this again was in the context of a resource intensive controlled trial with a subspecialty team, and it is recommended that such individuals also be comanaged in collaboration with a Diabetes Team.
COMPARISON OF INSULIN PREPARATIONSa-c *The following tables are from the VA, Medical Advisory Panel (MAP) Pharmacologic Management of Non-Insulin Dependent Diabetes Mellitus (NIDDM) ONSET (HRS) 0.5-1 1-2 1-3 6 10-15 minutes PEAK (HRS) 2-4 6-14 6-14 18-24 30-90 minutes DURATION (HRS) 5-7 24+ 24+ 36+ 4
INSULINa Regular NPH Lente Ultralente Lispro a
APPEARANCE clear cloudy cloudy cloudy clear
Adapted from Koda-Kimble MA. Diabetes Mellitus.
In: Koda-Kimble MA, Young LY eds.
Applied Therapeutics: The Clinical Use of Drugs.
5th ed. Vancouver: Applied Therapeutics Inc., 1992:72-10.
b Package insert.
Humalog (insulin lispro).
Indianapolis, IN: Eli Lilly and Company, 1996.
c Onset, peak, and duration are parameters for non-human insulin preparations; in general, human preparations have shorter times of duration
INSULIN REGIMEN EXAMPLESa-c *From VA Medical Advisory Panel Once-Daily Morning NPH Insulin Split Mixed Regimen with NPH/Regular Appropriate for elderly or non-compliant patients Inject 30-60 minutes before breakfast Usual dosage 
Bedtime Dosing of NPH or Lente Insulin in Addition to an Oral Agent a.
Adapted from Edelman SV, White d, Henry RR. Intensive insulin therapy for patients with Type II diabetes.
Current opinion in endocrinology and diabetes 1995;2:333-340.
b These are a few examples, optimal regimen depends on the individual patient c Always counsel patients to mix regular insulin in syringe first, followed by NPH. Lente insulin should not be mixed with Regular insulin
43
General Guidelines for Insulin Adjustment in the NIDDM Patient · · · · ·
If the morning FBS is off target, adjust the evening NPH or switch evening NPH to bedtime If the evening BS is off target, adjust the morning NPH If the evening glucose continues to be off target, have the patient check the pre-lunch glucose If the pre-lunch glucose is off target, adjust the morning Regular insulin If the bedtime glucose is off target, adjust the evening Regular insulin
Selected Costs for NIDDM Drug Therapy (as of November 1996) *From VA Medical Advisory Panel For current prices, check the Drug Product Management bulletin board at (708) 531-7947 FEDERAL SUPPLY SCHEDULE (FSS) COST/MONTH
DRUG Oral Sulfonylureas 1st generation Chlorpropamide Tolazamide Tolbutamide 2nd generation Glimeripide Glipizideb Glyburideb
USUAL DOSEa
250 mg qd 250 mg bid 500 mg bid
$ 0.60 $ 2.82 $ 0.90
4 mg qd 10 mg bid 5 mg bid
$ 25.80 $ 1.77 $ 4.02
DRUG Insulin Lente Human - U100/10mL Lispro Human - U100/10mL NPH Human - U100/10mL Regular Human - U100/10mL Ultralente Human - U100/10mL 70/30 Human - NPH/Regular 10mLl Metformin Acarbose a b
USUAL DOSEa individualized individualized individualized individualized individualized individualized 850 mg bid 50 mg tid $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $
FEDERAL SUPPLY SCHEDULE (FSS) COST/MONTH 5.10 / 15.58 5.10 / 5.10 / 5.33 / 5.10 / 29.18 25.60 vial / vial vial vial vial vial
Usual dose; does not reflect equivalent doses National contract
44
C.
Institute Sulfonylurea Therapy or Increase Dosage if Already Started 1.
1
Initiation or adjust oral agents No difference in long term efficacy or failure rate has been demonstrated among the different sulfonylureas.
The average maximum decrease in HbA1c for these agents is 2%.
Approximately 15% of patients may never achieve adequate glucose control (primary failure) and 5-10% per annum lose control of blood glucose (secondary failure).
Pharmacologic differences in sulfonylureas may have important clinical implications, particularly with regard to iatrogenic hypoglycemia.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE INTERVENTION: POTENCY OF ANTIGLYCEMIC AGENTS COMPARED TO SULFONYLUREA THERAPY
Intervention Metformin
Reference United Kingdom Prospective Diabetes Study Group.
United Kingdom prospective diabetes study (UKPDS) 12, 1995 Coniff 1995
Strength of Recommendation I
Level of Evidence A
Acarbose
I
A
2.
On sulfonylurea therapy, institute sulfonylurea therapy, increase dosage.
*From VA Medical Advisory Panel
First-line agent Alternate first-line agent
A second generation oral sulfonylurea is the first-line agent, based on safety.
HbA1c should be measured 3-6 months after changes in therapy A first-generation sulfonylurea can be used as an alternate agent.
Chlorpropamide should only be used in patients 
Oral Sulfonylureasa,b* *From VA Medical Advisory Panel Dosing Interval qd qd-bid bid-tid qd qd-bid qd qd-bid Daily dose (mg/day) 100-750 100-1000 500-3000 1-8 5-40 5-20 2.5-20 Plasma halflife (hrs) 24-48 4-7 4-8 9 1-5 2-5 10-16 Duration Of Action (hrs) 24-72 12-24 6-12 24 24 24 24 Active Metabolites yes yes no yes no no weak
Sulfonylurea First Generation Chlorpropamide Tolazamide Tolbutamide Second Generation Glimepiride Glipizide Glipizide XL Glyburide a b
Potency Low Low Low High High High High
Adapted from Krentz AJ, Ferner RE, Bailey CJ. Comparative tolerability profiles of oral antidiabetic agents.
Drug Safety 1994; 11:223-241.
Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc.,1996:129a-130u.
1
VHA PMB-MAP.
The Pharmacologic Management of Non-Insulin Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
VHA PHBSHG Publication No. 96-004.
Hines, IL: Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group.
December 1996.
45
Drugs that Potentiate Sulfonylurea Action *From VA Medical Advisory Panel DRUGS Acarbose, alcohol, monoamine oxidase inhibitors, metformin, salicylates Chloramphenicol, monoamine oxidase inhibitors, warfarin Clofibrate, salicylates, sulfonamides, warfarin Probenecid, salicylates a
a,b
MECHANISM Intrinsic hypoglycemic activity Decreased hepatic metabolism Displacement from plasma proteinc Decreased renal excretion
Adapted from Krentz AJ, Ferner RE, Bailey CJ. Comparative tolerability profiles of oral antidiabetic agents.
Drug Safety 1994;11:223-241.
b Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc.,1996:129a-130u.
c Clinical significance disputed
D.
Consider Insulin Therapy in Conjunction with an Oral Sulfonylurea2 In patients failing a maximal dose of sulfonylurea therapy, many patients can be convinced to start bedtime insulin daytime sulfonylurea (BIDS) because only one injection and one SMBG before breakfast are required.
If the target glycemic level is not achieved, then the use of multiple dosages of insulin should be considered.
For lean individuals, especially if elderly, 5-10 units of NPH insulin would be an appropriate range for starting bedtime insulin, while 10-15 units can be recommended for obese individuals.
Doses of insulin are best adjusted according to SMBG results obtained in the patient's usual environment.
Consider Metformin as Second Line Agent 1.
Recommendation Use as a second-line oral agent (in combination with an oral sulfonylurea at maximum dosage) in the event of oral sulfonylurea failure.
The effect of metformin on glycemic control should be additive, due to its different mechanism of action.
Efficacy in lowering HbA1c is comparable to oral sulfonylureas; the average maximum decrease in HbA1c is 2%.
Does not result in weight gain.
A reduction in plasma triglycerides may occur.
The patient should be advised of the transient, dose-related GI side effects (diarrhea, nausea, vomiting, bloating, flatulence, anorexia).
Discontinue if testing of glycemic control fails to show improvement over 3 months.
E.
2.
3.
4.
5.
7.
2
VHA PMB-MAP.
The Pharmacologic Management of Non-Insulin Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
VHA PMBSHG Publicatoin No. 96-004.
Hines, IL: Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group.
December 1996.
46
*From VA Medical Advisory Panel DOSE Check Scr and LFTs prior to starting therapy · Start 500-850 mg q am with meals · dosage as needed by 500-850 mg every 2 weeks (split dose bid) · The usual maintenance dose is 850 mg bid with meals · Maximum dose: 2550 mg/day ·
CAUTIONS/MONITOR · Inform patient to take with food to avoid possible GI symptoms (diarrhea, nausea, vomiting, bloating, flatulence, anorexia) · Counsel patient to be aware of possible metallic taste in mouth · Monitor BUN, creatinine, and electrolytes within 2 weeks of initiation or dosage change · Lactic acidosis, incidence with: Scr 
a
Adapted from Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc.,1996:129a-30u.
F.
Acarbose Has Limited Use 1.
Recommendation Due to its side-effect profile, multiple daily dosing regimen, and lower efficacy, this agent has limited indications.
Local medication use guidelines should be developed.
Suggestions for utilization: (a) Inadequately controlled patients (2% above HbA1c goal) who are unable to take sulfonylureas and/or metformin (allergies, adverse reactions, contraindications).
The effect of acarbose on glycemic control should be additive, due to its different mechanism of action; Patients inadequately controlled on sulfonylurea and metformin combination therapy, after discontinuation of metformin if the patient did not respond.
The addition of acarbose is used to avoid insulin therapy (although this may potentiate the hypoglycemic potential of these agents); Patients with elevated postprandial BS, or impaired glucose tolerance.
2.
(b)
(c) 3.
Its efficacy in lowering HbA1c is inferior to that of the oral sulfonylureas and metformin; the general maximum reduction in HbA1c is 0.5 - 1.0 %.
Refer to Medical Advisory Panel Table below for contraindications to the use of acarbose.
The patient should be advised of the transient, dose-related GI side effects (diarrhea, abdominal pain, flatulence).
47
4.
5.
6.
7.
A reduction in plasma triglycerides may occur.
Discontinue if failure to show improvement in glycemic control over 3-6 months.
Acarbose Drug Therapya,b* *From VA Medical Advisory Panel DOSE 25 mg tidc CAUTIONS/MONITOR Inform patient to take dose with the first bite of each main meal Patients should maintain a diet high in complex carbohydrates and low in simple sugars to achieve maximum benefit and minimize adverse effects Inform patient of possible GI symptoms (e.g., diarrhea, abdominal pain, flatulence) that may occur during the first few weeks of therapy Monitor serum AST/ALT levels every 3 months during the first year of treatment Renal impairment has been shown to increase plasma concentrations of acarbose; its use is not recommended in these patients CONTRAINDICATIONS Hypersensitivity to the drug Presence of diabetic ketoacidosis or cirrhosis Presence of intestinal complications (e.g., ulcerations, obstructions, digestion or absorption disorders)
·
· ·
·
·
·
·
·
a
Adapted from Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc.,1996:129a-129e.
Martin AE, Montgomery PA. Acarbose: An a-glucosidase inhibitor.
Am J Health-Syst Pharm.
1996;53:2277-90.
c This is the recommended starting dose.
Dosing must be individualized on the basis of both effectiveness and tolerance not to exceed max. of 100 mg tid b
48
MODULE GN GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Nutrition
49
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Nutrition
1
Pers o n w i th diab etes an d r e q u iri n g nutr ition al coun s e l ing [A]
2
Pa ti e n t as s es s m ent: Ob ta in cl in ica l d a ta Inte rvie w p a tie n t [B]
3
D e te rm in e appr opri a te diet pr es cri p ti on [C]
4
Provi d e t rai ning of pati e n t on m u tuall y i den tifie d go als [D]
5
N u tri tional co u n s e li n g ne ed m e t? [E]
6 Y
Fo ll o w- u p Peri odi cal ly re - e va lu ate C o m m u ni ca te a s nee ded [F]
N
7
On go i n g nutri ti o nal i nte rven ti on
50
Module GN Glycemic Control: Nutrition
ANNOTATIONS
51
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Nutrition Module GN A. Person with Diabetes Requiring Nutritional Counseling Medical nutrition therapy and exercise are the initial treatments for diabetes mellitus.
A three-month trial is appropriate unless fasting blood sugar 
Newly-diagnosed patients, patients whose diabetes is judged out of control, patients using insulin pumps or multiple daily injections, and patients with serious nutrition-related complications should be referred for individualized assessment and instruction in meal planning.
Frequent nutritional counseling may be indicated for such patients.
Patient Assessment 1.
2.
Clinical data: current height/weight and BMI Nutrition history: usual food intake and pattern of intake; energy and macronutrient composition; weight history, appetite, and digestion problems; frequency and choices of restaurant meals; alcohol intake; vitamin, mineral, or nutrient supplement use Exercise pattern: type of activity/exercise, frequency, duration, and motivation Psychosocial and economic issues: living situation, cooking facilities, ability to obtain and prepare food, finances, educational background, employment, ethnic or religious belief considerations, literacy, family support, need for food assistance if applicable (e.g., Meals on Wheels, food banks) Glucose monitoring: knowledge of target blood glucose ranges, glucose testing method, frequency of testing, blood glucose records, and use of data from monitoring 6.
7.
Knowledge/readiness to learn basic food/meal planning, attitude Smoking history: present pattern, cessation or participation in smoking cessation program
B.
3.
4.
5.
C.
Determine Appropriate Diet Prescription Based upon consideration of whether the patient has Type I or II diabetes, the target glycemic goal, and the information obtained from the patient assessment, an appropriate diet prescription will be negotiated.
52
D.
Provide Training of Patient on Mutually Identified Goals Note: Topics to be covered during the initial therapy of 3 or 4 visits.
1.
2.
Risk factors associated with diabetes Role and effect of nutrition, exercise, medication, weight loss/maintenance, and smoking or blood glucose management Definitions: examples of carbohydrate, protein, and fat Nutrition prescription: ·
3.
4.
Calories based on individual needs and goals; initiate plan to achieve reasonable weight Fats: restrict according to risk factors and severity of serum lipid levels Carbohydrates: based on nutrition assessment
·
·
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
Meal planning and timing of meals How to maintain a food intake record and its importance to treatment Recognition and treatment of hypoglycemia Sick day management Targeting of blood glucose levels, self-monitoring of blood glucose, and measures to take based on monitoring Use of food labels and shopping skills Dining out Recipe modification; portion sizes Long-term management goals: target blood glucose levels and glycosylated HbA1c, weight, lipids, blood pressure, lifestyle change, medication regimen
10.
11.
12.
13.
53
14.
Insulin regimen, onset, peak, and duration; impact of food and activity on glucose level Goals are: ·
Achievement and maintenance of appropriate blood glucose and glycosylated hemoglobin levels by balancing food intake with insulin and/or oral hypoglycemic or antiglycemic agent and activity levels.
Achievement of optimal serum lipid levels (see Lipid Algorithm).
Provision of adequate energy for maintaining reasonable weight.
Appropriate medical nutrition therapy for acute and chronic complications such as hypoglycemia, short-term illness, autonomic neuropathy, hypertension, cardiovascular disease, renal disease.
Improvement of overall health.
patients with a specific need, such as (but not hypoglycemic reactions, failure to achieve target etc., ongoing (and frequent) nutritional counseling c health goal.
·
·
·
·
E.
Nutritional Counseling Met For limited to) pregnancy, brittle diabetes, goal, evaluation to discontinue insulin, may be appropriate to achieve a specifi Follow-up ·
F.
Instruct patient to call with questions/concerns.
Send copy of Initial Assessment and Nutrition Progress Notes to referral source and place original in patient's medical record.
Call patient 24 to 48 hours prior to next appointment to confirm.
Individualized initial therapy: Based upon clinical judgment and factors such as motivation, educational level, and available time.
For less complicated cases 3 or 4 visits over 3 to 6 months can usually be combined with other visits for the convenience of the patient, with subsequent follow-up as appropriate.
·
·
·
54
MODULE GH GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Home Monitoring
55
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Home Monitoring 1
P e rs o n w i th di a betes m e ll i tu s
2
Pa ti ent on i ns u l in ther apy? [A] N
3 Y
N e go tiat e an in d i vi du al f requ ency for m o n it o ring SMBG
4
Pati ent o n di et alon e? [A] N
Y
5
Pati en t is on ora l ag ents , an d stab le w ith in ta rg e t r a n g e ? [A] N
6 Y
SMBG R x 
7
Ini tia tion o f therapy or acti ve adj u s tm e nt of do s e ? N
Y
8
9
Epis od es of hypoglyce m i a pres ent ?
Y
D o b ene fi ts of achie vin g tar g e t glyc em ic ra nge j ustify ri sk? (R efer to Modu le G, Box 1 3 ) N
Y
N
10
Go ba ck to Modul e G, Box 11
11
S ymp t o ma ti c hypergl yce m i a pres ent ? N 13
12 Y
D o es pa ti ent ad ju s t m edi ca ti on?
Y
N
14
Pa ti e n t do es not m eet cr iteri a for 
D o cu m ent SMBG m a y exce ed 50/1 50 d a ys
56
MODULE GH GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Home Monitoring
ANNOTATIONS
57
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Home Monitoring Annotations Module GH A. Use of Self Monitoring Blood Glucose (SMBG) in Persons with Type II Diabetes Not on Insulin TABLE OF EVIDENCE SELF MONITORING OF BLOOD GLUCOSE Strength of Recommendation IIb IIb Level of Strength B C
Intervention SMBG
Reference Allen et al. 1990; ADA Consensus Statement: Self monitoring of blood glucose 1994; Fonborne et al. 1989; Klein et al. 1993; Wing et al. 1990.
IIb IIb IIb
B B B
1.
SMBG is widely used in persons with Type II diabetes not treated with insulin without substantial scientific evidence of efficacy.
Available data, based upon controlled studies, do not demonstrate that SMBG improves long term glycemic control in persons with Type II diabetes mellitus on oral medication.
In several studies urine testing was as effective as SMBG, although studies did not explicitly have patients trained to self-adjust medication.
Consequently, they do not exclude the possibility that selected patients, i.e., those who are highly motivated to alter their medication, diet and exercise regimen based upon SMBG results, could benefit from monitoring.
For all patients with diabetes, practitioners should ensure that patients demonstrate proficiency with the technique (See Module G, Annotation F) including transfer of blood from finger to strip and knowledge of quality control procedures if a meter is used.
If the provider does not have experience with SMBG, the patient should be referred to a diabetes educator.
In addition, providers should review SMBG results at regular visits or by telephone.
Urine testing should be considered as an alternative means of detecting hyperglycemia in patients who are not proficient with SMBG, or are not willing to make adjustments in medication or lifestyle based upon results.
Use of urine testing for this purpose presupposes that the renal threshold is normal.
58
Recommendations for SMBG* From VHA Pharmacy Benefits Management-Medical Advisory Panel, The Pharmacologic Management of Non-Insulin Dependent Diabetes Mellitus Patients on Oral Agents ·
Patients on Insulin Alone
·
· a
For stable NIDDM: No more than 50 strips per 150 days.a This would allow for twice-weekly testing.
Increased numbers of strips may be needed for a limited time period for the following indications: 1) initiation of therapy and/or active adjustment of oral agents 2) prevention and detection of hypoglycemia when symptoms are suggestive, or if documented hypoglycemia unawareness 3) detection of hyperglycemia when symptoms or urine glycosuria are suggestive some patients do not require strips for adequate glucose control The frequency of monitoring should be individualized based on the frequency of insulin injections, hypoglycemic reactions, level of glycemic control, and patient/provider use of the data to adjust therapy A combination of pre and postprandial tests should be performed, up to 4 times per day
SMBG should be performed only if there is a specific justification for an individual patient, and a measurable health outcome is monitored on an ongoing basis.
2.
Patients who demonstrate consistent glucose results (stable patients) may require fewer or no strips.
When metabolic control worsens, testing requirements may increase.
Each provider must ascertain that the patient has proficiency in SMBG technique.
Initial and ongoing justification for SMBG use must be provided and should be linked to health outcomes.
59
MODULE GP GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Physical Activity
60
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Glycemic Control: Physical Activity 1
As s e s s ph ys i ca l acti vi ty l eve l an d d is cus s exerci s e o p ti on s w it h patie nt [A]
2
Pa ti ent wi s h es to i nc rea s e ph ys i cal a ctivi ty l e ve l?
Y
N 4 3
Re -e va l ua te g lyce m i c co n tro l p la n Ad ju s t tre a tm e n t if i n d ica te d (Go to Mo d u le G, Bo x 22)
Perf orm ca rd i o va s cular ri s k e valuati o n [B]
5
Are ca rd i o va s cular ri s ks pr es en t? [C]
6 Y
Ma na g e ca rd i o va s cular r is ks ap prop ri atel y [C]
7 N
Perfo rm Exer cis e To le r a nce Te s t
8 9
Ph ys ica l a cti vity pres cri p ti on w it h no ca rd io vas cu l ar ri s k [D]
Phys ical acti vity p res cri p ti on with ca rdio va s cu l ar ris k [E]
10
Glycem ic contr o l tar get va lu e achieve d? [F ] N 11
Y
12
R e -e va l uate and adjus t m edi ca ti on/di et to m i nim ize ri s k of hypo glyce m i a [G]
R e -e va l uate an d a d ju s t pe r iod ic al l y
61
MODULE GP GLYCEMIC CONTROL: Physical Activity
ANNOTATIONS
62
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS
Glycemic Control: Physical Activity Annotations Module GP
A.
Assess Physical Activity Level and Discuss Exercise Options with Patient 1.
2.
Is patient physically active or sedentary? What does the patient's physical activity consist of (Walking, jogging, swimming, etc.)? How many times per week? How long? · · ·
Less than 2 times per week 2-3 times per week 3 or more times per week
Sedentary Moderately Active Highly Active
Physical Activity Recommendations (General) 3.
Physical activity of 10 minutes per session, several times a day can be recommended.
Physical activity may be incorporated in the patient's lifestyle or daily schedule.
It need not be regimented.
An attempt must be made to increase the patient's current level of physical activity.
Weight training can be recommended especially for patients who cannot or do not wish to walk/jog.
Weight training activities should allow all major groups of muscles to work.
Low weight/high repetitions should be stressed (reps: 20-30/set).
Activity (weight lifting) can be done several times a day, choosing a few exercises per session if patient cannot devote a lot of time at once.
Activities such as pushups, sit-ups, and handgrip exercises are also beneficial and should be recommended to the patient.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
B.
Cardiovascular Risk Evaluation The practitioner will evaluate the patient's cardiovascular history and physical exam, including: 1.
Evaluation should include a history directed towards risk or presence of peripheral vascular disease, including claudication, poor healing, amputation; cerebrovascular disease, including transient ischemic attacks and stroke; and coronary heart disease, including smoking, family history, hypertension, cholesterol (HDL to LDL ratio) and triglyceride, angina, MI, and arrhythmia.
63
C.
Identify and Manage if Cardiovascular Risks Present Depending upon results of the cardiovascular evaluation that is performed as part of a complete diabetes evaluation, the patient's age, and the proposed level of physical activity, it may be advisable to recommend diagnostic procedures for the presence of and/or severity of cardiovascular disease.
The necessity for, and extent of, such evaluation is at the discretion of the provider.
For further details one may want to refer to the Ischemic Heart Disease guideline.
Physical Activity Prescription With No Cardiovascular Risk 1.
Ambulatory No evidence of Cardiovascular disease.
· · · ·
D.
60% to 80% of predicted maximal heart rate 3-5 times per week 20-40 minutes per session Aerobic type exercises
2.
Non-ambulatory No Cardiovascular disease.
· ·
Daily exercise with upper extremities Minimum of 10 minutes per session
E.
Physical Activity Prescription with Cardiovascular Risk 1.
Ambulatory Cardiovascular disease.
·
· · ·
60% to 80% of symptom limited heart rate associated with 1.5 mm ST segment depression 3-5 times per week 20-40 minutes per session Aerobic exercises
2.
Non-ambulatory Cardiovascular disease.
·
Daily exercise with upper extremities 60-80% of symptom limited heart rate or heart rate associated with 1.5 mm depression of ST segment
·
F.
Glycemic Control Target Value Achieved? It is evident that the risks of therapy are different for each individual, dependent upon his or her medical, social, and psychologic status.
Thus, the risks of a proposed therapy must be balanced against the potential benefits.
Factors for the provider and person with diabetes to consider in jointly making this decision should include the following: 1.
2.
Appropriate medical support and psychosocial environment.
History of severe, recurrent hypoglycemia.
64
3.
The possible consequence of adverse effects associated with hypoglycemia (consider CVD, anticoagulation, use of dangerous equipment, etc.)
Alcohol or substance abuse.
The presence of multiple end-stage microvascular complications, including macular edema, PDR, micro- and macroproteinuria.
Pregnancy, or the intention to become pregnant.
Symptomatic cardiovascular disease.
Willingness and ability to self-monitor and to make appropriate lifestyle changes.
Quality of life.
Specific risks of individual therapeutic options.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
G.
Re-evaluate and Adjust Medication and/or Diet To minimize risk of hypoglycemia 1.
2.
Monitor blood glucose more frequently when initiating an exercise program.
Decrease, prior to exercise, the insulin that is peaking during the exercise period.
A recommended starting point is a 30% decrease for intermediate acting and a 50% decrease for fast acting insulin.
However, reduction, or elimination of a dose must be individually determined.
Increase carbohydrate intake by 15g prior to exercise for each 30 minutes of exercise.
Ingest 15-30g of carbohydrate after exercise.
Inject insulin in an area that is not active during exercise, such as the abdomen during walking.
Avoid exercise during periods of peak insulin activity.
Exercise with a partner.
Monitor blood glucose after strenuous physical activity prior to bedtime.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
Ingest a snack containing some protein, fat and carbohydrates if blood sugar 
65
Exhibits: G1 and G2
66
67
68
References: 1.
Abraira C, Colwell J, Nuttall et al.
Cardiovascular events and correlates in the VA Feasibility Trial (VACSDM).
VA Cooperative Study on Glycemic Control and Complications in Diabetes Mellitus, Type II.
Archives Internal Med (in press) Anderson DKG, Svardsudd K,.
Long term glycemic control relates to mortality in Type II Diabetes.
Diabetes Care 1995, 18:1534-1543 Arfken CL, Salicrup AE, Meuer SM et al.
Development and progression of retinopathy in African Americans and whites with insulin dependent diabetes.
Arch Int Med 1994, 154: 2597-2602 Burden AC, McNally PG, Feehally J, Walls J. Increased incidence of endstage renal disease secondary to diabetes mellitus in Asian ethnic groups in the United States.
Diabetic Med 1992, 9: 641-645 Cowie CC, Port FK, Wolfe RA, Savage PJ, Moll PP, Hawthorne VM. Disparities in incidence of diabetic end stage renal disease according to racde and type of diabetes.
NEJM 1989, 321: 10741079 Cruickshanks KJ, Alleyne SA.
Black West Indian and matched white diabetics in Britain compared with diabetics in Jamaica: Body mass, blood pressure, and vascular disease.
Diabetes Care 1987, 10: 170-179 Danne T, Weber B, Hartmann R et al.
Long term glycemic control has a non-linear association to the frequency of background retinopathy in adolescents with diabetes.
Diabetes Care 17:13901396, 1994 DCCT Research Group.
The relationship of glycemic exposure (HbA1c) to the risk of development and progression of retinopathy in the DCCT.
Diabetes 1995, 44: 968-983 DCCT Research Group.
The relationship of glycemic exposure (HbA1c) to the risk of development and progression of diabetic nephropathy in the DCCT.
Kidney International 1995, 47: 17031720 DCCT Research Group: The absence of a Glycemic Threshold for the development of long term complications: The perspective of the DCCT.
Diabetes 1996.45: 1289-1298
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
69
References: (Continued) 11.
DCCT Research Group: The effect of intensive insulin treatment of diabetes on the development and progression of long term complications in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.
NEJM 1993, 329:977-986 Haffner SM, Fong D, Stern MP, Pugh JA, Hazuda HP, Patterson JK, VanHeuven WAJ, Klein R. Diabetic retinopathy in Mexican Americans and non-hispanic whites.
Diabetes 1988, 37: 878-884 Hamman RF, Mayer EJ, Moo-Young GA, Hilldebrandt W, Marshall JA, Baxter J, Prevalence and risk factors of diabetic retinopathy in non-Hispanic whites and hispanics with NIDDM.
San Luis Valley Diabetes Study.
Diabetes 1989, 38: 1231-1237 Humphrey LL, Ballard DJ, Frohnert PP et al: Chronic renal failure in non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.
A population based study in Rochester, Minnesota.
Ann Intern Med 1989, 111: 788-796 Kawazu T, Shimizu K, Ohno I et al.
The relationship between early diabetic nephropathy and control of plasma glucose in non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus: J Diabetes and Complications 1994, 8: 13-17 Klein R, Klein B, Moss SE, Cruickshanks KJ. Ten Year incidence and progression of diabetic retinopathy.
Arch Ophthamol 1994, 112:1217-1228 Klein R, Klein B, Moss SE, Cruickshanks KJ. Ten-Year Incidence of Gross Proteinuria in People With Diabetes.
Diabetes 1995, 44: 916-923 Klein R, Klein BEK, Moss SE, Cruickshanks KJ.
The relationship between hyperglycemia to the long term incidence and progression of diabetic retinopathy.
Arch Intern Med 1994, 154: 2169-78 Klein R. Hyperglycemia and microvascular and macrovascular disease in diabetes Diabetes Care 1995, 18: 258-268 Krolewski AS, Laffel LMB, Krowlewski M, Quinn M, Warram JH. Glycosylated hemoglobin and the risk of microalbuminuria in patients with insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.
NEJM 1995, 332: 1251-1255
12.
13.
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
19.
20.
70
References: (Continued) 21.
Lee ET, Lee VS, Lu M, Russell D. Development of proliferative retinopathy in Oklahoma Indians with NIDDM: Incidence and risk factors.
Diabetes Care 1992, 15:1620-1627 Report of the Expert Committee on the Diagnosis and Classification of Diabetes Mellitus.
Diabetes Care 1997, 20 Nelson RG, Newman JM, Knowler WC et al.
Incidence of end stage renal disease in Type II (non-insulin dependent) diabetes in Pima Indians.
Diabetologia 1988, 31: 730-736 Ohkubo Y, Kishikawa H, Araki E, Miyata T, Isami S, Motoyoshi S, Kojima Y, Furuyoshi N, Shichiri M. Intensive insulin therapy prevents the progression of diabetic microvascular complications in Japanese patients with non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus: a randomized prospective 6 year study.
Diabetes Research and Clinical Practice 1995, 28: 103-117 Palmberg P, Smith M, Waltman et al.
The natural history of retinopathy in insulin dependent juvenile onset diabetes.
Ophthalmology 1981, 88: 613-618 Panzram G: Mortality and survival in type 2 (non-insulin dependent) diabetes mellitus.
Diabetologia 1987, 30: 123-131 Rabb MF, Gagliano DA, Sweeny NE.
Diabetic retinopathy in blacks.
Diabetes Care 1990, 13:1202-1226 Singer D, Nathan, Anderson K et al.
Association of HbA1C with prevalence of cardiovascular disease in the original cohort of the Framingham Heart Study.
Diabetes 1992, 41: 202-208 Stephens GW, Gillaspy JA, Clyne D et al.
Racial differences in the incidence of end stage renal disease in Types I and II diabetes mellitus.
Am J Kidney Disease 1990, 15: 562-567 United Kingdom prospective diabetes study (UKPDS) 16: Overview of six years therapy of Type II diabetes: A progressive disease.
Diabetes 1995, 44: 1249-1258
22.
23.
24.
25.
26.
27.
28.
29.
30.
71
MODULE FR Foot Care: Routine Care
72
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS 1
Pe rs on w i th di ab etes
2
Is p a ti e n t m edi ca ll y st able? N 3
Y
Pro vi d e app ropr ia te treatm e nt an d s tab i li za ti o n
Evalua te and m a nage per app ropri a te a lg o ri th m (s) 4
Glycem ic Co ntro l Medi ca ti on Nu tri ti o n Ho m e Moni to r ing Ph ysi ca l Activi ty
Module G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot evalua tion w i th i n pas t ye a r, r is k fa ct ors pre s en t, o r acti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
Foot Ca re : M odul e F
7
N o eye evaluat io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pre s en t, or k no w n to be at high ri s k fo r vis u al l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
Mo dule E
9
N o uri n alysi s w ith in pas t ye ar, m i croa l b um in ur ia or m a cr oalbu m i n u ri a pre s en t; or el e va ted creat in i ne? N
10 Y
Renal Dise ase T re at me n t: Mo du le R
11
Bloo d pres s u re 
12 Y
Hype rt en si on Management:
Module H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lipid Co ntro l:
Mo du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- up i n 1 ye ar
Fo ll ow- u p as in di ca te d to eval u at e /tre a t
73
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Foot Care: Routine Care Patients with no known risk for lower extremity event presenting in primary care
Page 1
1
Perform and document visual inspection of feet [A]
2
Foot risk assessment performed within past 12 months?
3 Y
Visual inspection normal? N
Y
N
4
Perform foot risk assessment [C]
5
Limb threatening condition? [D] N
6 Y
Hospitalize
7
Active foot ulcer or infection? N 8
Y
Go to Page 3
Patient high risk for foot ulcer? [E] F N
Y
Go to Page 2
9
Acute minor foot problems? [F] or In need of nail or callus care? N 11
10 Y
Preventive foot care
Educate and document patient/family for preventive foot care and footwear [G]
12
Follow-up for: 1.
Yearly foot risk assessment 2.
Visual inspection and peripheral sensation testing at routine primary care visits [H]
74
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Foot Care: Routine Care
Page 2
From Box 8 PT with DM at high risk for foot ulcers [I]
13
Active foot ulcer or infection? [J] N
Y
Go to Page 3
14
Absence of palpable pedal pulses? [K] N
15 Y
Signs and symptoms of acute ischemia or rest pain? [L] N
16 Y
Refer to vascular evaluation within 7 days.
[M]
17
Severe claudification? [N] N
18 Y
Consider vascular evaluation [O]
19
-
Is there a history of any of the following: amputation ulcer loss of protective sensation foot deformity?
20 Y
Treatment Plan: 1.
Refer to Foot care specialist for intensive follow-up plan 2.
Implement treatment for this plan 3.
Intensive patient/family education 4.
Re-refer PRN [P]
N 21
Go back to Page 1 Box 10
Perform visual inspections at each regular visit
Go back to Page 1 Box 3
75
MODULE FR Foot Care: Routine Care
ANNOTATIONS
76
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Routine Foot Care Annotations Module: FR A. Perform/Document Visual Inspection of the Feet -- Inspect for breaks in skin, erythema, trauma, pallor on elevation, dependent rubor, nail deformities, extensive callus and pitting edema.
Foot Risk Assessment Every diabetic individual needs a documented foot risk assessment within the past 12 months to determine their risk of lower extremity amputation.
Perform Foot Risk Assessment Include evaluation of skin for breakdown, assessment of protective sensation, lower extremity arterial disease, deformities, previous history of ulcers and amputations.
Assess the patient's footwear.
Limb-Threatening Condition? Signs and symptoms of systemic infection including gas gangrene, ascending cellulitis and lymphangitis or gangrene, no palpable pulses, signs of acute ischemia including rest pain, extreme pallor, or cold extremity.
Active Foot Ulcer or Infections? 1.
Active Foot Ulcer A cutaneous erosion with a loss of epithelium that extends to or through the dermis and can involve deeper tissue and is characterized by an inability to self-repair in a timely and orderly manner.
Active Infection Although infection is not always clinically apparent, common signs and symptoms include periulcer area warmth, erythema, purulent drainage, odor and involvement of bone.
Pain may or may not be present.
There may or may not be lymphangitis and lymphadenopathy, and the body temperature and white blood cell count may be elevated.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE ACTIVE FOOT ULCER Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
B.
C.
D.
E.
2.
Factor Lower extremity foot ulcers and amputations in diabetes
Reference Reiber et al. (1995)
77
TABLE OF EVIDENCE ACTIVE INFECTION Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa IIa Level of Evidence C C C
Factor Determination of infection
Reference ADA 1990 Eckman et al. (1995) Brodsky JW et al. (1991)
F.
Patient High Risk for Foot Ulcers? The presence of any of the following characteristics equals high risk: 1.
Lack of sensation to Semmes-Weinstein 5.07 monofilament at one or more noncallused plantar sites.
Evidence of lower extremity arterial disease as follows: a. b. c. Absence of both dorsalis pedis and tibialis posterior pulses Dependent rubor or pallor on elevation History of rest pain or claudication (pain occurring in calf or thigh when walking less than one block that is relieved by rest) Prior history of lower extremity bypass surgery
2.
d. 3.
4.
G.
Foot deformities, specifically hammertoes, claw toe, Charcot's foot History of foot ulcer or nonwar-related lower extremity amputation at any level
Acute Minor Foot Problems? Presence of callus, onychomycosis, painful corn, or other minor problems.
Treat Problem As Appropriate Many minor foot problems can be treated by the patient and/or family members, or general health care providers without referral to foot care specialists.
If this approach is chosen, it is necessary that the patient and family members have received appropriate education regarding preventive foot care.
Documentation of Patient/Family Education for Preventive Foot Care and Footwear Measures Outpatient education includes: · · · · Daily foot inspection and preventive care Skin, nail and callus care What to report and whom to call regarding any foot injury or abnormality Footwear
H.
I.
78
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence A
Factor Reduction of lower extremity clinical abnormalities in patients with NIDDM
Reference Litzelman DK et al. (1993)
J.
Follow-up for: 1.
Yearly Foot Risk Assessment -- Every individual with diabetes must have had a documented foot risk assessment within the past 12 months to determine their risk of lower extremity amputation.
Visual Inspection and Peripheral Sensation Testing at Routine Primary Care Visits -- There is limited information, yet consensus exists in the diabetes professional community that visual inspection combined with peripheral sensation testing may reveal some occult lesions in diabetics.
This practice also demonstrates to the patient the importance of foot assessment.
2.
K.
Patient at High Risk for Foot Ulcer Refer to page 2, annotation E. TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIb IIb IIa IIa IIb I I IIa Level of Evidence C C C B C B B C
Factor Documented risk factors for diabetic foot ulcer
Reference ADA 1990 Bailey et al. (1985) Birk et al. (1988) Boyko et al. (1996) Holewski et al. (1988) Mayfield et al. (1996) Rith-Najarian et al. (1992) Sims DS Jr. (1988)
L.
Absence of Palpable Pedal Pulses? Examine to determine presence of dorsalis pedis and posterior tibial pulses.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Factor Assessment of peripheral vascular disease in diabetes Reference Orchard 
79
M.
Signs and Symptoms of Acute Ischemia or Rest Pain? Lower limb pain at rest, dusky/blue or purple/black color, gangrene, or cold extremity.
The pain in the toes or forefoot may be relieved by dependency of the limb in the early phases.
Assessment is needed for prompt vascular/surgical intervention.
Acute ischemic or avascular foot will "present with" pain, pallor, pulselessness, paresthesia and/or paralysis.
(See Table of Evidence at annotation L.) Refer For Vascular Evaluation Within Seven Days Referral by health care provider for evaluation by a member of the VA's vascular team within 7 days.
Severe Claudication? Does patient experience pain in the thigh or calf that occurs when walking less than one block which is relieved by rest? Consider Vascular Evaluation If the patient's symptoms limit his or her lifestyle, a vascular specialist can determine appropriateness of surgical intervention on a patientspecific basis.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa IIa Level of Evidence C B A
N.
O.
P.
Factor Justification of vascular procedures based on outcomes of vascular interventions
Reference Conte et al. (1995) Currie et al. (1995) Wolf et al. (1993)
Q.
Treatment Plan 1.
Refer to Foot Care Specialist for Intensive Follow-Up Plan A designated health care provider with training and interest in the management of traumatic, infectious, neoplastic, metabolic, acquired, and congenital disorders of the foot who utilizes medical, mechanical and/or surgical treatment modalities.
For prior above-ankle amputees refer to amputation algorithm.
Mechanical modalities may include footwear recommendations, and consideration of a footwear prescription will be based upon the individual structural and clinical findings.
Depth shoes should be prescribed for a patient with foot deformities and peripheral neuropathy as they can accept pressure-reducing insoles and accommodate foot deformities.
In-depth shoes usually have soft leather uppers paired with a crepe or Vibram outsole.
Custom-molded shoes are reserved for patients with foot deformities that cannot be accommodated in a depth shoe.
Persons with diabetes should avoid shoes with hard soles, since they do little to reduce plantar foot pressures.
Running shoes have been shown to reduce plantar pressures in individuals with diabetes; however, they may not accommodate foot deformities.
80
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa IIa IIa I Level of Evidence C B B B A
Factor Appropriate use of footwear in patients with diabetes
Reference ADA 1990 Cavanagh et al. (1987) Perry et al. (1995) Young et al. (1992) Litzeman DK et al. (1997)
2.
Implement Treatment per this Plan It is the responsibility of the foot care specialist to implement the patient care plan decided upon.
The foot care specialist may refer the patient to the primary care physician to implement and follow up on the specialist's plan.
Intensive Patient and Family Education Begin with an assessment of the patient's current self-care practices including asking "Do you do anything special to protect your feet?" Patient and family foot education should include the following components and considerations: a. b. Keep it simple and appropriate for patient's educational level.
Make it interactive, including demonstrations in washing, drying, and inspecting feet; nail cutting; and suitable footwear selection, including footwear for temperature extremes.
Provide opportunities for the patient to state the need for what are basics of daily skin and foot care and preventive measures.
Include practice time during the educational session to demonstrate and have the patient in return demonstrate safe toenail trimming.
Provide repetitive examples of and messages of how care of the feet can prevent complications.
Include recommendations that distinguish minor foot problems and more serious problems that require early or immediate professional treatment, together with a name and phone number for prompt assistance.
Make realistic recommendations (appropriate to the patient's physical and visual capabilities) while personalizing information and highlighting key points.
This may include referral to home health care.
Provide written guidelines in large print and/or graphics that the patient can hang in a bathroom as a reference, and reprints of lay articles.
Patients should be alerted that elevation in blood sugar may be a sign of an active 81
3.
c.
d.
e.
f.
g.
or impending infection.
Use of a night-light or turning on lights when getting up at night may prevent foot injuries.
Patients should be made aware of potential dangers in the home.
h.
For patients with high-risk feet, twice-daily inspection in good light is recommended, looking for any redness or drainage and running the hands over the foot to detect any swelling or increased local warmth.
Patients with neuropathic fingers may need to enlist help or use a mirror to inspect their feet.
Before donning footwear, inspect for torn linings, rough spots, and foreign materials, e.g., sand and stones.
Alternating between pairs of shoes during the day is recommended to alleviate repetitive local pressure.
A minimum of two serviceable pairs of shoes, insoles and orthoses are needed.
Educators can utilize numerous publications on patient foot care instruction that are free of charge and have no copyright restrictions.
Among them are: (1) Take Charge of Your Diabetes: Prevent Foot Problems, (2) Taking Care of Your Feet, (3) Tips on Good Foot Care from Feet Can Last a Lifetime.
Available through the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, CDC, and AADE. 4.
Re-refer PRN If patient shows little response to the implemented treatment plan, he/she should be referred to the foot care specialist again for consideration of an alternative plan.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I I I I Level of Evidence B C C C C
Factor Patient self foot care instruction
Reference Barth 1990 Feste 1991 Fain 1994 Ahroni et al. (1993) Weir GC et al. (1994)
82
MODULE FI Foot Care: Infection(s) and Ulcer(s)
83
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Foot Care: Infection(s) and Ulcer(s)
Page 1
Persons with diabetes in primary care setting with foot ulcers or infection
1
Are there signs or symptoms of life or limb threatening infection, cellulitis or vascular complication? [A]
2
Y
Hospitalize on appropriate service
N 3 4
5
Is cellulitis present?
Y
Is cellulitis associated with hemorrhagic callus or necrotic tissue? [B]
Y
Refer to foot care specialist for intensive f/u plan Implement tx per plan Re-refer if necessary
6
N
Continue on Page 2
Appropriate antibiotics, off-loading weight/aggressive follow-up [C]
7 Resolving within 7 days? Y
8
Consult with foot core specialist for intensive follow-up plan 10
9
N
Hospitalize (Box 2)
Implement tx per plan Re-refer if necessary
Go to Module FR, Page 2, once acute problem is resolved
84
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Foot Care: Infection(s) and Ulcer(s)
Page 2
C o nti nu ed fr om Pa ge 1 11
12
Is evi d va i ns u f
the r e e nc e of s cu l a r ficien cy?
Y
Re fe r to va s cu l ar s u rg eon o r fo ot ca re sp e cia l ist (Go to Bo x 2 )
N 13
Is a hem orr hag ic ca l lus p r es ent? N
Y
14
15
I s ther e an i ngr own t oenai l? [D] N
Y
R e fe r to fo o t ca r e sp e cia l ist
16
17
Is t hi s a pu nctu r e wo un d ? [E] 18 N
Y
Provi d e i m m e di a te tre a tm e nt of pun ctu r e w o und [F] 19
Perf orm wo und as s e s s m e nt [G] 20
Sam e da y re fe rr al to foo t s p e ci a li s t
R e fe rr a l to fo o t ca re s pecia l is t ind i ca te d ? [H] N
Y
Go to Mo d ul e FR , Page 2 , once a cu te p ro b le m is re s o lve d
C o nti nue o n Pa ge 3
85
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Foot Infection(s) and Ulcer(s)
Page 3
Continued from Page 2
21
Care of uncomplicated lesion: 1.
Provide local wound care 2.
Offload pressure and weight as indicated 3.
Follow-up specified schedule 4.
Review nutritional, exercise and self management sub-algorithms as indicated 5.
Patient and family education 6.
Refer for wound care assistance as needed [I]
22
Has wound healed within 4 weeks? [J]
Y
Go to Module FR Page 1
N 23
Refer to specialist for wound care treatment
Go to Module FR, Page 2, once acute problem is resolved
86
MODULE FI Foot Care: Infection(s) and Ulcers(s)
ANNOTATIONS
87
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Foot Care Infection(s) or Ulcer(s) Module FI A. Signs or Symptoms of Life- or Limb- Threatening Infection, Cellulitis or Vascular Complications Signs and symptoms of vascular complications include no palpable pulses and signs of acute ischemia, e.g., resting pain, extreme pallor, and cold extremities.
Signs and symptoms of systemic infection include gas gangrene, ascending cellulitis, and lymphangitis or gangrene.
Is there inflammation or cellular and/or connective tissue that has a margin greater than 2 cm of erythema and evidence of an ascending infection? TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation Orchard 
Level of Evidence C
Assessment of peripheral vascular disease in diabetes
B.
Is Cellulitis Associated with Hemorrhagic Callus or Necrotic Tissue? Is There nonviable tissue present that may be covering an underlying lesion or a break in the cutaneous barrier extending to or through the dermis that is not undergoing timely selfrepair.
Appropriate Antibiotics, Off-loading Weight, Aggressive Follow-Up See Module FR, page 1.
Is There An Ingrown Toenail? Is there a nail plate that has pierced the surrounding periungual tissue with associated erythema and drainage or an area of thick or discolored callus? Is this a Puncture Wound? A lesion through the epidermis, dermis and other tissues caused by a piercing or penetrating object.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation II Level of Evidence C
C.
D.
E.
Factor Treatment of puncture wounds
Reference Lavery et al. (1995)
F.
Provide Immediate Treatment of Puncture Wound Initiate antibiotics, cleanse wound, ensure adequate tetanus coverage and same-day referral to foot specialist.
Perform Wound Assessment Review anatomic, physical, and lesion characteristics, including determination of circumference, depth, and involvement of deep structures.
Assess for signs of infection, including necrosis, sinus tracts, exudate, odor, presence of 88
G.
fibrin, and healthy granulation tissue.
Assess surrounding areas for signs of edema, cellulitis, or abscess.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation Level of Evidence
Reference
Treatment of puncture wounds
Lavery et al. (1995) ADA Diabetic Foot Care 1990
IIa IIa
C C
H.
Referral to Foot Care Specialist Indicated? Lesion minor cut that does not extend beyond subcutaneous tissue.
no signs of acute infection, and there is no severe lower worsening lesion.
An ingrown toenail should be referred to a for excision.
Care of Uncomplicated Minor Lesion 1.
is a blister, erosion, and/or Pulses are present, there are limb pain and no sign of a foot specialist for evaluation
I.
Provide Local Wound Care Cleanse wound with saline, remove necrotic and callus tissue, apply appropriate dressing and other indicated treatments.
Offload Pressure and Weight as Indicated Consider lesion site, then provide pressure relief to avoid further trauma to lesion site by use of a post op shoe, offloading or depressurization footwear based on lesion site.
(Special shoes and insoles, bed rest.)
See Module FR, page 1.
Follow-Up on a Specified Schedule VA facility specific, but patients with active lesions need to be followed at least monthly.
Review Nutritional, Exercise and Self-management Subalgorithms as Indicated Reinforce nutritional, exercise, and self-management recommendations.
Avoid initiation of calorie restriction diet for weight loss in patients with foot lesions.
Patient and Family Education see Module FR, page 3.
Refer for Foot Care Assistance as Needed for Patients Unable To Do Local Wound Care Educate a family member on local wound care or refer the patient to a home health service.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
J.
Has Wound Healed Within Four Weeks? Assess for appropriate reduction in lesion size and depth and appearance of healthy granulating tissue, with no evidence of infection.
89
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa Level of Evidence C
Factor Progress for Wound Healing
Reference ADA 1990
90
References: 1.
2.
ADA, Diabetic Foot Care 1990.
ADA position statement.
Foot care in patients with diabetes mellitus.
Diabetes Care 1990; 19 (supplement).
ADA, Diabetic Foot Care 1990.
Ahroni J. Teaching foot care creatively and successfully.
Diabetes Educator 1993; 19(4):230-34.
Bailey TS, Yu HM, Rayfield EJ. Patterns of foot examination in a diabetic clinic.
AJM 1985; 78:371-374.
Barth R, Campbell LV, Allen S, Jupp JJ, Chisholm DJ. Diabetic Medicine 1991; 8:111-117.
Birke JA, Sims DS.
The insensitive foot.
In Physical Therapy of the Foot and Ankle.
Hunt GC, Ed. New York, NY: Churchill Livingstone 1988; pp 133-168.
Boyko EJ.
A prospective study of risk factors for diabetic foot ulcers.
Diabetes 1996; Supplement, p 194.
Brodsky JW, Schneidler C. Diabetic foot infections.
Orthop Clin North Am 1991; 22(3):473-89.
Cavanagh PR, Sanders LJ, Sims DS Jr.
The role of pressure distribution measurement in diabetic foot care.
Rehabilitation R
Conte MS. Femorotibial bypass for claudication: do results justify an aggressive approach? J Vasc Surg 1995; 21(6):873-881.
Currie IC. Treatment of intermittent claudication: the impact on quality of life.
Eur J Vasc Endovasc Surg 1995; 10:356-361.
Eckman MH, Greenfield S, Mackey WC, Wong JB, Kaplan S, Sullivan L, Dukes K, Pauker SG. Foot infections in diabetic patients.
Decision and cost-effectiveness analyses.
JAMA 1995; 273(9):712-20.
Fain JA, Melkus GDE.
Nurse practitioner practice patterns based on standards of medical care for patients with diabetes.
Diabetes Care 1994; 7:879-81.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
91
15.
Feste C. Empowerment: facilitation a path to responsible self-care.
Elkhart, Ind., Miles Inc., Diagnostics Division 1991.
Holewski JJ, Stress RM, Graf PM, Grunfeld C. Anesthesiometry: Quantification of cutaneous pressure sensation in diabetic peripheral neuropathy.
Journal of Rehabilitation Research and Development 1988; 25:1-10.
Lavery LA, Walker SC, Harkless LB, Felder-Johnson K. Infected puncture wounds in diabetic and nondiabetic adults.
Diabetes Care 1995; 18(12):1588-1591.
Litzelman DK, Slemanda CW, Langefeld CD.
Reduction of lower extremity clinical abnormalities in patients with non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.
Ann Int Med 1993; 19:36-41.
Mayfield JA, Reiber GE.
A foot risk classification system to predict diabetic amputation in Pima Indians.
Diabetes Care 1996; 19(7):704-9.
Orchard TJ 
Diabetes Care 1993; 16:1199-1209.
Perry JE, Ulbrecht JS, Derr JA, Cavanagh PR.
The use of running shoes to reduce plantar pressures in patient who have diabetes.
Bone Joint Surg Am 1995 Dec; 77A 77(12):1819-28.
Reiber GE, Boyko EJ, Smith D. Lower extremity foot ulcers and amputations in diabetes.
In Diabetes in America 2nd Ed. NIH Publication No. 95-1468.
1995 p 409-427.
Rith-Najarian SJ, Stolusky TG, Gohdes DM. Identifying diabetic patients at high risk for lower extremity amputation in a primary health care setting.
Diabetes Care 1992; 15:1386-1389.
Sims DS Jr, Cavanaugh PR, Ulbrecht JS. Risk factors in the diabetic foot.
The Journal of the American Physical Therapy Association 1988; 68:1887-1902.
Wier GC, Nathan DM Singer DE, Technical Review.
Standards of Care for Diabetes.
Diabetes Care 1994; 17:114-22.
Wolf GL. Surgery or balloon angioplasty for peripheral vascular disease: a randomized clinical trial.
J Vasc Interventional Radiol 1993; 4(5):639-648.
16.
17.
18.
19.
20.
21.
22.
23.
24.
25.
26.
92
27.
Young MJ, Cavanagh PR, Thomas MM, Johnson HM, Boulton AJM.
The effect of callus removal on Diabetic Med 1992; 9:5557.
93
Module E: Eye Care
94
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS 1
Pe rs on w i th di ab etes
2
Is p a ti e n t m edi ca ll y st able? N 3
Y
Pro vi d e app ropr ia te treatm e nt an d s tab i li za ti o n
Evalua te and m a nage per app ropri a te a lg o ri th m (s) 4
Glycem ic Co ntro l Medi ca ti on Nu tri ti o n Ho m e Moni to r ing Ph ysi ca l Activi ty
Module G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot evalua tion w i th i n pas t ye a r, r is k fa ct ors pre s en t, o r acti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
F oot Ca re : Module F
7
N o eye evaluat io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pre s en t, or k no w n to be at high ri s k fo r vis u al l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
M o dule E
9
N o uri n alysi s w ith in pas t ye ar, m i croa l b um in ur ia or m a cr oalbu m i n u ri a pre s en t; or el e va ted creat in i ne? N
10 Y
Renal Dise ase T re at me n t: Mo du le R
11
Bloo d pres s u re 
12 Y
Hype rt en si on Management:
Module H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lipid Co ntro l:
Mo du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- up i n 1 ye ar
Fo ll ow- u p as in di ca te d to eval u at e /tre a t
95
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Eye Care 1
Person with diabetes presenting to Primary Care Provider (PCP)
2
Educate patient on need for periodic eye exams and compliance with follow-up schedule 3 4 Y
Patient currently seen by eye care provider? N
Confirm pending eye appointment and yearly thereafter
5
Assess risk for Proliferative Diabetic Retinopathy, Rapid Progression, or sight threatening event [A] 7 6
Risk factor present? [B] N
Y
Refer for exam by eye care provider within 1 month.
Confirm pending eye appointment yearly thereafter
8
9
Onset of diabetes after age 30 ? [C]
Y
Refer for baseline exam within 3 months after diagnosis.
Confirm pending appointment for baseline exam or follow-up as appropriate [D]
N 10 13
Refer patient for baseline exam within 3-5 years from diagnosis (if not already complete).
On insulin or HbA1 c 
Y
12
Follow-up exam in 2 years if baseline exam normal [F] 11
Follow-up exam yearly if baseline exam normal [G]
96
Module E Eye Care
ANNOTATIONS
97
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Eye Care Annotations Module E
A.
Proliferative Diabetic Retinopathy (PDR) Assess risk for proliferative diabetic retinopathy, rapid progression, or sight-threatening event: 1.
2.
Presence of lower extremity amputation (diabetes related).
Gross proteinuria (
Duration 
Pregnancy.
Recent decrease in vision not associated with fluctuations in blood glucose.
3.
4.
5.
B.
Risk Factor Present? 1.
Patients at high risk for proliferative diabetic retinopathy, rapid progression, or sight-threatening event should be seen on an urgent basis.
Patients who have new or worsening symptoms or are pregnant should be referred for re-evaluation even if they have had an eye examination within the past year.
Eye exam implies a comprehensive dilated eye examination by an ophthalmologist or optometrist and includes indirect and slit lamp ophthalmoscopy.
The primary care provider should confirm yearly that the patient is being followed with dilated eye examinations.
Non-dilated retinal examinations by providers other than eye care specialists are relatively insensitive in detecting retinopathy.
Frequency of causes of visual impairment in other than retinopathy older onset diabetic patients dictates a comprehensive eye exam.
Fundus photography is appropriate and effective for retinopathy screening.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
98
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I I Level of Evidence B C B
Intervention Dilated comprehensive exam by eye care provider
Reference Nathan et al. (1991) Singer et al. (1992) Klein et al. (1984) Panel consensus
C.
Onset of Diabetes After Age 30 For patients diagnosed with diabetes 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I Level of Evidence B B
Intervention Initial eye exam after 3 to 5 years' duration for earlyonset (
Reference Klein et al. (1992) Klein et al. (1989)
D.
Refer to Baseline Exam Within 3 Months After Diagnosis A significant minority of patients 30 years of age or older may have retinopathy at the time of diagnosis.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I Level of Evidence B B
Intervention Initial eye exam within 3 months after diagnosis for olderonset (
Reference Klein et al. (1989) Klein et al. (1992)
Javitt et al. (1990) Javitt et al. (1989) Dasbach et al. (1991)
I I I
B B B
E.
On Insulin or HbA1c 8.0 After 1 Year of Disease A yearly eye exam for olderonset patients on insulin (Type II diabetes) is cost effective in preventing vision loss.
Follow-Up Exam Within 2 Years if Baseline or Any Subsequent Exam Normal An every-other-year examination is cost effect in preventing vision loss in noninsulinrequiring older-onset diabetic patients.
F.
99
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence B
Intervention Yearly eye exam for poorly controlled noninsulin-requiring older onset patients Every-other-year eye exam for well-controlled noninsulin-requiring older-onset patients
Reference Klein et al. (1995)
Dasbach et al. (1991)
IIa
B
G.
Follow-Up Exam Yearly if Baseline or Any Subsequent Exam Normal Poor control in non-insulin-requiring diabetes is associated with a risk for retinopathy progression similar to that for patients on insulin.
100
References: 1.
Dasbach EJ, Fryback DG, Newcomb PA, Klein R, Klein BE. Cost effectiveness of strategies for detecting diabetic retinopathy.
Med Care 1991; 29:20-39.
Gardner TW, Klein R, Moss SE, Ferris FL III, Remaley NA. Digoxin does not accelerate progression of diabetic retinopathy.
Diabetes Care 1995; 18(2):237-40.
Javitt JC, Canner JK, Sommer A. Cost effectiveness of current approaches to the control of retinopathy in Type I diabetes.
Ophthalmology 1989; 96:255-264.
Javitt JC, Canner JK, Frank RG, Steinwachs DM, Sommer A. Detecting and treating retinopathy in patients with Type I diabetes mellitus.
A health policy model.
Ophthalmology 1990; 97:483495.
Klein R et al.
The epidemiology of ocular problems in diabetes mellitus.
In Ocular Problems in Diabetes Mellitus.
Ferman SS (ed.) Boston, MA: Blackwell Scientific Publications 1992, pp 153.
Klein R, Klein BE, Moss SE.
The Wisconsin epidemiological study of diabetic retinopathy: a review.
Diabetes Metab Rev 1989; 5:559-570.
Klein R, Klein BE, Moss SE.
Visual impairment in diabetes.
Ophthalmology 1984; 91:1-9.
Klein R, Moss SE, Klein BE.
Is gross proteinuria a risk factor for the incidence of proliferative diabetic retinopathy? Ophthalmology 1993; 100:1140-1146.
Klein R, Klein BEK, Moss SE, Davis MD, DeMits DI. Glycated hemoglobin predicts the incidence and progression of diabetic retinopathy.
JAMA 1988; 260:2864-71.
Mayfield JA, Reiber GE, Nelson RG, Greene T.
A foot risk classification system to predict diabetic amputation in Pima Indians.
Diabetes Care 1996; 19:704-709.
Nathan DM, Fogel HA, Godine JE, Lou PL, D'Amico DJ, Regan CD, Topping TM. Role of diabetologist in evaluating diabetic retinopathy.
Diabetes Care 1991; 14:26-33.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
101
12.
Savage S, Estacio RO, Jeffers B, Schrier RW. Urinary albumin excretion as a predictor of diabetic retinopathy, neuropathy, and cardiovascular disease in NIDDM.
Diabetes Care 1996; 19:12431248.
Singer DE, Nathan DM, Fogel HA, Schachat AP. Screening for diabetic retinopathy.
Ann Int Med 1992; 116:660-671.
Sunness JS: The pregnant woman's eye.
Surv Ophthalmol 1988; 32:219-238.
Valez R et al.
Ophthalmologists vs retinal photographs in screening for diabetic retinopathy.
Clin Res 1987; 35:363A.
13.
14.
15.
102
Module R: Renal Disease Treatment
103
Management of Diabetes Mellitus
1
Pers o n w i th di ab etes
2
Is pa ti en t m e d i ca ll y st a b le ? N 3
Y
Provi d e a p p rop r ia t e tre a tm e nt an d s tabi li za ti on
Evalua te an d m a na ge pe r a p p ro p ri ate algo ri th m (s) 4
Glyce m ic Co n tro l Me di ca ti on Nu tritio n Ho m e Moni to r ing Ph ysi ca l Act ivi ty
Mod ule G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot eva lu a t io n w i th i n pa s t ye ar, r is k fa ctors pres en t, o r a cti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
F oot Care: Mo dule F
7
N o eye e va lua t io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pres en t, o r k no w n to be a t h ig h ri s k fo r vis u a l l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
Mod ule E
9
No u ri n a lysi s w ith in p as t ye a r, m i cro a l b um in ur ia o r m a cr o a lb um i n uri a pres en t; o r e l e vated crea t in i ne ? N
10 Y
Re n al Dise ase Tre atmen t: M o du le R
11
Bloo d p re s s u re 
12 Y
Hypert ension Management:
Modu le H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lipid Contro l:
Mo du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- u p i n 1 ye a r
Fo ll ow- u p a s in d i ca te d to e val uate /tre a t
104
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Renal Disease Treatment Evaluation 1
Person with Diabetes of at least 5 years' duration and age 
2
Has the patient recieved nutrition and lifestyle counseling? [B] Y 4
3 N
Provide appropriate counseling
Check serum creatinine
5
Serum creatinine 
6 Y
Refer to Nephrology for Co-Management
7
Serum creatinine 
Y
8
Perform initial dip-stick assessment of proteinuria
9
10
Protein 
Y
Any non diabetic causes for increased protein? [D]
11 Y
Treat as indicated
N 13
12
Life expectancy 
Protein 
Y
N
N 14
Check serum creatinine and dip-stick protein in 1 year (Box 4)
Continue on Page 3
105
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Renal Disease Treatment Screening Continued from Page 1
15
Measure microalbuminuria and urine creatinine [F]
16
Urine Alb/Cr 
Y 18
N
Is patient hypertensive? [H]
Y
Consider treatment with ACE inhibitor.
Go to: Hypertension Module H
N 19
Screen again in one year for microalbuminuria (Go to Box 14)
20
Assess glycemic control
21
HbA1 c is above target range? [I]
22 Y
Go to: Glycemic Control Module G
N
23
Are ACE inhibitors contraindicated? [J] N
24 Y
Consider reduced protein diet.
Cardiovascular risk factor reduction.
Annual serum creatinine and urine for microalbuminuria.
[K]
25
Consider ACE inhibitor.
Monitor 24 hr. urine protein and creatinine every 6 months [L]
106
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Renal Disease Treatment Management
Continued from Page 1
26
24-hour urine for creatinine and protein
27
24-hour urine protein 
Y
Retinopathy present? [N] N 29
Y
31
Refer to Nephrology for evaluation and treatment 32
Is patient hypertensive? [H]
30 Y
Go to: Hypertension Module H Consider treatment with ACE inhibitor
N
Assess glycemic control
Go to Page 1, Box 13 33
HbA1 c above target range? [I]
34 Y
Go to: Glycemic Control Module G
N 36
35
Are ACE inhibitors contraindicated? [J] N
Y
Consider reduced protein diet.
Cardiovascular risk factor reduction.
Annual serum creatinine and urine for microalbuminuria.
[K]
37
Consider ACE inhibitor.
Monitor 24 hr. urine protein and creatinine every 6 months [L]
107
Module R Renal Disease Treatment
ANNOTATIONS
108
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Renal Disease Treatment Module R A. Person with Diabetes of at Least 5 Years' Duration and Age 
Deviations from these recommendations are shown below: TABLE OF EVIDENCE Treatment and Diagnostics Age limit to screening for microalbuminuria Urine specimen Veterans Affairs No upper age limit, rather no screening if life expectancy 
Random with albumin/creatinine ratio Starts after tests show that the serum creatinine is negative and there is no proteinuria Albumin/creatinine ratio 
Scope
Timed urine collection or an albumin-to-creatinine ratio in a random urine specimen Both proteinuria and albuminuria
Nephrology referral
1994: GFR 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I I I I Level of Evidence A A A A A
# 1
Variables Consider ACE inhibitor in absence of hypertension Consider ACE inhibitor in presence of hypertension Monitor every 6 months Screening for diabetic renal disease
2
Reference Viberti 1994; Marre 1988; Marre 1991; Mathiesen 1991 Lewis 1993
3 4
Bennett et al. 1995 Bennett et al. 1995; American Diabetes Association 1994, 1995, 1997
I I I
C C C
109
B.
Has Patient Received Nutrition and Lifestyle Counseling? 1.
Regular physical activity a.
Minimum goal ·
Regular physical activity Small increase over current level Progression to level that achieves cardiovascular fitness (e.g., 30 minutes of brisk walking most days of the week) Muscular strengthening and joint flexibility
·
·
·
b.
Recommendations (1) Essential components of a systematic, individualized exercise prescription include the appropriate mode, intensity, duration, frequency, and progression of physical activity.
Assess risk, preferably with exercise test to guide prescription.
Advise medically supervised programs for moderate- to high-risk patients.
Consider level of fitness, medications that may influence heart rate, risk of cardiovascular or orthopedic injury, individual preferences, and individual program objectives.
Encourage minimum of 30 to 60 minutes of moderate intensity activity, 3 to 4 times weekly (e.g., walking, jogging, cycling or other aerobic activity) supplemented by an increase in daily lifestyle activities (e.g., walking breaks at work, using stairs, gardening, household work).
Minimum benefit, 5 to 6 hours per week.
Light to moderate physical activity requires sustained, rhythmic muscular movements, is equivalent to sustained walking, performed at less than 60% of maximum heart rate for age.
Maximum heart rate equals roughly 220 beats per minute minus age.
(2) (3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
2.
Smoking Cessation a.
Goal ·
Complete cessation 110
b.
Recommendations (1) A cigarette smoker is defined as one who has smoked at least 100 cigarettes and who currently smokes cigarettes.
Regular exposure to tobacco smoke is defined as the occurrence of tobacco smoking anywhere in the home for more than 3 days each week.
A smokeless tobacco user is defined as one who has snuffed or chewed tobacco at least 20 times and who currently uses snuff or chewing tobacco.
Every person who smokes should be offered smoking cessation treatment at each visit.
Ask and record the tobacco use status of every patient.
Cessation treatment as brief as 3 minutes is effective.
The more intense the treatment, the more effective the abstinence.
Nicotine replacement therapy (nicotine patches or gum), cliniciandelivered social support, and skills training are effective components of smoking cessation treatment.
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5) (6) (7) (8)
3.
Stress Management a.
Goal ·
Understand and modify stress
b.
Recommendations (1) Ways to cope with stress: Relaxation, emergency stress stoppers, exercise, reduced chemical stresses.
Stress management skills: Avoid, adapt, alter, speaking up, and time management.
(2)
4.
Alcohol Counseling a.
Goal · ·
Screening to detect problem drinking; and Screening to detect hazardous drinking 111
b.
Recommendations (1) Use of a standardized instrument (CAGE, MAST, AUDIT, etc) to screen for alcohol use is recommended.
Ask patients to describe the quantity, frequency, and other characteristics of their use of wine, beer, and liquor, including frequency of intoxication and tolerance of the effect of alcohol.
Suggested safe drinking 2 drinks per day in men and 1 drink per day in women.
One drink is defined as 12 ounces of beer, one 5ounce glass of wine, or 1.5 fluid ounces (one jigger) of distilled spirits.
Refer to alcohol treatment program if evidence of problem or hazardous drinking.
At risk is defined by the standardized instrument or as 5 drinks per day in men, 3 drinks per day in women, frequent intoxication or intoxication resulting in hyperglycemia.
Heavy drinking is defined as 5 or more drinks, once or twice each weekend.
Persons who drink should be informed of the dangers of driving or other potentially dangerous activities after drinking.
Use of alcohol should be discouraged in persons younger than the legal age for drinking.
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
5.
Basic Nutrition Counseling (see also Module GN) a.
Referral to Registered Dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, life style modifications, and potential food/drug interactions if applicable.
Referral may include those patients with: · · · · · ·
Newly diagnosed diabetes Diabetes out of control Diet-related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
b.
Goal Fat, cholesterol, and sodium consumption follow nutrition recommendations ·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise, and medication treatment plan to maintain blood glucose and lipids within target range and electrolytes within normal range.
112
· ·
Maintain kidney function and/or slow progression of disease.
Maintain nutrition health.
c.
Recommendations Eat a variety of foods daily: (1) Five servings of fruits and vegetables, six servings of breads, cereals, or legumes each day, two servings each of low-fat dairy and meat products, and use fat sparingly.
(2) Calories to achieve or maintain reasonable weight (25-35 calories per kg/body weight balanced with energy expenditure).
Encourage weight loss as appropriate.
Limit alcohol to equal to or less than 2 drinks a day.
Discuss role and effect of diet, weight loss or maintenance, physical activity, smoking cessation, and medications, hypertension, and renal disease.
(3) (4) (5)
d.
Hyperlipidemia: (1) Fats restricted according to risk factors and severity of serum lipid levels.
Emphasize consumption of fish, poultry prepared without skin, lean meats, and low-fat dairy products.
Emphasize monounsaturated fats as preferred fat (e.g., olive, canola, peanut or avocado oil).
Step I: Fat 
Step II: Fat 
If triglycerides 
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
e.
Hypertension: (1) Limit sodium consumption to 
113
(b)
salty or highly processed foods such as smoked, cured or highly salted meats, bouillon and standard canned soups, commercial products with high salt content, foods processed in brine, and salt seasonings and sauces.
(c) (d) (e) (f)
(2) Maintain or increase foods high in potassium or if applicable, take physician-prescribed potassium supplement.
f. End-Stage Renal Disease: Protein based on 10% of total calories: (1) (2) Decrease meat and dairy portions, and For a patient with diabetic nephropathy, restrict protein calories to 0.8 g/kg
g.
Individualize sodium, potassium, phosphorus, and calcium: (1) (2) Ingest more vegetables (3-5 servings/day), and Moderate amount of fruits (2-4 servings/day) consumption
h. 6.
Vitamin/mineral supplementation as appropriate.
Annotations to Intensive Nutrition Counseling Referral for Nutrition Counseling Refer to registered dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, life style modifications, and food/drug interactions if applicable.
Referral may include those patients with: · · · · · ·
Newly diagnosed diabetes Diabetes out of control Diet related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
b.
Goal ·
Fat, cholesterol, and sodium consumption follow nutrition prescription;
114
·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise, and medication treatment plan to maintain: Blood glucose and lipids within target range and keep electrolytes within normal range; Kidney function and/or slow progression of disease; and Nutrition health.
c.
Recommendations (1) (2) Adjust goals and/or nutrition prescription.
Review records and evaluate adherence and understanding of: · · · · · · ·
percent fat intake and type of fat; protein intake; carbohydrate intake; soluble fiber intake; physical activity; alcohol intake; and tobacco consumption
(3) (4)
Provide home-management training and materials.
Assess change in weight, tobacco habit, physical activity, medications, and laboratory values.
Review educational materials on: · · · · · ·
(5)
food labeling; recipe modification; soluble fiber; weight reduction, if applicable; dining out; and if change in medication, potential food/drug interaction.
115
C.
Serum Creatinine Greater than 2.5 mg/dL Although the ADA recommends referral at 2 mg/dL, the consensus of our VA panel was that 2.5 mg/dL was more appropriate for our population.
Although the ADA recommends referral, when the GFR begins to decline substantially (
1.73m -2), difficulties in obtaining an accurate collection of a 24-hour urine precluded its recommendation as a routine test.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa Level of Evidence C
Intervention Creatinine level at which referral to nephrologist is appropriate
Reference ADA 1994, 1997; VA Consensus Panel 1997
D.
Any Nondiabetic Causes for Increased Protein? "Heavy exercise, urinary tract infection, acute febrile illnesses, and heart failure may transiently increase urinary albumin excretion; thus, screening should be postponed in these situations.
Similarly, drugs that may alter urinary protein excretion rate, such as nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory agents or angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors, should be avoided during screening."
(Bennett et al. 1995; ADA 1996).
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Intervention Conditions causing transient proteinuria
Reference Bennett al.1995; ADA 1996
et
FACTORS THAT TRANSIENTLY INTERFERE WITH URINARY SCREENING FOR ALBUMINURIA Increases in Albuminuria Blood in urine Congestive heart failure Exercise Excessive protein intake Fever Uncontrolled diabetes Uncontrolled hypertension Urinary tract infection Vaginal fluid contamination of specimen Decreases in Albuminuria ACE Malnutrition Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs
E.
Life Expectancy 
The NKF guidelines suggest stopping screening at age 70, but do not 116
give a justification for this cutoff point.
Consequently, an age cutoff point has been replaced with a life expectancy cutoff point instead.
The 1997 ADA recommendations acknowledge that the microalbuminuria is a less specific marker for development of overt diabetic nephropathy and ESRD in NIDDM, in part because of higher death rates from coronary artery disease.
They do not identify an age cutoff point for screening, however.
Mogensen (1987) showed that 20-25% of patients with Type II diabetes and microalbuminuria eventually go on to ESRD, compared with 80% of Type I patients, with the discrepancy primarily attributed to premature cardiovascular mortality.
Type II diabetic patients with microalbuminuria who progress to renal failure, progress more rapidly (i.e., years vs. decades) than those with Type I (Gall et al.1991; Ordonez 
To estimate the life expectancy of the person you are treating, refer to Glycemic Control, Module G, box 8, annotation G as well as to Exhibits GI and G2.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa IIa IIa IIa Level of Evidence C C C C C
Variables Reference No need to screen for Bennett et al. 1995; microalbuminuria if life ADA 1997; expectancy 
F.
Measure Microalbuminuria and Urine Creatinine Recommend either a random urine sample for microalbuminuria and creatinine or a timed urine specimen.
Strips are available to detect albuminuria as low as 20 mg/L but are not the recommended method, because they do not take into account possible errors from alterations in urine concentration.
Cutoff points for the various specimen types listed below are adopted from ADA (1995).
DIAGNOSIS OF PROTEINURIA IN DIABETES MELLITUS Category of Urine Protein Excretion Normal albuminuria Microalbuminuria Macroalbuminuria 24-hour Urine Collection 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa IIa Level of Evidence C C
Variables Cutoff points for normal vs. microalbuminuria vs. macroalbuminuria
Reference Bennett et al. 1995; ADA 1997
117
G.
Urine Alb/Cr 
When repeated, make sure you have addressed the factors that can transiently elevate urine albumin (see table above).
If the second specimen is also 
If the second is 
"Multiple urinary measurements are necessary because as much as a 30-50% variability in day-to-day urine microalbumin measurements may occur" (Murray 1996).
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Variables Need to repeat microalbuminuria testing until 2 of 3 are positive Reference Bennett et al. 1995; Murray 1996 Strength of Recommendation I I Level of Evidence C C
H.
Is Patient Hypertensive? Hypertension is defined below.
CLASSIFICATION OF BLOOD PRESSURE FOR ADULTS * AGED 18 YEARS AND OLDER
Category Normal+ High Normal Hypertension++ Stage 1 (mild) Stage 2 (moderate) Stage 3 (severe) Stage 4 (very severe)
Systolic, mm Hg 
Diastolic, mm Hg 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Variables Reference Strength of Recommendatio n I Level of Evidence C
Classification of BP in Adults
Rocella 1993
Not taking antihypertensive drugs and not acutely ill.
When systolic and diastolic pressure fall into different categories, the higher category should be selected to classify the individual's blood pressure status.
For instance, 160/92 mm Hg should be classified as stage 2, and 180/120 mm Hg should be classified as stage 4.
Isolated systolic hypertension is defined as a systolic blood pressure of 140 mm Hg or more and a diastolic blood pressure of less than 90 mm Hg and staged appropriately (e.g., 170/85 mm Hg is defined as stage 2 isolated systolic hypertension).
In addition to classifying stages of hypertension on the basis of average blood pressure levels, the clinician should specify presence or absence of target organ disease and additional risk factors.
For example, a patient with diabetes and a blood pressure of 142/94 mm Hg plus left ventricular hypertrophy should be classified as having "stage 1 hypertension with target organ disease (left ventricular hypertrophy) and with another major risk factor (diabetes)."
This specificity is important for risk classification and management.
Normal blood pressure with respect to cardiovascular risk is less than 120 mm Hg systolic and less than 80 mm Hg diastolic.
However, unusually low readings should be evaluated for clinical significance.
The stages of hypertension are based on the average of two or more readings taken at each of two or more visits after an initial screening.
*
118
I.
Is Glycemic Control Above Target Range? If the patient's HgA1c is not within the target range set for this patient in the glycemic module, the patient should be re-evaluated using the Glycemic Control Module G. TABLE OF EVIDENCE Variables Contraindications to ACE inhibitors Reference Physicians' Desk Reference, 1996 Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
J.
Are ACE Inhibitors Contraindicated? Contraindications include: Absolute: Pregnancy, presence of hyperkalemia (advanced renal insufficiency or hyporeninemic hypoaldosteronism), known allergy to ACE inhibitors.
Known bilateral renal artery stenosis, advanced renal disease.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Variables Contraindications to ACE inhibitors Reference Physicians' Desk Reference, 1996 Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Relative:
K.
Consider Reduced Protein Diet From the ADA (1997): "In people with NIDDM and overt diabetic nephropathy, restriction of dietary protein has been shown to retard the progression to renal failure.
There is some evidence that this may also be true in NIDDM.
Therefore, a protein intake of approximately the adult recommended dietary allowance, 0.8 grams per kilogram of body weight per day (less than 10% of calories), is recommended for individuals with evidence of macroalbuminuria.
In IDDM and NIDDM patients with microalbuminuria, there is inconclusive evidence that a low-protein diet slows the progression of nephropathy."
1.
Cardiovascular Risk Factor Reduction Persons with diabetes and with microalbuminuria are at high risk of developing macrovascular disease.
"At least three retrospective and three prospective studies have shown an increase in cardiovascular-related mortality in patients with Type II diabetes who have microalbuminuria.
In a prospective study performed by Mattock, after a mean follow-up of only 3.4 years, 28% of the group with microalbuminuria had died, and 80% of these deaths were due to cardiovascular conditions" (Murray 1996).
The ADA recommends aggressive management of cardiovascular risk factors such as dyslipidemia, smoking cessation, avoidance of a sedentary lifestyle, and blood pressure regulation (ADA 1994, 1995, 1997).
119
2.
Annual Serum Creatinine and Microalbuminuria The ADA (1994, 1995, 1997) and the NKF (Bennett et al. 1995) recommend this screening frequency.
L. Consider ACE Inhibitors and Monitor Urine Protein and Creatinine Evidence for ACE inhibitors being effective in Type II diabetes: At least one long-term (5 years) randomized, placebo-controlled trial in normotensive Type II diabetes patients showed a decrease in proteinuria (Ravid 1993).
However, while evidence for efficacy of ACE inhibitors in Type II diabetes in decreasing proteinuria is felt to be conclusive, their efficacy in chronic renal insufficiency remains to be determined.
1.
Frequency of Monitoring After Therapy The NKF: "After initiation of therapy with an ACE inhibitor, the efficacy of this intervention should be monitored by assessing the albumin creatinine ratio every 3 to 6 months.
Because the urine albumin excretion rate would be expected to increase by approximately 10% to 30% per year, stabilization of the albumin creatinine ratio or a reduction in this ratio by up to 50% should be expected."
It is also recommended to "check serum potassium and creatinine one week after initiation of therapy."
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation IIa Level of Evidence B
# 1
Variables Start ACE inhibitor in absence of hypertension: primary evidence Start ACE inhibitor in absence of hypertension: secondary evidence pertains to IDDM but likely to be applicable to NIDDM Start ACE inhibitor with hypertension primary evidence Start ACE inhibitor with hypertension (secondary evidence in IDDM)
Reference Ravid 1993
2
Viberti 1994; Marre 1988; Marre 1991; Mathiesen 1991 Lewis 1993
I I I I
A A A A
3
I
A
4
Lewis 1993
I
A
M.
24-Hour Urine Protein 
Is Retinopathy Present? If any level of retinopathy is present, proteinuria has a high probability of being secondary to diabetes.
N.
120
References 1.
American Diabetes Association.
Standards of medical care for patients with diabetes mellitus.
Diabetes Care 1995; 18:8-15 2.
American Diabetes Association.
Census development conference on the diagnosis and management of nephropathy in patients with diabetes mellitus.
Diabetes Care 1994; 17:1357-1361 3.
American Diabetes Association.
Position Statement: Diabetic Nephropathy.
Diabetes Care 1997; 20(S1):S24-S27 4.
Bennett PH, Haffner S, Kasiske BL, Keane WF, Mogensen CE, Parving H-H, Steffes MW, Striker GE.
Screening and management of microalbuminuria in patients with diabetes mellitus.
Recom-mendations to the Scientific Advisory Board of the National Kidney Foundation from an ad hoc committee of the Council on Diabetes Mellitus of the National Kidney Foundation.
Am J Kid Dis 1995; 25:107-112 5.
Chavers BM, Mauer SM, Ramsay RC, Steffes MW. Relationship Between Retinal and Glomerular Lesions in IDDM Patients.
Diabetes 1994;43:441-446 6.
Cruickshanks KJ, Ritter LL, Klein R, Moss SE.
The Association of Microalbuminuria with Diabetic Retinopathy.
Ophthalmology 1993; 100(6):862867 7.
Franz M, Horton ES, Bantle JP, Beebe CA, Brunzell JD, Coulston AM, Henry RR, Hoogwerf BJ, Stacpoole PW. Technical Review: Nutrition Principles for the Management of Diabetes and Related Complications.
Diabetes Care 1994; 17:490518 8.
Gall M, Rossing P, Skott P, Damsbo P, Vaag A, Bech K, Dejgaard A, Lauritzen M, Lauritzen E. Prevalence of micro- and macroalbuminuria, arterial hypertension, retinopathy and large vessel disease in European Type II diabetic patients.
Diabetologia 1991; 34:655-661 9.
Lewis EJ, Hunsicker LG, Bain RP, Rodhe RD, for the European Microalbuminuria for the Collaborative Study Group.
The Effect of Angiotensin Converting Enzyme Inhibition on Diabetic Nephropathy.
New Eng J Med. 1993;329:1456-1462
121
10.
Marre M, Chatellier G, Leblanc H, Guyenne T-T, Menard J, Passa P. Prevention of Diabetic Nephropathy with Enalapril in Normo-tensive Diabetics with Microalbuminuria.
BMJ 1988;297:1092-1095 11.
Marre M, Hallab M, Billiard A, Le Jeune JJ, Bled F, Girault A, Fressinaud P. Small Doses of Ramipril to Reduce Microalbuminuria in Diabetic Patients with Incipient Nephropathy Independently of Blood Pressure Changes.
J Cardiovasc Pharmacol 1991; 18(S2): S165-168 12.
Mathiesen ER, Hommel E, Giese J, Parving H-H. Efficacy of Captopril in Postponing Nephropathy in Normotensive Insulin-Dependent Diabetic Patients with Microalbuminuria.
BMJ 1991; 303:81-87 Microalbuminuria is a predictor of clinical diabetic 13.
Mogensen CE. nephropathy.
Kidney Int 1987; 31:673-689 14.
Mudaliar S, Henry R. Role of Glycemic Control and Protein Restriction in Clinical Management of Diabetic Kidney Disease.
Endocrine Practice May/June 1996; 2(3): 220-226 15.
Murray JE. Microalbuminuria in Type II Diabetes.
Endocrine Practice 1996; 2:211-214 16.
Ordonez JD, Hiatt RA.
Comparison of Type II and Type I diabetics treated for end-stage renal disease in a large prepaid health plan population.
Nephron 1989; 51:524-529 17.
Physicians' Desk Reference.
Montvale NJ: Medical Economics Co. 1996 18.
Ravid M, Savin H, Jutrin I, Bental T, Katz B, Lishner M. Long-term stabilizing effect of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on plasma creatinine and on proteinuria in normotensive Type II diabetic patients.
Ann Intern Med 1993; 118:577-581 19.
Rocella E.J.
The Fifthe Report of the Joint National Committee on Detection, Evaluation and Treatment of High Blood Pressure (JNC V) Arch.
Int. Med. 1993; 153: 162, 164-174 20.
Viberti GC, Mogensen CE, Groop L, Pauls JF, for the European Microalbuminuria Captopril Study Group.
The Effect of Captopril on the Progression to Clinical Proteinuria in Patients with Insulin-Dependent Diabetes and Microalbuminuria.
JAMA 1994; 271:275-279
122
21.
Walker JD, Bending JJ, Dodds RA, Mattock MB, Murrells TJ, Keen H, Viberti GC. Restriction of Dietary Protein and Progression of Renal Failture in Diabetic Nephropathy.
Lancet 1989; 2:1411-1415 22.
Zeller K, Whittaker E, Sullivan L, Raskin P, Jacobson HR. Effect of Restricting Dietary Protein on the Progression of Renal Failure in Patients with Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
NEJM 1991; 324:78-84
123
Module E: Hypertension Management
124
Management of Diabetes Mellitus 1
Pe rs on w i th di ab etes
2
Is p a ti e n t m edi ca ll y st able? N 3
Y
Pro vi d e app ropr ia te treatm e nt an d s tab i li za ti o n
Evalua te and m a nage per app ropri a te a lg o ri th m (s) 4
Glycem ic Co ntro l Medi ca ti on Nu tri ti o n Ho m e Moni to r ing Ph ysi ca l Activi ty
Module G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot evalua tion w i th i n pas t ye a r, r is k fa ct ors pre s en t, o r acti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
F oot Ca re: Mo du le F
7
N o eye evaluat io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pre s en t, or k no w n to be at high ri s k fo r vis u al l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
Mo dule E
9
N o uri n alysi s w ith in pas t ye ar, m i croa l b um in ur ia or m a cr oalbu m i n u ri a pre s en t; or el e va ted creat in i ne? N
10 Y
Renal Dise ase T re at me n t: Mo du le R
11
Bloo d pres s u re 
12 Y
Hype rte ns ion M ana g e men t:
M o du le H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lipid Co ntro l:
Mo du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- up i n 1 ye ar
Fo ll ow- u p as in di ca te d to eval u at e /tre a t
125
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Hypertension Management 1
Person with diabetes and high blood pressure (BP 
2
Is secondary cause suspected? [B]
3 Y
Order additional work-up Consider referral to manage secondary cause before proceeding with this algorithm [C]
N
4
Stage 3 or 4 Hypertension [A] N
Y
5
Stage 1 or 2 HTN with end organ damage, strong indication for therapy and patient willing to comply with medication? [D] N 6
Y
Attempt blood pressure control with nutrition and lifestyle counseling [E]
7
Measure blood pressure at each office visit [F]
8
Adequate control? [G] N
9 Y
Continue current treatment Go to Box 7at next regular visit
Continue on Page 2
126
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Hypertension Management
Continued from Page 1
10
Patient with DM and severe HTN requires therapy
11
Begin drug monotherapy.
Provide nutrition and lifestyle counseling [H,E]
12
Adequate control and tolerability with drug monotherapy? [F] N
13
Change management: 1.
Increase initial drug, substitute for new agent, add another agent from a different class - Refer to MAP Attachment 2.
Reassess weight, alcohol, acute stress activity, acute medical problems 3.
Consider referral to specialist
14
Adequate control and tolerability? [G] N
15
Re-evaluate and change management (see Box 13)
16
Adequate control and tolerability? [G] N
17 Y
Continue current treatment Go to Box 7 at next regular visit
18
Consider the possibility of resistant HTN and consult specialist [I]
127
Module H Hypertension Management
ANNOTATIONS
128
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Hypertension Management Annotations Module H Person with Diabetes Mellitus and High Blood Pressure Hypertension is defined by the 5th Report of the Joint National Committee on Detection, Evaluation and Treatment of High Blood Pressure and the following: CLASSIFICATION OF BLOOD PRESSURE FOR ADULTS AGED 18 YEARS AND OLDER* Systolic, mm/Hg Normal High Normal Hypertension++ Stage 1 (mild) Stage 2 (moderate) Stage 3 (severe) Stage 4 (very severe) +
A.
Diastolic, mm/Hg 
<
*Not taking anti-hypertensive drugs, not acutely ill.
When systolic and diastolic pressure fall into different categories, the higher category should be selected to classify the individual's blood pressure status.
For instance, 160/92 mm Hg should be classified as stage 2, and 180/120 mm Hg should be classified as stage 4.
Isolated systolic hypertension is defined as a systolic blood pressure of 140 mm Hg or more and a diastolic blood pressure of less than 90 mm Hg and staged appropriately (e.g., 170/85 mm Hg is defined as stage 2 isolated systolic hypertension).
In addition to classifying stages of hypertension on the basis of average blood pressure levels, the clinician should specify presence or absence of target-organ disease and additional risk factors.
For example, a patient with diabetes and a blood pressure of 142/94 mm Hg, plus left ventricular hypertrophy should be classified as having "stage 1 hypertension with target-organ disease (left ventricular hypertrophy) and with another major risk factor (diabetes)."
This specificity is important for risk classification and management.
+Optimal blood pressure with respect to cardiovascular risk is less than 120 mm Hg systolic and less than 80 mm Hg diastolic.
However, unusually low readings should be evaluated for clinical significance.
++Based on the average of two or more readings taken at each of two or more visits after an initial screening.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Variables Reference Classification of BP in Rocella 1993 Adults
B.
Is Secondary Cause Suspected? The term "secondary hypertension" implies that a patient's blood pressure elevation is a result of an underlying discoverable disease process.
Secondary causes account for only a small percentage of all documented cases of hypertension, but their detection is important, as appropriate medical intervention may be curative and lead to reversal of hypertension.
129
Evaluate for features suggestive of rare secondary hypertension.
Suspect a diagnosis of secondary hypertension in patients with abrupt onset of symptomatic hypertension, sudden loss of blood pressure control after many years of stability on drug therapy, drug resistant hypertension, and in those individuals with no family history of hypertension.
Differential diagnosis of secondary hypertension includes: · · · · · · · ·
Thyroid disease (hyper- or hypo-) Cushing's syndrome Pheochromocytoma Primary aldosteronism Renovascular disease Renal parenchymal disease Aortic coarctation Intracerebral pathology
C.
Order Additional Work-up Early discussion or consultation with an appropriate subspecialist may lead to the most accurate and cost-effective work-up.
Clinical Findings: Recommended Test/Referral: Features of reno-vascular hypertension: Initial onset age 50 years or older Diastolic blood pressure higher than 115 mm Hg Hemorrhages and exudates in the fundi Presence of abdominal bruit over renal arteries Diminishing blood pressure control Signs of arterial narrowing Women of child-bearing age Features of pheochromocytoma: There is a relative contraindication to IVPs in persons with diabetes, so they are not recommended.
There is no single test for reno-vascular hypertension.
Consult experts in your institution.
There are a variety of screening tests for reno-vascular hypertension, depending on equipment and expertise in institutions.
Paroxysms Headaches Palpitations Perspiration
24-hour urine for metanephrines.
Repeat with urinary catecholamines if metanephrines are normal or your suspicions are high.
Consider referral to expert.
Pallor
Extremely labile blood pressure Cushingoid features Low serum potassium in absence of diuretics on two occasions Isolated proteinuria on two occasions Elevated serum creatinine, abnormal urine sediment, hematuria on two occasions or structural renal abnormality 1
24-hour urine for free cortisol Consider primary aldosteronism and referral to Nephrology or Endocrinology 24-hour urine for protein and creatinine clearance Consider referral to Nephrology
There are a variety of screening tests for reno-vascular hypertension, depending on equipment and expertise in institutions.
130
D.
Stage 1 or 2 Hypertension with End Organ Damage
MANIFESTATIONS OF TARGET-ORGAN DISEASE Organ System Cardiac Manifestations Clinical, electrocardiographic, or radiologic evidence of coronary artery disease; left ventricular hypertrophy or "strain" by electrocardiography or left ventricular hypertrophy by echocardiography; left ventricular dysfunction, or cardiac failure.
Transient ischemic attack or stroke Absence of one or more major pulses in extremities (except for dorsalis pedis) with or without intermittent claudication; aneurysm.
Serum creatinine 
Cerebrovascular Peripheral vascular Renal Retinopathy TABLE OF EVIDENCE
Variables Definitions and manifestations of targetorgan disease
Reference Rocella 1993
Strength of Recommendation I
Level of Evidence C
E.
Attempt Blood Pressure Control with Nutrition and Lifestyle Counseling 1.
Regular Physical Activity a.
Minimum Goal · · ·
·
Regular physical activity Small increase over current level Progression to level that achieves cardiovascular fitness (e.g., 30 minutes of brisk walking most days of the week) Muscular strengthening and joint flexibility
b.
Recommendations (1) Essential components of a systematic, individualized exercise prescription include the appropriate mode, intensity, duration, frequency, and progression of physical activity.
Assess risk, preferably with exercise test to guide prescription.
Advise medically supervised programs for moderate to high-risk patients.
131
(2) (3)
(4)
Consider level of fitness, medications that may influence heart rate, risk of cardiovascular or orthopedic injury, individual preferences, and individual program objectives.
Encourage minimum of 30 to 60 minutes of moderate intensity activity, 3 to 4 times weekly (e.g., walking, jogging, cycling or other aerobic activity) supplemented by an increase in daily lifestyle activities (e.g., walking breaks at work, using stairs, gardening, household work).
Minimum benefit, 5 to 6 hours per week.
Light to moderate physical activity requires sustained, rhythmic muscular movements, is equivalent to sustained walking, performed at less than 60% of maximum heart rate for age.
Maximum heart rate equals roughly 220 beats per minute minus age.
(5)
(6)
2.
Smoking Cessation a. b. Goal Complete cessation Recommendations (1) A cigarette smoker is defined as having smoked at least 100 cigarettes and currently smokes cigarettes.
Regular exposure to tobacco smoke is defined as the occurrence of tobacco smoking anywhere in the home for more than 3 days each week.
A smokeless tobacco user is defined as having snuffed or chewed tobacco at least 20 times and currently uses snuff or chewing tobacco.
Every person who smokes should be offered smoking cessation treatment at each visit.
Ask and record the tobacco-use status of every patient.
Cessation treatment as brief as 3 minutes is effective.
The more intense the treatment, the more effective the abstinence.
Nicotine replacement therapy (nicotine patches or gum), cliniciandelivered social support, and skills training are effective components of smoking cessation treatment.
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5) (6) (7) (8)
3.
Stress Management 132
a. b.
Goal Understand and modify stress Recommendations (1) Ways to cope with stress: Relax, emergency stress stoppers, exercise, reduce chemical stresses.
Stress management skills: Avoid, adapt, alter, speaking up, and time management.
(2)
4.
Alcohol Counseling a.
Goals · ·
Screen to detect problem drinking Screen to detect hazardous drinking
b.
Recommendations (1) Ask patients to describe the quantity, frequency, other characteristics of their use of wine, beer, and liquor, including frequency of intoxication and tolerance of the effect of alcohol.
Suggested safe drinking 2 drinks per day in men and 1 drink per day in women.
One drink is defined as 12 ounces of beer, one 5-ounce glass of wine, or 1.5 fluid ounces (one jigger) of distilled spirits.
Referral to alcohol treatment program if evidence of problem or hazardous drinking.
At risk is defined as 5 drinks per day in men, 3 drinks per day in women, or frequent intoxication.
Heavy drinking is defined as 5 or more drinks, once or twice each weekend.
Persons who drink should be informed of the dangers of driving or other potentially dangerous activities after drinking.
Use of alcohol should be discouraged in persons younger than the legal age for drinking.
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
5.
Basic Nutrition Counseling
133
a.
Referral to Registered Dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, life style modifications, and potential food/drug interactions if applicable.
Referral may include those patients with: · · · · · ·
Newly diagnosed diabetes Diabetes out of control Diet related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
b.
Goal Fat, cholesterol, and sodium consumption follow nutrition recommendations: ·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise and medication treatment plan to maintain blood glucose and lipids within target range and to keep electrolytes within normal range; Maintain kidney function and/or slow progression of disease Maintain nutrition health
· ·
c.
Recommendations Eat a variety of foods daily: (1) Five servings of fruits and vegetables; six servings of breads, cereals, or legumes each day; two servings each of low fat dairy and meat products; and use fat sparingly.
Calories to achieve or maintain reasonable weight (25-35 calories per kg/body weight balanced with energy expenditure).
Encourage weight loss as appropriate.
Limit alcohol to equal to or less than 2 drinks a day.
Discuss role and effect of diet, weight loss or maintenance, physical activity, smoking cessation, medications, hypertension, and renal disease.
(2)
(3) (4) (5)
134
d.
Hyperlipidemia: (1) Fats restricted according to risk factors and severity of serum lipid levels.
Emphasize consumption of fish, poultry prepared without skin, lean meats, and low-fat dairy products.
Emphasize monounsaturated fats as preferred fat (e.g., olive, canola, peanut or, avocado oil).
Step I: Fat 
Step II: Fat 
If triglycerides 
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
e.
Hypertension: (1) Limit Sodium intake to 
Salt in cooking or at the table Salty or highly processed foods such as smoked, cured or highly salted meats Bouillon and regular canned soups Commercial products with high salt content Foods processed in brine Salt seasonings and sauces
(2)
Maintain or increase foods high in potassium, or if applicable per medication.
f.
End Stage Renal Disease: (1) Protein intake based on 10% of total calories: · ·
Decrease meat and dairy portions Diabetic nephropathy, restrict to 0.8 g/kg
(2)
Individualize sodium, potassium, phosphorus, and calcium: · ·
Recommend more vegetables (3-5 servings/day) ingestion Recommend moderate amounts of fruits (2-4 serving/day) consumption 135
(3)
Vitamin/mineral supplement as recommended by healthcare provider
6.
Intensive Nutrition Counseling, Referral for Nutrition Counseling Referral to Registered Dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, lifestyle modifications, and food/drug interactions if applicable.
Referral may include those patients with newly diagnosed diabetes such as: · · · · ·
Diabetes out of control Diet related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
a.
Goal ·
Fat, cholesterol, prescription
and
sodium
consumed
follow
nutrition
·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise, and medication treatment plan to: Maintain blood glucose and lipids within target range and keep electrolytes within normal range Maintain kidney function and/or slow progression of disease Maintain nutrition health
b.
Recommendations (1) (2) Adjust goals and/or nutrition prescription.
Review records and evaluate adherence and understanding of: ·
Percent fat intake and type of fat · Protein intake · Carbohydrate intake · Soluble fiber intake · Physical activity · Alcohol intake · Tobacco consumption
(3) (4)
Provide self-management training and materials Assess change in weight, tobacco habit, physical activity, medications, and laboratory values.
136
(5)
Review education materials on: Food labeling · Recipe modification · Soluble fiber · Weight reduction, if applicable · Dining out If changes in medication, potential food/drug interaction ·
·
F.
Measure Blood Pressure at Each Office Visit Measure blood pressure at each office visit, with goal to maintain BP 
There is evidence that suggests achieving BP 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Reference Continuing care G. Rocella 1993
Adequate Control and Tolerability? Maintain blood pressure 140/90.
There is evidence suggesting that achieving a blood pressure 
The practitioner should monitor for and avoid symptoms of orthostatic hypotension, CHF, angina, or significantly worsened renal function (National High Blood Pressure Education Program Working Group Report on Hypertension in Diabetes, 1994).
VHA, Pharmacy Benefits ManagementMedical Advisory Panel, The Pharmacologic Management of Hypertension is in the attachment at end of this chapter.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Variables Definition of adequate control and tolerability
Reference Rocella 1993
H.
Begin Drug Monotherapy See the VA Medical Advisory Panel attachment, Pharmacologic Management of Hypertension, pp 14-22, at the end of this chapter; as well as the National High Blood Pressure Education Program recommendations below: 1.
National High Blood Pressure Education Program: a.
ACE inhibitors, alpha-receptor blockers, calcium antagonists, and diuretics in low doses are preferred because of fewer adverse effects on glucose homeostasis, lipid profiles, and renal function.
Beta-blockers can have adverse effects on peripheral blood flow, prolongation of hypoglycemia, and masking of hypoglycemic symptoms.
137
b.
c.
If proteinuria or renal disease is present (go to Module R), consider ACE inhibitor as first choice for hypertension.
If coronary artery disease is present, beta-blocker therapy should be considered.
Also see Annotation E for nutritional and lifestyle counseling.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence A
d.
Intervention Blocker/CAD
Reference Campeau et al.
2.
If renal disease, consider ACE inhibitor (see table of evidence below) TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Intervention ACE inhibitors and renal disease
Reference Refer to renal algorithm
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Intervention Nutrition counseling
Reference Refer to renal algorithm
I.
Consider the Possibility of Resistant Hypertension Definition of resistant hypertension: Pretreatment BP 
· ·
Pretreatment BP 
Older patients with isolated systolic hypertension failure to reduce systolic BP to 
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence C
Variables Definition of Resistant Hypertension
Reference Rocella 1993
138
References 1.
American College of Sports Medicine.
ACM's Guidelines for Exercise Testing and Prescription, 5th Ed. Baltimore, Md: Williams 
American Heart Association.
An Active Partnership for the Health of Your Heart.
American Heart Association Dallas, TX, 1990.
Campeau L, Knatterud GL, Domansk M, Hunninghake DB, White CW, Geller NL, Rosenbeg Y.
The effect of aggressive lowering of low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels and low-dose anticoagulation on obstructive changes in saphenous-vein coronary-artery bypass grafts.
New Eng J Med 1997; 336:153-165.
Guide to Clinical Preventive Services.
2nd Ed. Baltimore, MD: Williams 
US Preventive Services Task Force.
Healthy People 2000, National Health Promotion and Disease Prevention Objectives.
Washington, DC: US Department of Health 
DHHS (PHS) publication 9150212.
National High Blood Pressure Education Program Working Group.
Report on Hypertension in Diabetes.
Hypertension 1994; 23(2):152.
Pharmacy Benefits ManagementMedical Advisory Panel.
The Pharmacologic Management of Hypertension.
VHA PBM-SHG Publication No. 96-0003.
Hines, IL: Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group, Veterans Health Administration, Department of Veterans Affairs.
December 1996.
Rocella EJ.
The Fifth Report of the Joint National Committee on Detection, Evaluation and Treatment of High Blood Pressure (JNC V).
Arch Int Med 1993; 153:161-162, 164-174.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
139
Appendix 1.
Diuretics THIAZIDES Hydrochlorothiazide (HCTZ) Chlorothiazide Chlorthalidone HCTZ /Triamterene
a-c
DOSE
d
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS Monitor serum K+ 2-4 wks after initiating therapy or changing dose, then q 6-12 months · Hypokalemia may potentiate digitalis toxicity · Monitor for hypotension, especially in the elderly · Thiazides may have diminished effects in patients with Cr Cl 
12.5 - 25 mg/day max = 25 mg/day 500-1000 mg/day max = 2000 mg/day 25-50 mg/day max = 50 mg/day initial/maintenance = 25/37.5 50/75 mg/day
THIAZIDERELATED Indapamide
DOSE
d
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS · · · Not routinely used for HTN Reserve indapamide for patients with CrCl 
initial = 1.25 mg/day maintenance = 2.5 mg/day max = 5.0 mg/day 0.5-1 mg/day 2.5-5 mg/day
Metolazonee Mykrox® Zaroxolyn®
LOOP DIURETICS Furosemide
DOSE
d
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS · · · · Not routinely used for HTN Loops may be more effective in patients with Cr Cl 
Bumetanide
Torsemide
20-80 mg/day (usually given in divided doses for HTN) 0.5-5 mg/day (usually given in divided doses for HTN) initial = 5 mg/day max = 10 mg/day
a
Adapted from Diuretics.
In: Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis, Missouri: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1993:138a-139.
b Semla TP, Beizer JL, Higbee MD, eds. APhA Geriatric Dosage Handbook.
2nd ed. Hudson: Lexi-Comp Inc.,1995-96.
c ACEI= angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor; CHF= congestive heart failure d Once daily dosing unless specified otherwise e The brand names of metolazone are not bioequivalent, therefore doses vary
140
Appendix 2.
-Blockers -BLOCKERS Non-cardioselectived Propranolol IR Propranolol SR Cardioselective Atenolol
a,b
DOSEc 80-240 mg/day (in divided doses) 80-160 mg/day
25-100 mg/day (dose adjustments are needed in CRI) 50-200 mg/day (in divided doses) initial = 400 mg/day (once daily or divided doses) 400-1200 mg/day (in divided doses) elderly: avoid doses 
Metoprolol Acebutolol
&
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS · As doses increase, cardioselectivity decreases · Monitor for bradycardia, CHF, fatigue, insomnia, cold extremities, impotence, and nightmares · Monitor pulse rate · May mask the symptoms of hypoglycemia in DM · Discontinue with slow taper for 1 week · Labetalol and carvedilol may cause postural hypotension, therefore standing SBP should be monitored · Labetalol may be used in treatment of cyclosporine induced HTN · Labetalol is often used for severe HTN, and higher doses than stated may be needed in certain cases · Carvedilol dose titrations should not occur sooner than 7-14 days of initiation · Doses of carvedilol should be given with food to reduce the incidence of orthostatic effects · Agents such as acebutolol and labetalol offer fewer advantages over others, but may be necessary in restricted circumstances
Carvedilol
a Adapted from Beta-adrenergic blocking agents.
In: Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis, Missouri: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1993: 157b-159m.
b Semla TP, Beizer JL, Higbee MD, eds. APhA Geriatric Dosage Handbook.
2nd ed. Hudson: Lexi-Comp Inc.,1995-96.
c Once daily dosing unless specified otherwise d IR = immediate release; SR = sustained release
141
Appendix 3.
Calcium Channel Blockers (CCBs) CCBsc Verapamil IR Verapamil SR
a,b
DOSE d,e 120-360 mg/day (in 2-3 divided doses) 120-360 mg/day (once daily or 2 divided doses)
Dihydropyridines Amlodipine
f
Felodipine Nicardipine SR Nifedipine XL/CC Nisoldipine Diltiazem IR Diltiazem SR Cardizem SR® Cardizem CD® Dilacor XR® Tiazac TZ® a
5-10 mg/day elderly initial 2.5-10 mg/day 60-120 mg/day 30-90 mg/day 20-60 mg/day elderly initial 90-360 mg/day 120-360 mg/da 180-360 mg/da 180-480 mg/da elderly may 120-540 mg/da
= 2.5 mg/day (in 2 divided doses)
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS · Verapamil is the preferred CCB for stage 1 HTN · Monitor for bradycardia and heart block · Contraindicated in AV node dysfunction (2nd or 3rd degree heart block), systolic CHF and decrease LV function · Doses 
= 10mg/day (in 3-4 divided doses)
· ·
y (in 2 divided doses) y y respond to 120 mg/day y
Long acting preparations may be used for patients with an of the following: atrial arrhythmia, sinus tachycardia, and/o angina or asymptomatic ischemia Monitor heart rate, may decrease sinus rate and cause heart block
Adapted from Calcium channel blocking agents.
In: Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis, Missouri: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1994:148v-150b.
b Semla TP, Beizer JL, Higbee MD, eds. APhA Geriatric Dosage Handbook.
2nd ed. Hudson: Lexi-Comp Inc.,1995-96.
c IR= immediate release formulation; SR= sustained release formulation; XL= Procardia® XL; CC= Adalat ® CC; CD= 24 hour continual release; XR= extended release formulation; TZ= 24-hr preparation d Once daily dosing unless otherwise specified e For all CCB, use caution when used in patients with liver and renal dysfunction; monitor effect and adjust dose when appropriate f Due to recent studies, isradapine has not been included until the issue of safety can be further addressed
142
Appendix 4.
ACE Inhibitors (ACEIs) ACEI Benazepril Captopril Enalapril Fosinopril Lisinopril Moexapril
a,b
DOSEc 10-40 mg/day If CrCl 
·
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS Monitor for hyperkalemia Obtain baseline serum potassium, creatinine, and BUN, repeat labs within 2 weeks after initiating; discontinue ACEI if significant elevation occur Avoid other potassium-sparing medications
Quinapril
Ramipril Trandolapril a
Adapted from Antihypertensive: Angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor..
In: Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis, Missouri: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1996: 164h-165p.
b Semla TP, Beizer JL, Higbee MD, eds. APhA Geriatric Dosage Handbook.
2nd ed. Hudson: Lexi-Comp Inc.,1995-96.
c For most ACEIs (except captopril) once daily dosing is usually adequate.
In selected instances the manufacturer recommends dividing doses when the trough effect is inadequate.
Note that the manufacturer of lisinopril and of trandolapril do not mention dividing doses.
d In general, higher dose than 150 mg/d of captopril are not used for HTN e Patients should take 1 hour prior to food (empty stomach) f Doses higher than 40 mg/d potentially increase side-effects with minimal additional BP control g Manufacturer recommends starting dose of 1 mg/d for patients not receiving a diuretic in non-African American patients and 2 mg/d in African American patients
143
Appendix 5.
Other Agents AGENT BLOCKERS Doxazosin
a,b
DOSEc 2-8 mg/day elderly initial = 1 mg max = 16d mg/day 1-15 mg/day (in 2-3 divided doses) max = 20 mg/day 1-5 mg/d (once daily or 2 divided doses) initial dose = 1 mg q hs max = 20 mg/day
Prazosin Terazosin
COMMENTS/CAUTIONS ·Monitor BP for orthostatic hypotension ·Initial doses should be given q hs to reduce risk of syncope ·Use cautiously in elderly due to first dose syncope or dizziness ·Avoid in volume depleted patients due to orthostasis ·Decrease in LDL and increases in HDL have been seen, but clinical significance unknown
ANGIOTENSIN II ANTAGONIST Losartan
50-100 mg/day (once daily or 2 divided doses)
CENTRALLY ACTING Clonidine tablet Clonidine TTS patch Methyldopa
0.1-0.8e mg/d (in 2-3 divided doses) 0.1-0.6 mg patch weekly 500 f mg-3g/d (in 2-4 divided doses)
PERIPHERALLY ACTING Reserpine VASODILATING AGENTS Minoxidil
0.1-0.25 mg/d
5-40 mg/d (once daily or 2 divided doses) 40-200 mg/d (in 2-4 divided doses) initial dose = 10 mg qid elderly initial = 10 mg bid-tid
Hydralazine
·Initiate dose of 25 mg in patients with possible depletion of intravascular volume (e.g. diuretics) and in hepatic impairment ·Reserve for patients who have an indication for an ACEI, but who cannot tolerate it ·Taper dose to discontinue; do not discontinue suddenly ·Antihypertensive effects of the patch are not seen until 2-3 days later; when switching from oral clonidine to a patch the oral dose should be gradually tapered down over 2-3 days while the patch is first administered ·Clonidine patches are costly, but may be useful in selected patients ·Monitor for sedation (usually transient) during initial therapy with methyldopa or whenever the dose is increased ·Monitor for sedation, depression, nightmares, tremors, nasal congestion ·Higher doses than listed are associated with increase incidence of depression ·Monitor for reflex tachycardia with worsening angina, and edema ·Monitor for headache and SLE (dose related) with hydralazine ·Monitor for hypertrichosis, pericardial effusions with minoxidil ·Minoxidil or hydralazine should be use with diuretic and -blockers to reduce reflex tachycardia and edema
a Adapted from.
Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis, Missouri: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1996: 160-164g 
b Semla TP, Beizer JL, Higbee MD, eds. APhA Geriatric Dosage Handbook.
2nd ed. Hudson: Lexi-Comp Inc., 1995-96.
c Once daily dosing unless specified otherwise d Doses 
144
Appendix 6a.
Common Drug Interactions with Antihypertensive Agentsa-e DRUG CLASS DIURETICS INTERACTING DRUG ACEI Bile Acid Resins Digoxin Lithium NSAIDs Oral hypoglycemics K+ preparations ACEI, NSAIDs etaBLOCKERS Cimetidine Diltiazem Verapamil Epinephrine Lidocaine NSAIDs Neuroleptics Oral hypoglycemics Prazosin Propafenone Rifampin Theophylline CCB Carbamazepine Cimetidine Cyclosporin Digoxin Lithium Quinidine Theophylline a
DESCRIPTION hypotensive effect in the presence of intensive diuretic therapy due to sodium depletion and hypovolemia; at low doses this combination may be used synergistically absorption of all diuretics; take diuretics 1 hour prior or 4 hours after bile acid resin All diuretics may induce hypokalemia which may risk of digitalis toxicity With thiazide, a compensatory in proximal tubule reabsorption of sodium occurs, which results in lithium reabsorption; furosemide appears to have little effect in most people NSAIDs antihypertensive effect when used with thiazides due to inhibition of PG synthesis resulting in GFR, sodium and water excretion, and vasoconstriction Thiazides may hypoglycemic effects of sulfonylureas possibly due to insulin sensitivity, insulin secretion or in K+ ; clinical significance unclear K+sparing diuretics used concomitantly may K+ serum levels
Hypotension and bradycardia have been reported with propranolol and metoprolol when used with cimetidine due to serum levels of -blockers that undergo hepatic metabolism Combination may potentiate the pharmacologic effects of -blockers; additive effects on cardiac conduction non-cardioselective agents may the pressor response resulting in i n HTN/ bradycardia toxicity due to reduced lidocaine hepatic metabolism NSAIDs antihypertensive effect due to inhibition of PG synthesis resulting in GFR, sodium and water excretion, and vasoconstriction Some -blockers and neuroleptics (chlorpromazine/thioridazine) may the plasma concentrations of one another; monitor for enhanced effects of both drugs With non-cardioselective agents, hypoglycemic may occur possible due to inhibition of insulin secretion; also mask symptoms of hypoglycemia; clinical significance unclear postural hypotension due to compensatory cardiovascular response hypotensive effect has been seen with propranolol and metoprolol due to inhibition of metabolic clearance; heart failure and nightmares have been reported May enhance the hepatic metabolism of propranolol and metoprolol; enzyme induction effect may resolve after a 3-4 week washout period serum concentration in a dose-dependent manner has been seen with propranolol toxicity has been noted with verapamil and diltiazem use due to reduced metabolism of carbamazepine; interaction more significant with verapamil Metabolism has been especially with verapamil, diltiazem, nifedipine Blood concentrations have increased with verapamil, diltiazem and nicardipine; renal toxicity has been reported Verapamil, diltiazem, bepridil, nisoldipine have digoxin levels by 20-70% Combination use with verapamil or diltiazem may result in neurotoxicity which may occur without attendant increase in serum level Verapamil inhibits metabolism of quinidine leading to toxicity; nifedipine appears to reduce blood concentrations although mechanism unknown Inhibition of hepatic metabolism with verapamil may lead to increase serum levels
Adapted from JNC V 14 Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1996.
c Mignat C, Unger T. ACE inhibitors.
Drug interactions of clinical significance.
Drug Safety 1995 May 12(5):334-47.
d Hansten PD, Horn JR eds. Drug interactions 
e Bold serious drug interaction; Italics = moderate; Regular = minor ;NSAIDs=nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug; GFR=glomerular filtration rate; K + =potassium; ACEI=angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor; PG=prostaglandin b
145
Appendix 6b.
Common Drug Interactions with Antihypertensive Agentsa-e DRUG CLASS ACEI Lithium NSAIDs K+ preparations K+-sparing diuretics -BLOCKERS toxicity; suggested mechanism is ACEI induced sodium depletion resulting in reabsorption NSAIDs antihypertensive effects due to inhibition of PG synthesis resulting in GFR, sodium and water excretion, and vasoconstriction Concomitant therapy may K+ serum levels Prazosin may postural hypotension due to compensatory cardiovascular response May antihypertensive action with prazosin due to inhibition of PG synthesis May cause greater hypotensive effect with prazosin or terazosin than with either drug alone Coadministration led to an of about 18% in the area under the curve (AUC) of lorsartan, but did not affect the pharmacokinetics of its active metabolite Coadministration led to a reduction of about 20% in the AUC of lorsartan and that of its active metabolite INTERACTING DRUG DESCRIPTION
-blockers Indomethacin Verapamil
ANGIOTENSIN II ANTAGONIST Cimetidine Phenobarbital CENTRALLY ACTING
-blockers
Levodopa Lithium Sympathomimetics TCA PERIPHERALLY ACTING Sympathomimetics
The severity of withdrawal HTN caused by abrupt discontinuation of clonidine may be greater in patients taking -blockers possibly due to unopposed -adrenergic stimulation; methyldopa and -blockers may rarely cause paradoxical HTN Methyldopa may enhance the therapeutic response to levodopa lithium toxicity has been reported with methyldopa use in a few patients Methyldopa may potentiate the pressor effects and lead to HTN May inhibit the antihypertensive response of clonidine; mechanism not established
TCA VASODILATORS Indomethacin Propranolol Metoprolol a
Concurrent use with reserpine may prolong effects of direct-acting sympathomimetics (epinephrine); concurrent use with indirect-acting sympathomimetics (ephedrine) may inhibit effects Concurrent use with reserpine may antihypertensive effects antihypertensive effect of hydralazine due to prostaglandin synthesis inhibition Serum levels of propranolol or metoprolol may be with hydralazine use; clinical significance unknown
b c d e
Adapted from JNC V 14 Hebel SK, ed. Drug Facts and Comparisons, St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons Inc., 1996.
Mignat C, Unger T. ACE inhibitors.
Drug interactions of clinical significance.
Drug Safety 1995 May 12(5):334-47.
Hansten PD, Horn JR eds. Drug interactions 
Bold serious drug interaction; Italics = moderate; Regular = minor ;ACEI=angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor; PG=prostaglandin
146
Appendix 7.
Selected Costs for Hypertension Drug Therapy (as of November 1996) For current prices, check Drug 
DOSEa
FEDERAL SUPPLY SCHEDULE (FSS) COST/MONTH
1000 mg qd 25 mg qd 50 mg/75 mg qd 25 mg qd 2.5 mg qd 0.5 mg qd 5 mg qd 40 mg qd 2 mg qd 10 mg qd
$ 0.09 $ 0.61 $ 0.29 $ 3.52 $ 12.90 $ 8.19 $ 0.19 $ 3.87 $ 8.04
IR: 40 mg bid SR: 80 mg bid 50 mg qd 50 mg bid 200 mg bid 200 mg bid 120 mg bid 240 mg qd 5 mg qd 10 mg qd 30 mg bid 90 mg qd 90 mg qd 20 mg qd 60 mg tid 120 mg bid 240 mg qd 240 mg qd 240 mg qd
$ 0.29 $ 16.76 $ 0.52 $ 1.39 $ 12.34 $ 12.34 $ 1.82 $ 7.05 $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ 18.64 14.39 9.57 13.50 34.03 14.21 3.38 32.55 28.32 15.56 16.66
Usual doses; does not reflect equivalent doses
147
Appendix 7.
Selected Costs for Hypertension Drug Therapy continued (as of November 1996) For current prices, check Drug 
DOSEa
FEDERAL SUPPLY SCHEDULE (FSS) COST/MONTH $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ $ 1.09 7.38 28.41 7.48 7.80 7.05 7.38 8.44 8.70
25 20 10 20 20 15 20 10 4
mg bid mg qd mg bid mg qd mg qd mg qd mg qd mg qd mg qd
4 mg qd 2 mg bid 5 mg qd 50 mg qd 0.2 mg bid TTS-2 q week 500 mg tid 0.1 mg qd 10 mg qd 25 mg tid
$ 15.89 $ 1.02 $ 13.50 $ 17.79 $ 0.43 $ 29.91 $ 4.23 $ 0.60 $ 2.01 $ 0.57
Usual doses; does not reflect equivalent doses
148
Module L Lipid Control
149
Management of Diabetes Mellitus 1
Pe rs on w i th di ab etes
2
Is p a ti e n t m edi ca ll y st able? N 3
Y
Pro vi d e app ropr ia te treatm e nt an d s tab i li za ti o n
Evalua te and m a nage per app ropri a te a lg o ri th m (s) 4
Glycem ic Co ntro l Medi ca ti on Nu tri ti o n Ho m e Moni to r ing Ph ysi ca l Activi ty
Module G : GM GN GH GP
5
N o fo ot evalua tion w i th i n pas t ye a r, r is k fa ct ors pre s en t, o r acti ve l e s io n ? N
6 Y
F oot Ca re: Mo du le F
7
N o eye evaluat io n wi th i n pa s t ye ar, s ym p to m s pre s en t, or k no w n to be at high ri s k fo r vis u al l o s s ? N
8 Y
Eye Ca re :
Mo dule E
9
N o uri n alysi s w ith in pas t ye ar, m i croa l b um in ur ia or m a cr oalbu m i n u ri a pre s en t; or el e va ted creat in i ne? N
10 Y
Renal Dise ase T re at me n t: Mo du le R
11
Bloo d pres s u re 
12 Y
Hype rt en si on Management:
Module H
13
LD L- C 
14 Y
Lip id Con tro l:
M o du le L
16
15
Fo ll o w- up i n 1 ye ar
Fo ll ow- u p as in di ca te d to eval u at e /tre a t
150
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Lipid Control
1
Person with diabetes and life expectancy 
2
Does patient need nutritional or lifestyle counseling? [B] N
3 Y
Provide and document counseling
4
Evaluate fasting TC/TG/LDL-C/HDL [C]
5
Is LDL-C 
Y
Continue on Page 2
N 6 7 Y
Is TG 
Achieve target glycemic range (Refer to Module G) [G]
Go to Page 2, Box 16
8
Is TG 
9
Y
Person with diabetes and LDL-C 
10
Reassess glycemic control (refer to Module G) Screen for alcohol use [H]
N 11
Continue diabetes management Reassess lipids in one year [F]
Go to Page 3, Box 29
151
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Lipid Control
Continued from Page 1
12
Achieve target glycemic range (Refer to Module G) [G]
13
14
15
Is LDL-C still 
Y
Is TSH high? [I]
Y
Prescribe hypothyroidism treatment
N 16 17 Y
N
Is TG still 
Is nephrosis present? [J] 20
18 Y
Is LDL-C still 
Y
19
Prescribe gemfibrozil or refer to lipid consultant N
Refer to nephrology N
Go to Page 3, Box 29
Go to Page 3, Box 29
21
Intensive nutritional and life style counseling for 3 to 6 months Reassess lipids in one year [K]
22
Continue with diabetes management plan, (including nutrition and lifestyle) Reassess in one year See annotation K and F
Go back to Page 1, Box 8
23
Is LDL-C still 
Y
Continue on Page 3
N
24
Continue with diabetes mellitus management (including nutrition and lifestyle) Reassess lipids in one year See annotation K and F
152
Management of Diabetes Mellitus Lipid Control Continued from Page 2
25
Person with diabetes LDL-C 
26
27
Is TG 
Y
Prescribe gemfibrozil [L]
N 28 29
Prescribe statin [K]
Reassess lipid values at 3 and 6 months Evaluate for potential complications of drugs and readjust if indicated [M]
30
Is LDL still 
Y
N
31
Refer to lipid management consultant
Go to Page 1, Box 8
Go to Box 29
153
Module L Lipid Control
ANNOTATIONS
154
MANAGEMENT OF DIABETES MELLITUS Lipid Control Annotations Module L Person with Diabetes and Life Expectancy 
There is no significant correlation between total serum cholesterol and CHD in persons above age 70 years (Krumholz 1994); however, intervention trials suggest a small attributable benefit to lowering total cholesterol in persons above 70.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I Level of Evidence B
A.
Variables Absence of a relationship between serum cholesterol level and CHD/mortality 
Reference Krumholz et al. (1994)
Provide Appropriate Nutritional and Lifestyle Counseling 1.
Regular Physical Activity a.
Minimum Goal · · ·
Regular physical activity Small increase over current level Progression to level that achieves cardiovascular fitness (e.g., 30 minutes of brisk walking most days of the week) Muscular strengthening and joint flexibility
·
b.
Recommendations (1) Essential components of a systematic, individualized exercise prescription include the appropriate mode, intensity, duration, frequency, and progression of physical activity.
Assess risk, preferably with exercise test to guide prescription.
Advise medically supervised programs for moderate to high-risk patients.
155
(2) (3)
(4)
Consider level of fitness, medications that may influence heart rate, risk of cardiovascular or orthopedic injury, individual preferences, and individual program objectives.
Encourage minimum of 30 to 60 minutes of moderate intensity activity, 3 to 4 times weekly (e.g., walking, jogging, cycling or other aerobic activity) supplemented by an increase in daily lifestyle activities (e.g., walking breaks at work, using stairs, gardening, household work).
Minimum benefit, 5 to 6 hours per week.
Light to moderate physical activity requires sustained, rhythmic muscular movements, is equivalent to sustained walking, performed at less than 60% of maximum heart rate for age.
Maximum heart rate equals roughly 220 beats per minute minus age.
(5)
(6)
2.
Smoking Cessation a.
Goal ·
Complete cessation
b.
Recommendations (1) A cigarette smoker is defined as having smoked at least 100 cigarettes and currently smokes cigarettes.
Regular exposure to tobacco smoke is defined as the occurrence of tobacco smoking anywhere in the home for more than 3 days each week.
A smokeless tobacco user is defined as having snuffed or chewed tobacco at least 20 times and currently uses snuff or chewing tobacco.
Every person who smokes should be offered smoking cessation treatment at each visit.
Ask and record the tobacco-use status of every patient.
Cessation treatment as brief as 3 minutes is effective.
The more intense the treatment, the more effective the abstinence.
Nicotine replacement therapy (nicotine patches or gum), cliniciandelivered social support, and skills training are effective components of smoking cessation treatment.
156
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5) (6) (7) (8)
3.
Stress Management a.
Goal ·
Understand and modify stress
b.
Recommendations (1) Ways to cope with stress: Relax, emergency stress stoppers, exercise, reduce chemical stresses.
Stress management skills: Avoid, adapt, alter; speaking up; and time management.
(2)
4.
Alcohol Counseling a.
Goals · ·
Screen to detect problem drinking Screen to detect hazardous drinking
b.
Recommendations (1) Ask patients to describe the quantity, frequency, other characteristics of their use of wine, beer, and liquor, including frequency of intoxication and tolerance of the effect of alcohol.
Suggested safe drinking 2 drinks per day in men and 1 drink per day in women.
One drink is defined as 12 ounces of beer, one 5ounce glass of wine, or 1.5 fluid ounces (one jigger) of distilled spirits.
Referral to alcohol treatment program if evidence of problem or hazardous drinking.
At risk is defined as 5 drinks per day in men, 3 drinks per day in women, or frequent intoxication.
Heavy drinking is defined as 5 or more drinks, once or twice each weekend.
Persons who drink should be informed of the dangers of driving or other potentially dangerous activities after drinking.
Use of alcohol should be discouraged in persons younger than the legal age for drinking.
157
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
5.
Basic Nutrition Counseling a.
Referral to Registered Dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, lifestyle modifications, and potential food/drug interactions if applicable.
Referral may include those patients with: · · · · · ·
Newly diagnosed diabetes Diabetes out of control Diet related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
b.
Goal Fat, cholesterol, and sodium consumption follow nutrition recommendations: ·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise and medication treatment plan to maintain blood glucose and lipids within target range and to keep electrolytes within normal range Maintain kidney function and/or slow progression of disease Maintain nutrition health
· ·
c.
Recommendations Eat a variety of foods daily: (1) Five servings of fruits and vegetables; six servings of breads, cereals, or legumes each day; two servings each of low fat dairy and meat products; and use fat sparingly.
Calories to achieve or maintain reasonable weight (25-35 calories per kg/body weight balanced with energy expenditure).
Encourage weight loss as appropriate.
Limit alcohol to equal to or less than 2 drinks a day.
(2)
(3) (4) (5)
d.
Discuss role and effect of diet, weight loss or maintenance, physical activity, smoking cessation, medications, hypertension, and renal disease.
Hyperlipidemia: Fats restricted according to risk factors and severity of serum lipid levels.
Emphasize consumption of fish, poultry prepared without skin, lean meats, and low fat dairy products.
158
(1) (2)
(3)
Emphasize monounsaturated fats as preferred fat (e.g., olive, canola, peanut, or avocado oil).
Step I: Fat 
Step II: Fat 
(4)
(5)
(6) If triglycerides 
e. Hypertension: (1) Limit sodium intake to 
Salty or highly processed foods such as smoked, cured or highly salted meats Bouillon and regular canned soups Commercial products with high salt content Foods processed in brine Salt seasonings and sauces
· · · ·
(2)
Maintain or increase foods high in potassium, or if applicable, per medication.
f.
End Stage Renal Disease: (1) Protein intake based on 10% of total calories: · ·
Decrease meat and dairy portions Diabetic nephropathy, restrict to 0.8 g/kg
(2)
Individualize sodium, potassium, phosphorus, and calcium: · ·
Recommend more vegetables (3-5 servings/day) ingestion Recommend moderate amounts of fruits (2-4 servings/day) consumption
(3) Vitamin/mineral supplement as recommended by health care provider
159
6.
Intensive Nutrition Counseling, Referral for Nutrition Counseling Referral to Registered Dietitian for individualized instruction in meal planning, lifestyle modifications, and food/drug interactions if applicable.
a.
Referral may include those patients with newly diagnosed diabetes such as: · · · · ·
Diabetes out of control Diet related complications Type I diabetes Insulin pump Multiple daily injections
b.
Goal ·
Fat, cholesterol, prescription.
and
sodium
consumed
follow
nutrition
·
Adhere to appropriate meal pattern, exercise, and medication treatment plan to: Maintain blood glucose and lipids within target range, and keep electrolytes within normal range Maintain kidney function and/or slow progression of disease Maintain nutrition health
c.
Recommendations (1) (2) Adjust goals and/or nutrition prescription.
Review records and evaluate adherence and understanding of: · · · · · · ·
Percent fat intake and type of fat Protein intake Carbohydrate intake Soluble fiber intake Physical activity Alcohol intake Tobacco consumption
(3) (4)
Provide self-management training and material.
Assess change in weight, tobacco habit, physical activity, medications, and laboratory values.
160
(5)
Review educational materials on: · · · · · ·
Food labeling Recipe modification Soluble fiber Weight reduction, if applicable Dining out If changes in medication, potential food/drug interaction
C.
Evaluate Fasting TC/TG/LDL-C/HDL These lipids must be measured in the fasting state because serum triglycerides (TG) are affected by meals and, if elevated above about 400 mg/dL, interfere with the calculation of HDL-cholesterol (HDL-C).
Below this TG value, the calculation works reasonably well (Demacker et al. 1996; Nauck et al. 1996; Whiting et al. 1997).
If the TG level is 
If measurements of LDL-C and HDL-C are not available, serum total cholesterol can be measured in the fed or fasting state; however, the recommendation here is to measure LDL-C.
The reason for measuring serum lipids in Type II diabetes is because dyslipidemia is common (Laakso, 1996) and a raised level of serum cholesterol is as powerful a risk factor for coronary heart disease (CHD) in patients with Type II diabetes as it is in non-diabetics (Pyorala, 
A major problem is that there are no data to show that reversal of dyslipidemia in Type II diabetes results in primary prevention of CHD (Laakso, 1996), and only post-hoc subgroup analysis from larger trials (4S, CARE) suggests that it leads to secondary prevention of a second CHD event (Kreisberg, 1996; Sacks et al. 1996).
There may be benefit of a global program that addresses serum cholesterol, smoking, and hypertension, with the use of aspirin, in men under age 60 years but these approaches may have less effect in Type II diabetes than non-diabetics (Krolewski et al. 1996).
It is known that lipid-lowering therapies are effective at lowering serum cholesterol in Type II diabetes (Behounek et al. 1994; Sweany et al. 1995).
On balance, it is reasonable to conclude that one can use about the same approach to dyslipidemia in Type II diabetes as in those without Type II diabetes until large-scale diabetes-specific data are available.
See Attachment 1, Drugs that alter plasma lipids from the VHA Pharmacy Benefits Management Medical Advisory Panel Guidelines at the end of this chapter.
Also, refer to Attachments 2 and 3, Drug Interactions and Costs for Hyperlipidemia Drug Therapy.
In persons without diabetes there is benefit of lowering serum cholesterol in both primary (Pedersen 1994) and secondary prevention of CHD (Sacks et al. 1996; Shepherd et al. 1995).
Note: This algorithm does not address the issue of a low HDL-C without a raised LDL-C because niacin, which is effective at raising the low HDL-C, should be avoided in Type II diabetes (see annotation D) and gemfibrozil, which can also 161
raise HDL-C, is currently under study in a VA Cooperative Study to see if CHD outcomes are actually affected.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I B I Level of Evidence B B C
Variables Friedewald calculation of LDCcholesterol Serum cholesterol as a risk factor for CHD in Type II diabetes Lowering serum cholesterol in Type II benefits CHD Lipid therapies decrease raised serum cholesterol in Type II diabetes
Reference Demacker et al. (1996) Whiting et al. (1997) Pyorala 
Sacks et al Pyorala et Behounek Sweany et
.
(1996) al. (1997) et al. (1994) al. (1995)
IIa I I
B B A
D.
Is LDL-C 
However, in persons without diabetes but with a recent (3 months to 20 months) history of myocardial infarction, the treatment benefit decreased to zero as the LDL-C level approached 125 mg/dL.
Based upon this result, the cutpoint for treatment for either primary or secondary prevention should be set at 125-130 mg/dL, unless a person has had coronary bypass surgery.
In this group of individuals (Post Coronary Artery Bypass Graft Trial Investigators), aggressive lowering of LDL-C levels to below 100 mg/dL reduced the progression of atherosclerosis in grafts.
However, the study was not designed to have adequate power to detect treatment-related differences in clinical events.
There was no significant difference in composite and points (death, nonfatal myocardial infarction, or stroke), although there was a nonsignificant trend (p=0.03) towards fewer revascularization procedures.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation I I I Level of Evidence A A A
Variables Little evidence of further benefit in lowering serum LDL-C 
Reference Sacks et al. (1996) Pedersen 1994 Shepherd et al. (1995)
Post Coronary Artery Bypass Trial Investigators 1997
I
A
162
E.
Is TG 
Fasting specimen should be 12-14 hours prior to blood drawing.
Continue Diabetes Management, Reassess Lipids in One Year The following evaluation of the patient at follow-up visits is from the VA Medical Advisory Panel Pharmacologic Guidelines for Treatment of Patients with Hyperlipidemia.
1.
History a. b. Diet compliance Medication compliance (if indicated) and presence of symptoms suggesting adverse drug reactions Current medications or pertinent changes in other drug therapy Compliance with exercise program if prescribed Reevaluation of the modifiable cardiovascular risk factors Presence of muscle aches in large muscle groups
F.
c. d. e. f.
2.
Physical examination a. b. Weight Blood pressure if indicated Laboratory tests a. b. c. Periodic fasting lipid profile Creatinine kinase (CK) if symptoms of myositis LFT's for patients on gemfibrozil, HMGCoA-RI's Adverse event monitoring (including but not limited to): a.
Significant elevations of liver enzymes (
3.
4.
163
b.
Symptoms of myositis while on gemfibrozil or HMGCoA-RI therapy alone or in combination with other drugs
G.
Achieve Target Glycemic Range Serum lipids can be abnormal simply because of poor glycemic control (Laakso, 1996).
See glycemic control algorithm (Module G) for details.
Screen for Alcohol Use Use of a standardized instrument (CAGE, NAST, AUDIT, etc) to screen for alcohol consumption is recommended.
Alcohol excess can cause raised TG; efforts should be made to remedy this cause, if present.
If excess alcohol is not present, or if uncertain, refer to lipid management consultant.
1.
Moderation of Alcohol a.
Goals · ·
H.
Screen to detect problem drinking Screen to detect hazardous drinking
b.
Recommendations (1) Ask patients to describe the quantity, frequency, other characteristics of their use of wine, beer, and liquor, including frequency of intoxication and tolerance of the effect of alcohol.
Suggested safe drinking: 2 drinks per day in men and 1 drink per day in women.
One drink is defined as 12 ounces of beer, one 5ounce glass of wine, or 1.5 fluid ounces (one jigger) of distilled spirits.
Referral to alcohol treatment program if evidence of problem or hazardous drinking.
At risk is defined as 5 drinks per day in men, 3 drinks per day in women, or frequent intoxication.
Heavy drinking is defined as 5 or more drinks, once or twice each weekend.
Persons who drink should be informed of the dangers of driving or other potentially dangerous activities after drinking.
Use of alcohol should be discouraged in persons younger than the legal age for drinking.
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
164
I.
Is TSH High? Values of serum TSH 
Primary hypothyroidism, which becomes symptomatic at raised serum TSH levels of about 10 mU/L and can affect serum lipids at less elevated values, affects only a small number of those with raised serum cholesterol but is quite treatable.
Screening for primary hypothyroidism in those without Type II diabetes is reasonably cost-effective (Danese et al. 1996) and this is probably true in Type II diabetes as well.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation Level of Evidence B
Variables Screening for hypothyroidism is cost-effective
Reference Danese et al. (1996)
J.
Is Nephrosis Present?Defined as 24-hour urine protein excretion greater than 2 grams.
Intensive Nutritional and Lifestyle Counseling for 3 to 6 Months and Reassess in One Year A raised LDL-C may respond to more intensive lifestyle and nutritional therapy.
More importantly, changes in lifestyle, e.g., smoking cessation, can decrease the global risk of CHD even without a change in the serum cholesterol level (Avins 
This stratified approach targets the use of lipid-lowering drugs to those at higher risk (Ramsey et al. 1996), an approach which is particularly useful in view of the need for cost effectiveness and the uncertainty of translating efficacy ("it can work") to effectiveness ("it actually does work in practice") (Marchioli et al. 1996).
See Annotation B for further details.
TABLE OF EVIDENCE Strength of Recommendation Level of Evidence B
K.
Variables Lifestyle change can affect CHD outcome without changing serum cholesterol Appropriate stratification of the use of lipid lowering drugs "Efficacious" need not mean "effective" in actual practice
Reference Avins 
IIa
B
I
B
L.
Provide Gemfibrozil The practitioner here has the choice of: (a) going on to the use of a "statin" drug and assessing the effect on the TG level before addressing the raised TG level directly OR (b) instituting therapy with gemfibrozil which will usually lower the raised TG. 165
Niacin, which is effective in lowering both a raised TG and a raised LDL-C, is avoided here because of its tendency to raise the serum glucose.
However, it could be tried with caution in selected cases.
DRUG THERAPY*
* The following table is taken from the VHA Pharmacy Benefits Management/Medical Advisory Panel Pharmacologic Management of Hyperlipidemia DRUG gemfibrozil 600 mg tab TG EFFECT 30-60% 600 mg bid 30 min. ac DOSE CAUTIONS/MONITOR LFT's If Cr Cl is 10-50 mL/min give 50% of dose; if 
CONSIDERATIONS
HDL 10-30% ± LDL HMG CoA reductase inhibitors (HMGCoARI) fluvastatin 20,40 mg cap lovastatin 10,20,40 mg tab pravastatin 10,20,40 mg tab simvastatin 5,10,20,40mg tab a
10% 25-45% LFT's in 0.6-1.3% Myalgia 1.8-2.7%
LDL
Add BAR to LDL-C up to 50% Pre-existing renal dysfunction may put a patient at higher risk for myopathy Evening/bedtime dosing may improve efficacy; lovastatin should be taken with the evening meal
Add BAR to LDL-C up to 50% Pre-existing renal dysfunction may put a patient at higher risk for myopathy Evening/bedtime dosing may improve efficacy; lovastatin should be taken with the evening meal
CHOL 15-30% HDL TG 5-15% 5-15%
Myopathy 0.1-0.5% -5% in combination with gemfibrozil -2% in combination with niacin
Bennett WM, Aranoff AR, Morrison G, et al.
Drug Prescribing in Renal Failure: Dosing Guidelines for Adults.
Am J of Kidney Diseases 1983; 3(3):155-187.
b Depending on specific agent.
M.
Reassess Initially in 1-3 Months and Evaluate for Potential Complications of Drugs.
Evaluate Again at 4-6 and 8-10 Months Firm data on the optimum frequency of follow-up do not exist.
Because the response of LDL-C to statin drugs is partly dose-dependent, reassessment of the serum LDL-C in one to three months will help guide therapy.
Further, most side effects of these drugs occur in the first few months.
The main side effect, which occurs in two to three percent, is hepatic dysfunction; hepatic enzyme measurements once or twice in the first three months of therapy and every three or four months thereafter in the first year of therapy will generally detect this.
If there is no hepatic dysfunction as a result of the drug, one can re-assay these enzymes once or twice a year.
The much rarer muscle dysfunction due to these drugs (
166
References: 1.
Avins AL 
Ann Intern Med 1996; 125:502.
Behounek BD, McGovern ME, Kassler-Taub KB, Markowitz JS, Bergman M. A multinational study of the effects of low-dose pravastatin in patients with non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and hyper-cholesterolemia.
Clin Cardiol 1994; 17:558.
Campeau L, Knatterud L, Damanski M, Hunninghake DB, White CW, Geller NL Rosenberg Y.
The effect of aggressive lowering of low density lipoprotein cholesterol levels and low-dose anticoagulation of obstructive changes in saphenous-vein coronary-artery bypass grafts.
New Eng J Med 1997; 336:153-162.
Danese MD, Powe NR, Sawin CT, Ladenson PW. Screening for mild thyroid failure at the periodic health examination.
A decision and cost-effective analysis.
JAMA July, 1996; 276:285-292.
Demacker PNM, Toenhake-Dijkstra H, de Rijke YB, Stalenhoef AF, Stuyt PM, Williams HL.
On the presumed inaccuracy of the Friedewald formula in hypertriglyceridemic plasma: a role for imprecise analysis? Clin Chem 1996; 42:1491-1494.
Garber AM, Browner WS, 
Guidelines for using serum cholesterol, high-density lipoprotein cholesterol, and triglyceride levels as screening tests for preventing coronary heart disease in adults.
Ann Intern Med 1996; 124:515.
Kreisberg RA.
Cholesterol-lowering and coronary atherosclerosis: good news and bad news.
Am J Med 1996; 101:455.
Krolewski AS, Warram JH, 
A basis for the development and evaluation of preventive programs.
Endocrinol Metab Clin North Amer 1996; 25:217.
Krumholz HM, Seeman TE, Merrill SS, Mendesde Leon CF, Vaccarino V, Silverman DI, Tsukahara R, Ostfeld AM, Bekman LF. Lack of association between cholesterol and coronary heart disease mortality and morbidity and all-cause mortality in persons older than 70 years.
JAMA 1994; 272:1335-1340.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
167
10.
Laakso M. Lipids and lipoproteins as risk factors for coronary heart disease in noninsulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
Ann Med 1996; 28:341.
Marchioli R, Marfisi RM, Carinci F, Tognoni G. Meta-analysis, clinical trials, and transferability of research results into practice.
The case of cholesterol-lowering interventions in the secondary prevention of coronary heart disease.
Arch Intern Med 1996; 156:1158-72.
Nauck M, Kramer-Guth A, Bartens W, Marz W, Wieland H, Wanner C.
Is the determination of LDL cholesterol according to Friedewald accurate in CAPD and HD patients? Clin Nephrol 1996; 46:319-25.
Pedersen TR 
Randomized trial of cholesterol lowering in 4444 patients with coronary heart disease: the Scandinavian Simvastatin Survival Study (4S).
Lancet 1994; 344:1383.
Pharmacy Benefits ManagementMedical Advisory Panel.
The Pharmacologic Management of Hyperlipidemia.
VHA PBM-SHG Publication No. 96-0002.
Hines, IL: Pharmacy Benefits Strategic Health Group, Veterans Health Administration, Department of Veterans Affairs.
December 1996.
Pyoralka, Pedersen TR, Kjekshus J, Faergeman O, Olsson AG, Thorgeirsson G, The Scandinavin Simvastatin Survival Study (4S) Group.
Cholesterol lowering with simvastatin improves prognosis of diabetic patients with coronary heart disease.
Diab Care 1997; 20(4):614-620.
Pyorala K 
Ann Med 1996; 28:357.
Ramsey LE, Haq IU, Jackson PR.
Targeting lipid-lowering drug therapy for primary prevention of coronary disease: an updated Sheffield table.
Lancet 1996; 348:387.
Ramsey LE, Haq IU, Jackson PR.
The Sheffield table for primary prevention of coronary heart disease: corrected.
Lancet 1996; 348:1251.
Sacks FM, Pfeffer MA, Moye LA, Rouleau JL, Rutheford JD, Cole TG, Brown L, Warnica JW, Arnold JM, Wunce, Davis BR, Braunwald E.
The effect of pravastatin on coronary events after myocardial infarction in patients with average cholesterol levels.
168
11.
12.
13.
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
19.
C Cholesterol and Recurrent Events Trial Investigators.
New Engl J Med 1996; 335:1001.
20.
Shepherd J, Cobbe SM, Ford I, Isles CG, Lorime AR, MacFarlane PW, McKillop JH, Packard CJ. Prevention of coronary heart disease with pravastatin in men with hypercholesterolemia.
New Engl J Med 1995; 333:1301-7.
Sweany AE, Shapiro DR, Tate AC, Goldbeg RB, Stein EA. Effects of simvastatin versus gemfibrozil on lipids and glucose control in patients with non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus.
Clin Ther 1995; 17:186-203.
Whiting MJ, Shephard MDS, 
Diabetes Care 1997; 20:12.
21.
22.
169
ATTACHMENT 1
DRUGS THAT ALTER PLASMA LIPIDS DRUG -AGONISTS AND ANTAGONISTS (e.g., prazosin, doxazosin, clonidine) -BLOCKERS non-selective selective alpha blocking CHOL 0-10% TRIG 0-20% HDL-C 0-15%
a
COMMENT
No change No change No change or
20-50% 15-30% No change
10-15% 5-10% No change
I. transient effects; cardioselective agents affect lipids less II. -blocking or intrinsic sympathomimetic agents are lipid neutral
DIURETICS thiazides ESTROGENS Hormone Replacement b Therapy (HRT) Oral Contraceptive Pills (OCP) Monophasics Triphasics Cyclosporine Ethanol
5-7% initially 0-3% later
30-50%
13 mg/dL
I. effects may be transient
--------- 5-20% 10-15% 15-20% No change
10-15% 10-45% 10-15% No change up to 50%
Up to 9% 15- 15% 5-10% No change
I.
HRT may LDL by 1015%.
OCP can CHOL and TRIG, mainly due to progestin component LDL-C by 30%
I.
I. marked elevations may occur in hypertriglyceridemic patients II. modest ethanol (2 oz. / day) may HDL-C ----------- 10-15% I. reversible changes seen 8 weeks after stopping the drug
Glucocorticoids Isotretinoin
5-10% 5-20%
15-20% 50-60%
a Adapted from McKenney, JM.
In: Koda-Kimble MA, Young LY eds.
Applied Therapeutics: The Clinical Use of Drugs.
6th ed. Vancouver: Applied Therapeutics Inc., 1995:9-12.
b The Writing Group for the PEPI Trial.
Effects of Estrogen or Estrogen/Progestin Regimens on Heart Disease Risk Factors in Postmenopausal Women.
JAMA 1995; 273:199-208.
170
ATTACHMENT 2 DRUG INTERACTIONS PRECIPITANT AGENT Gemfibrozil Bile Acid Resins (BAR's) INTERACTIVE AGENT Warfarin Digoxin Gemfibrozil Levothyroxine Phenobarbital Propranolol HMGCoA-RI's Thiazides Warfarin Cyclosporine a,b
CLINICAL MANIFESTATIONS OF DRUG INTERACTIONS · ·
COMMENT
Risk of anticoagulant activity Can decrease the absorption of interactive agents ·
Take other drugs 1 hour before or 4 hours after BAR
HMGCoA Reductase Inhibitors (HMGCoA-RI's)
·
Risk of rhabdomyolysis or myopathy with concomitant use
· · · ·
Recommend a dose reduction of lovastatina to 20 mg/day or less Recommend a dose reduction of c,d simvastatin to 10 mg/day or less Limited trials have shown fluvastatin to be safe e,f Pravastatin g-i has extensive data to recommend its use in this population Reported with lovastatin, but cannot be ruled out with other HMGCoARI's.
Myopathy including rhabdomyolysis reported in up to 5% of lovastatin patients Interaction also reported with pravastatin
HMGCoA-RI's
Erythromycin
·
Risk of rhabdomyolysis or myopathy
·
HMGCoA-RI's
Gemfibrozil
· · ·
·
Risk of myositis, acute renal failure, rhabdomyolysis BENEFIT MAY NOT OUTWEIGH RISK! Monitor for symptoms (creatine kinase [CK] normal range 21-235, look for 10x upper limit) Monitor liver function tests (LFT's) Risk of myositis, acute rhabdomyolysis BENEFIT MAY NOT RISK! Monitor for symptoms range 21-235, look for Monitor LFT's renal failure, OUTWEIGH
·
·
HMGCoA-RI's
Niacin
· · · ·
·
·
(CK normal 10x upper limit)
Myopathy reported in 2% of lovastatin patients with or without rhabdomyolysis Recommend a dose reduction of fluvastatin, simvastatin, and pravastatin
HMGCoA-RI's
Warfarin
· ·
May effects of warfarin Risk of prothrombin time with concomitant use
Reported with both lovastatin and simvastatin
a Garnett WR. Interactions with hydroxymethylglutaryl-coenzyme A reductase inhibitors.
Am J Health-Syst Pharm 1995; 52:16391645.
b Farmer JA, Gotto AM.
Antihyperlipidaemic agents: Drug interactions of clinical significance.
Drug Safety 1994; 11(5):301-309.
c Martinez-Hernandez BE, Persaud JW, Varghese Z, et al.
Low-dose simvastatin is safe in hyperlipidemic renal transplant patients.
Nephr Dial Transplantation 1993; 8:637-641.
d Castelao AM, Grino JM, Andres E, et al.
HMG CoA reductase inhibitors lovastatin and simvastatin in the treatment of hypercholesterolemia after renal transplantation.
Transplant Proc 1993; 25(1):1043-1045.
e Goldberg RB, Roth D.
A Preliminary report of the safety and efficacy of fluvastatin for hypercholesterolemia in renal transplant patients receiving cyclosporine.
Am J Cardiol 1995; 76:107A-109A. f Li PKT, Mak TWL, Chan TH, et al.
Effect of fluvastatin on lipoprotein profiles in treating renal transplant recipients with dyslipoproteinemia.
Transplantation 1995; 60:652-656.
g Davies RA.
Safety and efficacy of pravastatin after heart transplantation: Preliminary patients studies.[Abstract] In: XI International Symposium Drug Affecting Lipid Metabolism, Florence; 1992:10.
h Kobashigawa JA, Brownfield ED, Stevenson LW et al.
Effects of pravastatin for hypercholesterolemia in cardiac transplant recipients.
JACC 1993; 21:141a (abstract). i Yoshimaura N, Oka T, Okanoto M et al.
The effects of pravastatin on hyperlipidemia in renal transplant patients.
Transplantation 1992; 53:94-99.
171
ATTACHMENT 3
Costs for Hyperlipidemia Drug Therapy (as of November 1996) For current prices, check the Drug 
708-531-7947 a
DRUG
USUAL DOSE 4 gm bid 5 gm bid 4 gm bid
FEDERAL SUPPLY SCHEDULE (FSS) COST/MONTH $ 18.10 $ 18.10 $ 18.10
Bile Acid Resins Cholestyramine Powder Colestipol Granules Colestipol Tablets
HMG CoA Reductase Inhibitors Fluvastatin Lovastatin Pravastatin Simvastatin 40 20 20 5 10 mg mg mg mg mg qd qd qd qd qd $ $ $ $ $ 21.75 26.68 26.67 21.11 26.67
Niacin Gemfibrozil a
1 g IR tid 500 mg SR tid 600 mg bid
$ 3.60 $ 2.75 $ 5.20
Usual doses; does not reflect equivalent doses.
172
Appendices
173
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS Jose B. Aguera-Arcas, MD Senior Medical Consultant Birch 
Damen Ave.
Chicago, IL 60612 312-666-6500 ext. 2878 312-455-5868 (fax) Alice Beden, RD Dietician Lincoln Nebraska VAMC Nutrition and Food Service 60 South 70th Street Lincoln, NB 68510 402-489-3802 ext. 674 Gail Bentley, PhD, RN ACOS, Education Dallas VAMC (141) 4500 South Lancaster Road Dallas,TX 75216 214-372-7916 214-372-7932 (fax) Tom Binder, MS, RD, CDB Chief, Clinical Section Puget Sound Health Care System Seattle VAMC Seattle, WA 98108 206-764-2089 206-764-2935 (fax)
174
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Donna Blake, MD Staff Physician Denver VAMC (117) 1055 Clermont Denver, CO 80222 303-393-2819 ext. 2426 303-399-8020 (fax) Charles M. Clark Jr., MD ACOS, Research Regenstrief Health Institute Indianapolis VAMC (151) 1481 West 10th Street Indianapolis, IN 46202 317-630-6374 317-630-6962 (fax) David Cohen, MD VA Medical Center Dialysis Unit (AKC) 50 Irving Street, NW Washington, DC 20422 202-745-8105 202-745-8184 (fax) Claude Cowan, MD Chief, Ophthalmology VA Medical Center 50 Irving Street, NW (112) Washington, DC 20422 202-745-8295 202-745-8293 (fax) John Downs, Lt. Col., MD Air Force Medical Consultant Dept.
Of Defense Pharmaco Econo.
Ctr 2107 17th Street-Bldg. 4197 Ft. Sam Houston, TX 78234 210-916-7498 210-221-4314 (fax)
175
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Noreen C. Durkin, RN, MSN Tampa VAMC Office of Quality Mgrnt. (lIE) 13000 Bruce B. Downs Blvd.
Tampa, FL 33612 813-972-2000 ext. 7156 813-979-3693 (fax) Richard Eastman, MD Dir., Div. of Diabetes, Endo.
NIH-NIDDK, Nat'l Diabetes Ed. 31 Center Drive MSC 2560, Room 9A16 Bethesda, MD 20892 301-496-7348 301-496-2830 (fax) Linda Ebert, MS, RD, CDE, LD Diabetes Educator Suburban Hospital Wellworks Department 8600 Old Georgetown Road Bethesda, MD 20814 301-896-2072 301-493-5583 (fax) David B. Edelman, MD Durham VAMC (I IC) 508 Fulton Street Durham, NC 27705 919-286-0411 ext. 6147 919-416-5836 (fax) James T. Estes, MD Vascular Surgeon Prince Georges Hospital Center Vascular Diagnostic Lab 3001 Hospital Drive Cheverly, MD 20785 301-618-2336 301-618-2895 (fax)
176
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Lesley J. Fishelman, MD Psychiatrist Harvard Pilgrim Health Care Kenmor Center 2 Finway Plaza Boston, MA 02215 617-965-2090 617-969-4973 (fax) Rosalie S. Fishman, RN, MSN Field Operations Director Birch 
177
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Jennifer Garrett, RRA Birch 
Regional Coordinator 1215 Devonshire Drive Columbia, SC 29204 803-779-1821 Peter Glassman, MBBS, MSc Chairman, Medical Advisory Panel West LA VAMC Div.
Of Gen. Int. Med. (111G) 11301 Wilshire Boulevard Los Angeles, Ca 90073 310-478-3711 Dorothy Gohdes, MD Director, Diabetes Program Mid-South Foundation Medical Center 6401 Poplar-Suite 400 Memphis, TN 38119 901-682-0381 901-761-3786 (fax) Katherine Grimes, MD Consultant 1611 Cambridge Street Cambridge, MA 01238 617-421-2706 Catherine Griver, RD Diabetic Clinical Nutritionist San Diego VAMC 3350 LaJolla Village Drive San Diego, CA 92161 619-552-8585 ext. 7338 Priscilla T. Guy, RKT National PACT Coordinator Memphis VAMC (117) 1030 Jefferson Avenue Memphis, TN 38104 901-523-8990 ext. 7062 901-577-7459 (fax)
178
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Linda Haas, PhC, RN, CDE Endo.
Clinical Nurse Specialist Puget Sound Health Care System Seattle VAMC (118) 1660 South Columbian Way Seattle WA 98108 206-764-2721 206-764-2074 (fax) Gerald Hawley, RN, MSN Project Manager, NatI.
Ctr for Cost Control Clement J. Zablocki Medical Center 5000 West National Avenue Milwaukee, WI 53295 414-382-5375 ext. 2335 414-382-5375 (fax) Patricia S. Hlavin, MD, MS Staff Physician San Diego VAMC 3350 LaJolla Village Drive San Diego, CA 92161 619-552-8585 ext. 3481 619-552-7000 (fax) Clark Holmes, MD Residency Director Family Practice Program, PGHC 3001 Hospital Drive Cheverly, MD 20785 301-618-3462 301-618-2897 (fax) Sarah Ingersoll, RN, MSN Regional Coordinator Birch 
El Molino Avenue Pasadena, CA 91106 818-796-4745 818-564-0245 (fax)
179
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Stephen B. Johnston, RN, MSN Clinical Specialist Charleston VAMC 109 Bee Street Charleston, SC 29401 Barbara Jones, RRA Program Development Coordinator Birch 
180
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Linda Liu, MD Endocrinologist 6001 Montrose Road-Suite 211 Rockville, MD 20852 301-468-1451 301-468-3580 (fax) Walter Lumley, RN, BSN, CDE Nursing Service Philadelphia VAMC University and Woodland Avenues Philadelphia, PA 19104 215-823-5896 215-823-6007 (fax) Robert Lynch, MD Chief of Staff Jackson VAMC 1500 East Woodrow Wilson Jackson, MS 39216 601-364-1206 601-364-1456 (fax) M. Jo MacDonald, MS, CPHQ, EdD Director, Quality Management Inst. 508 Fulton Street Bldg. 3 Durham, NC 27705 919-286-6978 919-286-6864 (fax) Carmi Margolis, MD Physician Ben Gurion University 135 Francis Street Boston, MA 02215 617-754-4800 617-754-4848 (fax) Mavourneen Mangan, RN, MS, CDE Dir., Diabetes Edu.
&
181
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Rosemary McGovern-Lorusso Nutrition Education Specialist Boston VAMC 150 South Huntington Avenue Boston, MA 02130 617-232-9500 617-232-9500 (fax) Charles F. Mullen, OD Director, Optometry Sevice VA Medical Center Fort Howard Division (51 2A4) 9600 North Point Road Fort Howard, MD 21052 410-687-8375 410-687-8548 (fax) Herbert K. Naito, PM) Supervisory Chemist Cleveland VAMC (113W) 10701 East Boulevard Cleveland, OH 44106 216-791-3800 ext. 4069 216-231-3489 (fax) Louise Nelson, RN Quality Improvement Coordinator West Virginia Medical Institute, Inc. 3001 Chesterfield Place Charleston, WV 25304 800-642-8686 304-346-9863 (fax) Roben Newcomb, OD, MPH Columbus VAMC Columbus, OH 43203 614-257-5391 614-257-5637 (fax) Linda Ogle, RN Regional Coordinator Birch 
182
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) James C. Orcutt, MD, PID Director, Opthalmology (1 l2OPH) VA Puget Sound Health Care System 1660 South Columbian Way
Seattle, WA 98018 206-764-2320 206-764-2901 (fax) Jane Penny, RN, MSN, CPHQ Clinical Consultant-Quality Durham VAMC Office of Quality Management 508 Fulton Street Durham, NC 27705 919-286-6910 919-286-6805 (fax) Leonard Pogach, MD Headquarters Program Director, Diabetes Chief, Endocrinology VA New Jersey Health Care System East Orange VAMC, Room 9-160 (111) 385 Tremont Avenue East Orange, NJ 07018 201-676-1000 ext 1693 201-677-4408 (fax) Robert Pollet, MD, PM) ACOS, R
183
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) John Rainieri, DPM Asst.
Chief Podiatric Medicine FDR VA Hospital (112B) P.O. Box 100-Podiatry Service Montrose, NY 10548 914-737-4400 914-737-4400 (fax) Jeff Ramirez, PharmD Pharmacist VA Headquarters Pharmacy Service (111H) 810 Vermont Avenue, NW Washington, DC 20420 202-565-5302 202-565-4237 (fax) Gayle Reiber, PhD HSRD Research Scientist Pugent Sound VAMC (152) 1660 South Columbia Way Seattle, WA 98108 206-764-2089 206-764-2935 (fax) Monica Saggio, RD, CD, CDE Dietitian Milwaukee VAMC 5000 West National Avenue Milwaukee, WI 53295 414-384-2000 414-382-5319 (fax) Lee Sanders, DPM Chief, Podiatry 1700 South Lincoln Ave.
Lebanon, PA 17042 717-228-5952 717-228-5955 (fax) Nancy Sassa, CNP Nurse Practitioner Cameron Medical Group 8700 Georgia Ave., Suite 400 Silver Spring, MD 20910 301-585-6980
184
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Clark Sawin, MD Professor of Medicine Boston VAMC (11 lE) 150 S. Huntington Ave.
Boston, MA 02130 617-278-4557 617-278-4541 (fax) Donna Schoonover, RN, MSN Program Director St. Louis Education Center (14B-SB) #1 Jefferson Barracks Drive St. Louis, MO 63125-4199 314-894-5735 314-894-6506 (fax) Artie Shelton, MD Program Chief Dept.
Of Veterans Affairs (111A) 810 Vermont Ave., NW (Room 10754) Washington, DC 20430 202-273-8936 Penny Smith, RN, BSN, CDE Diabetes Nurse Educator Suburban Hospital 8600 Old Georgetown Road Bethesda, MD 20814 301-896-3056 Faranak Sotoudeh, MD Endocrinologist 10918 Brent Road Potomac, MD 20854 301-474-0400 301-474-2686 (fax) Joseph Spagnuolo, MD Associate Medical Director New Jersey PRO Brier Hill Court-Building J East Brunswick, NJ 08816 908-238-5570 908-238-7766 (fax)
185
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Daniel A. Terreros, MD, PhD Salt Lake City VAMC (51C) 500 Foothill Blvd.
Salt Lake City, UT 84148 801-584-1261 801-584-1297 (fax) Frank Vinicor, MD, MPH Director, Div. of Diabetes Translation Centers for Disease Control 
Facilitator Performance Management Office (Rrn.8750) Department of Veterans Affairs 820 Vermont Avenue, NW 202-273-8336 202-273-9030 (fax) David M. Wanicur, MD Physician 11836 Beekman Place Potomac, MD 20854 301-881-5888 301-881-2945 (fax) Terry D. Weaver, DPM Podiatrist Lebanon VAMC (112A) 1700 South Lincoln Avenue Lebanon, PA 17042 717-228-5952 717-228-5955 (fax) Morris Weinberger, PhD HSR
186
WORKING GROUP MEMBERS (con't) Ruth Weinstock, MD Chief, Endocrinology Syracuse VAMC 800 Irving Avenue Syracuse, NY 13210 315-464-5740 315-464-5718 (fax) Joanna K. Zawadzki, MD Endocrine 
804-675-5151 804-675-5139 (fax)
187
INDIVIDUAL WORKING GROUP Co-Leaders:
GLYCEMIC CONTROL Leonard Pogach, MD Pat Hlavin, MD Linda Haas, RN, PhD, CDE
EPRP LIAISON:
Margaret Baumann, MD
Members:
Robert Pollet, MD Herbert Naito, MD Barbara Fleming, MD, PhD Richard Eastman, MD Charles Clark, MD Frank Vinicor, MD Farranak Sotoudeh, MD Rosemary McGovern-Lorusso Monica Saggio, RD, CD, CDE
Facilitator:
Gerald Hawley, RN, MSN
Contract Liaison:
Sara Ingersoll, RN, MSN
188
INDIVIDUAL WORKING GROUP Co-Leaders:
FOOT CARE Terry Weaver, DPM Gayle Reiber, MPH, PhD
Members:
Dorothy Gohdes, MD David Edelman, MD John Raineri, MD Donna Blake, MD James Estes, MD Joanna Zawadski, MD Penny Smith, RN
Facilitators:
Noreen Durkin, RN, MSN Mavourneen Mangan, RN, MS, CDE
Contract Liaison:
Barbara Jones, RRA
189
INDIVIDUAL WORKING GROUP Co-Leaders:
EYE CARE Claude L. Cowan, Jr., MD James Orcutt, MD Charles Mullen, OD Robert Newcomb, OD, MPH
Members:
Linda Liu, MD David M. Wanicur, MD
Administrative Facilitators:
Jane Penny, RN, BSN Sandy Frazer, RN, BSN
Contract Liaisons:
Jennifer Garrett, RRA Linda Ogle, RN, BSN
190
INDIVIDUAL WORKING GROUP Co-Leaders:
RENAL/HYPERTENSION/LIPIDS Ruth Weinstock, MD, PhD Jacqueline Pugh, MD Clark Sawin, MD
EPRP Liaison:
Leonard Kleinman, MD
Members:
Franklin Zieve, MD Lt. Col. John Downs, MD Walter Lumley, RN, BSN, CDE Ross Fletcher, MD Artie Shelton, MD Joseph Spagnuolo, MD Linda Ebert, MS, RD Alice Beden, RD Catherine Griver, RD
Facilitator:
Daniel Terreros, MD
Contract Liaison:
Louise Nelson, RN, BSN
191
EDUCATION TEAM Co-Leaders: Leonard Pogach, MD Donna Schoonover, RN, MSN Members: Linda Haas, RN, MS, CDE Leonard Kleinman, MD Mavourneen Mangan, RN, MS, CDE Jane Penny, RN, MSN, CPHQ Debby Walder, RN, MSN Morris Weinberger, MD, PhD
Contract Liaison:
Rosalie Fishman, RN, MSN
192
COORDINATION TEAM Veterans Health Administration Peter Glassman, MBBS, MSc Leonard Pogach, MD Debby Walder, RN, MSN
Health Care Financing Administration Department of Defense United States Air Force Centers for Disease Control and Prevention National Institutes of Health
Barbara Fleming, MD, PhD
Lt. Col., John Downs, MD
Frank Vinicor, MD, MPH
Richard Eastman, MD
193
MEDICAL ADVISORY PANEL FOR THE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGEMENT STRATEGIC HEALTH GROUP Peter A. Glassman, MBBS, MSc Chairman, Medical Advisory Panel Patricia Hlavin, MD, MS Medical Advisory Panel Member Christine Chandler, PhD Clinical Specialist/PPM Bruce Schrader, PhD Clinical Specialist/PPM
Page 194
Medical Advisory Panel for the Pharmacy Benefits Management Strategic Health Group Mission The mission of the Medical Advisory Panel (MAP) for Pharmacy Benefits Management (PBS) includes the development of evidence-based pharmacological management guidelines for improving quality and providing best-value patient care.
The MAP is comprised of practicing VA physicians from facilities across the nation: Peter A. Glassman, MBBS, MSc Chairman, Medical Advisory Panel Staff Internist, Department of Medicine VAMC West Los Angeles, CA Assistant Professor of Medicine University of California, Los Angeles John Booss, MD National Director, Neurology Service VAMC West Haven, CT Professor, Departments of Neurology 
Page 195
Jeff Etchason, MD Director, Health Service Research 
Page 196
VHA PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGEMENT MEDICAL ADVISORY PANEL
Peter A. Olassman, MBBS, MSc Chairman, Medical Advisory Panel Patricia Filavin, MD, MS Medical Advisory Panel Member Christine Chandler, PhaunD Clinical Specialist/PPM Bruce Schrader, Pharnif) Clinjcal Specialist/PPM
Page 197
